or schoolchildren. Based upon a recommendation from Harriet Beecher Stowe, they hired McGuffey. His brother Alexander Hamilton McGuffey wrote the fifth and sixth readers for the McGuffey Readers series. His books sold over 120 million copies and still continue to be used for homeschooling. 
In 1836, he left Miami to become president of Cincinnati College, where he also served as a distinguished teacher and lecturer.  He left Cincinnati in 1839 to become the 4th president of Ohio University, which he left in 1843 to become president of what was then called the Woodward Free Grammar School in Cincinnati, one of the country's earliest public schools. 
From 1843 to 1845, he was a professor in Woodward College in Cincinnati. While in Cincinnati he began the preparation of an "Eclectic" series of readers and spellers, which became popular, and have been many times revised and reissued. From 1845 till his death, he occupied the chair of moral philosophy and political economy in the University of Virginia in Charlottesville, Virginia. 
He was married to Harriet Spinning of Dayton, Ohio in 1827. They had five children, who were expected to act with submission and obedience, according to one of their daughter's diary. McGuffey believed in the importance of education and religion to live successful lives. 
McGuffey and Harriet had as many as three slaves while at Virginia.[b] One of these enslaved individuals was William Gibbons, who was hired out to them. Gibbons was literate. He was said to be self-taught and also said to have been instructed by McGuffey's daughter Maria. He later became a minister in Charlottesville and Washington, D.C.[c] 
Harriet was ill during the summer of 1850 and was taken to her parent's home in Woodside by McGuffey. Her health did not improve as hoped and she died on July 3. She was buried in Woodside Cemetery. He later married Miss Laura Howard, daughter of Dean Howard of the University of Virginia. They had one daughter, Anna. She died at the age of four. 
During the American Civil War and the Reconstruction era, McGuffey was generous in his donations to the poor and African Americans. McGuffey died May 4, 1873 at the University of Virginia, and is buried in the University of Virginia Cemetery, in Charlottesville, Virginia. 
McGuffey was Henry Ford's favorite author and was always proud of his exposure to McGuffey's teachings, which "reinforced an ordered, rigid, and straightforward view of the world where white was white and black was black". 
Named for William Holmes McGuffey's influential primers that first appeared in 1836 and remained in print until 1921, the McGuffey longevity awards recognize long-lived, still-in-use textbooks of excellence. 
The Vaippu Sthalam also Called Tevara Vaippu Sthalam are places in South India that were mentioned casually in the songs in Tevaram, hymns composed in praise of Lord Shiva during 7th-8th century.[citation needed] It is one of the shrines of the Vaippu Sthalams sung by Tamil Saivite Nayanar Appar. This place might have been the Neithalankanal very Kaverippumpattinam. Later it might have got the name of Neithalvasal. 
The list of the Vaippu Sthalam is found in each verse of Tevaram that may be part of verses glorifying other temples.[citation needed] 
The presiding deity in the garbhagriha, represented by the lingam, is Munivasakasamy. He is also known Kailasanathar. His consort is known as Mathurabashini. 
This article about Hindu place of worship in Tamil Nadu is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Some hospitals, such as San Francisco General Hospital, have medical surge exercises to train staff. 
In February 2019, the American Hospital Association released a report that medical surge capacity was one of four major challenges threatening rural hospitals' ability to provide care, along with the "opioid epidemic," violence in the community, and cyber threats. 
According to the U.S. Department of Health & Human Services, medical surge capacity is "the ability to evaluate increased volume of patients .The requirements of surge may extend beyond direct patient care to include such tasks as extensive laboratory studies or epidemiological investigations. This is related to patients volume and  identifying numbers of hospital beds, personnel, supplies, and equipment should be identified and addressed." 
According to the U.S. Department of Health & Human Services, medical surge capability required "special intervention to protect medical providers, other patients, and the integrity of the HCO. This is also the ability to manage patients requiring specialized medical care and evaluation." Notable examples include influxes of patients with SARS. 
Pomeroy was born in Gloucester, Massachusetts, United States. He began playing trumpet at an early age. In his early teens he started performing in Boston, claiming inspiration from the music of Louis Armstrong. In 1946, at the age of 16, he became a member of the Musicians Union in Gloucester after the union did not have enough members to conduct a meeting. He studied dentistry at Harvard University for a year but dropped out to pursue his jazz career. 
By the time of the 1900 United States Census, Sincock was living in Laurium, Calumet Township, in Michigan's Upper Peninsula with his mother Mary, five siblings, and grandfather William Higgins.  A biographical profile of Samuel Sincock indicates he moved to Okanogan County, Washington, in 1893, though no indication is given as to whether he was divorced from Herbert's mother, Mary Sincock. 
While attending Michigan, Sincock had also played for the Calumet Aristocrats in the 1907 Northern-Copper Country League. He compiled a record of 6-9 in 15 games for the Aristocrats. He also played for the Harrisburg Senators in the Tri-State League in 1908. 
Sincock was also the first British Columbian to make it to the major leagues. It took 47 years for another British Columbia native, Bob Alexander, to make his major league debut with the Baltimore Orioles in 1955. 
At the time of the 1910 United States Census, Sincock was living with his mother, grandmother, and a sister at Laurim in Calumet Township, Michigan. He was employed as a solicitor for an electric company. 
In a draft registration card completed in June 1917, Sincock stated that he was living in Grand Forks, North Dakota, where he was employed as the manager of the new business department for the Red River Power Co.  He also stated that he was a naturalized United States citizen with a wife and two children under age 12.  The draft registrar described him as medium height, stout, and having blue eyes and light hair. 
At the time of the 1920 United States Census, Sincock was living in Nashwauk Township, Minnesota.  He was living with his brother-in-law and his two children, Gordon and Mary.  He was employed as a draftsman. 
At the time of the 1930 United States Census, Sincock was living in Chicago and employed as a teacher in a public school. He was living with his wife Lillian and 13-year-old daughter Mary. 
In a draft registration card completed in April 1942, Sincock stated that he was living in Chicago.  He was living and working at the New Lawrence Hotel at 1020 Lawrence Avenue, several blocks southwest of Soldier Field. 
In his later years, Sincock was employed as the manager of the Douglass House, a hotel in downtown Houghton, Michigan.  In August 1946, while still employed as the manager of the Douglass House, Sincock died suddenly at Houghton.  He is buried in the Lake View Cemetery in Calumet, Michigan. 
This biographical article related to fencing in Egypt is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Burning at Both Ends peaked at number 165 on the Billboard 200. In addition, it charted on two Billboard component charts: number 27 on Independent Albums, and number 43 on Top Rock Albums. Dead Press! ranked the release at number seven on their top ten pop punk albums of the year list. 
All songs written by Set Your Goals and Brian McTernan, except "Calaveras" by Mikey Ambrose. All lyrics by Matt Wilson and Jordan Brown. 
Within a week of the game's initial release in Japan, it sold 76,452 units. The game received generally mixed reviews, with some of video games publications commenting on its frustrating gameplay and very little differences to older Dragon Ball Z games. 
The game's mechanics are essentially the same as those of the Budokai series, with some elements carried over from Burst Limit. Players take control of and battle various characters from the Dragon Ball franchise. Forty-two characters are playable, in comparison with Budokai 3's  thirty-eight characters. 
The game's story mode, called Dragon Mission, uses a map with various objective missions icons that retell some of the battles within the manga and anime series. Players take control of their icon, a Goku avatar, by walking or running to an available mission icon. These missions range from standard and timed endurance battles. Other missions include mini games such as on-foot searches, races to reach a destination or find an item, timed button sequence responders and first person shooters. 
Skill capsules are carried over from the Budokai series. They allow players to customize characters with a variety of special techniques and attributes. The capsules can be bought with Zeni, and the more of the same capsule a player buys, the stronger their effects become. This differs from the Budokai series, where skills had to be placed multiple times on a character for them to become stronger. 
A mode called "Fighter's Road" becomes available after certain goals are met. Players participate in a series of battles on four of the maps from the Dragon Mission mode. Like Dragon Mission, players are rewarded a certain amount of Zeni after every victory. They are also rewarded more Zeni according to how many battles they've won when they exit. 
According to producer Riyo Mito, the game's title Infinite World implies the immense gameplay of the epic Dragon Ball universe within the scope of the game's Dragon Mission mode. The game was specifically chosen for the PlayStation 2 to target fans that did not have access to the PlayStation 3 and Xbox 360 consoles to play the previous title, Burst Limit, at the time. 
This release also include the closing theme "Dragon Ball Party" and the English version of the opening theme "We Gonna Take You There". Ironically, the version of the song that was used was the Japanese version as opposed to the English version, which contrasted to the previous two Dragon Ball Z console games Budokai Tenkaichi 3 and Burst Limit which used English versions of their opening theme songs. 
The game went on to only sell 200,000 copies in Japan and 80,000 copies in the United States as of August 2010. However, Infinite World went on to become Japan's second top-selling game in 2008, selling 76,452 units the first week in the country right behind Professor Layton and the Unwound Future. 
The university was selected to participate in Project 211, a government initiative which provided significant funding to elevate the research standards and faculty hiring resources of rising universities across China. In 2017, the university was recognized by the Chinese Ministry of Education as a Double First Class University, with Double First Class status in certain disciplines which the government seeks to elevate to "world-class" status. 
In 1997, the Guizhou Agricultural College, Guizhou Institute of Arts, and Guizhou Agricultural Cadre-Training School were merged into NGU to form Guizhou University. 
In 2004, the Guizhou University of Technology merged into Guizhou University to complete the current Guizhou University. In 2005, the University was invited as a member of Project 211 by the Ministry of Education. 
Guizhou University established a sister school relationship with the Presbyterian College in Clinton, South Carolina; the latter offers a Chinese language program for the fifteen American students every year. 
The university consists of 39 colleges and offers programs of study in 11 academic divisions leading to associate, baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees. These include: 
In 2005, eight years after Gui Nong (Guizhou Agricultural College) was merged with Gui Da (Guizhou University), Guizhou University began hosting United States Peace Corps Volunteers. The volunteers teach at both the undergraduate and graduate level in the School of Foreign Languages. 
Guizhou University has nine campuses situated in different locations around the city of Guiyang. The administrative center is located on the North Campus on the Huaxi River, Huaxi District of Guiyang. 
North West Warriors was formed in 2013 and became a Twenty20 team in 2017. They played their inaugural Twenty20 in the 2017 Inter-Provincial Trophy against Northern Knights. In total, 29 players have appeared in Twenty20 cricket for North West Warriors, with three players (Andy McBrine, David Rankin, and Stuart Thompson) having played in all fifteen Twenty20 fixtures played by North West Warriors. 
Players are initially listed in order of appearance; where players made their debut in the same match, they are initially listed by batting order. 
 The common warehouse metamodel (CWM) defines a specification for modeling metadata for relational, non-relational, multi-dimensional, and most other objects found in a data warehousing environment.  The specification is released and owned by the Object Management Group, which also claims a trademark in the use of "CWM". 
The CWM specifies interfaces that can be used to enable interchange of warehouse and business intelligence metadata between warehouse tools, warehouse platforms and warehouse metadata repositories in distributed heterogeneous environments. CWM is based on three standards: 
Initially, CWM contained a local definition for a data translation facility. It is not clear how the QVT final adopted specification will affect CWM. 
While the Object Management Group owns the standard for CWM, some companies are considered co-submitters of the CWM specification.  The following companies were listed as co-submitters to the v1.1 specification: 
Software vendors claiming CWM support differ in the degree to which they comply with CWM.  Some were co-submitters of the specification, and are actively using the OMG trademark in marketing literature.  Other vendors have expressed support for CWM or claim they have products that are "CWM-compliant." 
Questions about compliance are addressed within the specification itself.  Chapter 18 in both the 1.0 and 1.1 specification list required and optional compliance points. 
The Object Management Group has a list of CWM implementations, but it is unclear how this list is maintained. 
Compliance with the CWM specification does not guarantee tools from different vendors will integrate well, even when they are "CWM-compliant". The OMG addressed some of these issues by releasing patterns and best practices to correct these problems in a supplementary specification, CWM Metadata Interchange Patterns 
These vendors have been identified as having a CWM implementation or have active projects to support CWM. 
The following products or companies have claimed CWM support, but are not listed by OMG as having a CWM implementation. In some cases, the vendor may have implemented the v1.0 specification, which was replaced by the v1.1 specification. Refer to the software vendor to determine if the product is compliant with CWM or merely supports a subset of the required portions of the specification. 
After the war, what is now Smiths Group used the airport as a test site for various aircraft. At the same time the airport provided scheduled services to the Channel Islands, Dublin and Isle of Man. In the 1960s the Skyfame Museum, dedicated to World War II aircraft, opened. 
In the 1990s, both the Police Aviation Services and Bond Air Services stationed helicopters and their headquarters at Staverton. In 1993, its name was changed to Gloucestershire Airport in an effort to "reflect its increasing prominence as the business aviation centre for the county". 
During the 1990s, Staverton was the home of the MidWest production facility where the company manufactured the MidWest AE series of single- and twin-rotor Wankel aero-engines for light aircraft. The twin-rotor engine was first installed into two ARV Super2 aircraft.  Midwest was eventually closed down, and its assets bought by Austrian manufacturer Diamond Aircraft Industries. 
Between 2013 and 2017, Citywing operated scheduled flights from the airport, describing it as "Gloucester (M5) Airport" and marketing it as an alternative to Birmingham Airport, Bristol Airport and to a lesser extent Oxford Airport. 
Many of the flights to and from the airport are for business purposes, but there are also recreational flights and training flights. 
The airport houses several flying clubs for private pilots including Bristol Aero Club, Cotswold Aero Club and the Staverton Flying School alongside commercial pilot training from Aeros and Skyborne Aviation.  Specialist helicopter trainers JK Helicopter Training and Heli Air also provide gift/pleasure helicopter flights. People are able to undertake their pilot's licence training at the airport. 
Also based at the airport is the Little Jet Company, which has a fleet of Citation Bravo and King Air 350 business jets that can be chartered around Europe. 
Citywing previously flew a minimum of five weekly to the Isle of Man during the winter months and up to 25 times weekly during the summer peak season. The Jersey route was flown three times per month during the peak season between July and September, but was not operated during the winter months. This service ended in March 2017, after the airline was liquidated. 
Peaceful Places is a heritage tourism trail, launched in 2014. The trail encompasses churches and chapels across the north of the Ceredigion county of Wales, each with its own story. There are 17 places to visit which can be found at Cardigan Bay, and in the valleys and hills of the Cambrian Mountains. The heritage contained within the places of worship span from pre-Christian to modern times. 
Pennant Hills High School offers many subjects, with the faculties including Social Sciences, Science, Agriculture, English, Music, Christian Education, History, Maths, Visual Arts, Industrial Arts or TAS, Languages and Physical Education. PHHS also contains a Special Education system, helping physically and intellectually challenged students. 
Pennant Hills High School contains a multi-purpose centre (Robert Stacey Hall), new Design and Technology/Visual Arts buildings, the Alfred Gray Memorial Library, and many specialty rooms including science labs, cooking and computer rooms. It also has two fields for sports such as football, rugby and cricket. An agricultural plot is located at the rear of the school, housing crops, sheep, chickens and other livestock. 
The school suffered from a fire on 11 June 2001, destroying the school administration building, Industrial Arts Block, and the English, History, Mathematics and Visual Arts staffrooms. 
The school now has had an elevator installed between levels 2 and 4 (for use by disabled or injured students), and a new Design and Technology and Visual Arts building. In 2005, a new Covered Outdoor Learning Area (COLA) was constructed. 
The Agriculture area is fondly known as the "Ag Plot" or the "Farm" and consists of several small paddocks, an area for growing plants, a machinery shed, a tool shed, a greenhouse and another shed that stores seeds and the like. 
A blue plaque, attached to the Leinster Terrace end of the building in 1977, commemorates American author Bret Harte, who resided and died at 74 Lancaster Gate in 1902. 
The Department of Social Services (DSS) is a department of the Government of Australia charged with the responsibility for national policies and programs that help deliver a strong and fair society for all Australians. The department develops and implements social policy. 
The head of the department is the Secretary of the Department of Social Services, currently Ray Griggs, who reports to the Anne Ruston, Minister for Families and Social Services. Previously, the Minister for Social Services was Paul Fletcher MP from 2018 to 2019. In the Turnbull Government, the ministers were assisted by the Assistant Minister for Disability Services, the Hon. Jane Prentice MP and the Assistant Minister for Multicultural Affairs, the Hon. Craig Laundy MP. 
The head office of the department is located in the Australian Capital Territory suburb of Greenway. 
The department was formed by way of an Administrative Arrangements Order issued on 18 September 2013 and replaced the majority of the functions previously performed by the former Department of Families, Housing, Community Services and Indigenous Affairs (FaHCSIA); with the exception of Office of Indigenous Policy Coordination, that was transferred to the Department of the Prime Minister and Cabinet. 
In an Administrative Arrangements Order made on 18 September 2013, the functions of the department were broadly classified into the following matters: 
The Secretary of the Department Social Services is the head of the department, also known as the secretary of the level of Senior Executive Service Band 4 in the Australian Public Service as per the Public Service Act 1999. 
This article is a list of historic places in Alberta's Rockies, including those in Banff National Park and Jasper National Park. It includes places entered on the Canadian Register of Historic Places, whether they are federal, provincial, or municipal. 
The 700 was launched at the 1934 Prague Motor Show. Priced at 22,900 CSK in its four-seater guise, 1,002 vehicles were manufactured before production ceased in June 1937. 
Albion is a city in and the county seat of Edwards County, Illinois, United States. The population was 1,988 at the 2010 census. The city was named "Albion" after an ancient and poetic reference to the island of Great Britain. 
A 3.8-magnitude earthquake occurred seven and a half miles outside of the city on September 19, 2017. 
Albion was laid out in 1818 as a utopian community, and given the name Albion, a literary name for England. 
In 1821, the county seat of Edwards County was moved from Palmyra to Albion. However, residents of Mount Carmel felt their town should be the county seat. Four companies of militia marched from Mount Carmel towards Albion to seize the county documents stored in the courthouse. The situation was eventually resolved in 1824 by separating Wabash County from Edwards County at Bonpas Creek. The resulting counties remain two of the smallest in Illinois. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 1,933 people, 861 households, and 538 families residing in the city.  The population density was 903.8 people per square mile (348.8/km2).  There were 957 housing units at an average density of 447.5 per square mile (172.7/km2).  The racial makeup of the city was 98.71% White, 0.16% African American, 0.10% Native American, 0.57% Asian, 0.21% from other races, and 0.26% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.57% of the population. 
There were 861 households, out of which 26.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.5% were married couples living together, 9.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 37.4% were non-families. 34.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 19.4% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.20 and the average family size was 2.82. 
In the city, the population was spread out, with 21.6% under the age of 18, 7.3% from 18 to 24, 24.0% from 25 to 44, 22.8% from 45 to 64, and 24.3% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 43 years. For every 100 females, there were 83.7 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 80.3 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $29,476, and the median income for a family was $36,917. Males had a median income of $26,182 versus $17,375 for females. The per capita income for the city was $14,747.  About 8.6% of families and 12.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 19.0% of those under age 18 and 9.3% of those age 65 or over. 
The Baseball Finnish Championship Series (Finnish: Baseballin SM-sarja) has been played in Finland since 1981. Currently the Championship consists of 6 teams, but has had as many as 7 (in 2007). The Championship winner represents Finland in the following year's CEB European Cup tournament. 
Gavin Carragher (born 17 July 1933) is an Australian sprinter. He competed in the men's 100 metres at the 1956 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Australian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The EQ245/EQ2100 is a 3.5 tonne capacity, six-wheel drive troop/cargo carrier truck developed and built by Dongfeng Motor Corporation and used by the People's Liberation Army of the People's Republic of China for transport. 
Ronjan Sodhi (born 23 October 1979 in Ferozepur, Punjab, India) is an Indian Double trap shooter. He won two silver medals at the 2010 Commonwealth Games and a gold medal at the 2010 Asian Games. In 2011, he became first Indian to successfully defend a World Cup title. He is also a recipient of the Arjuna Award and  Rajiv Gandhi Khel Ratna award (2013). 
Ronjan Sodhi shot a perfect 50 hits out of 50 clays in the final and set a new world record with a score of 195 to clinch the coveted Gold Medal in Double Trap event at the 2010 ISSF World Cup held at Lonato, Italy. 
On 6 October, Sodhi won the Platinum Medal in Men's Double Trap Singles. He along with Asher Noria also won the Silver Medal in Men's Double Trap Pairs, losing to the eventual champions Stevan Walton and Steven Scott by one point. 
Sodhi scored a total of 186 and thus, managed to win the Gold Medal in Men's Double Trap Event at the Asian Games 2010. He also won the bronze medal in the Men's Double Trap Team. 
Sodhi scored a total of 183 hits (144 in the qualifications, and 41 hits in the final) and won the Silver Medal in 2011 ISSF World Cup held at Beijing, China, thus earning an Olympic Quota for India. 
Sodhi became the only Indian marksman to grab the top spot in the latest ISSF World Rankings. Ronjan, who was earlier ranked second behind American Joshua Richmond by three points, attained the summit by virtue of his bronze medal-winning feat at the World Cup earlier in July in Maribor, Slovenia. 
Sodhi won the Gold Medal at the 2011 ISSF World Cup held at Al Ain, United Arab Emirates on 4 October 2011. Hu Binuyuan of China came second. 
John Wurster (born January 12, 1948) is an American speed skater. He competed at the 1968 Winter Olympics and the 1972 Winter Olympics. 
This biographical article about a speed skater from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In September 1882, the club amalgamated with local rivals Grosvenor Football Club to form Windsor Football Club. 
This article about a defunct English football club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Notes of a Native Son is a collection of ten essays by James Baldwin, published in 1955, mostly tackling issues of race in America and Europe. The volume, as his first non-fiction book, compiles essays of Baldwin that had previously appeared in such magazines as Harper's Magazine, Partisan Review, and The New Leader. 
Notes of a Native Son is widely regarded as a classic of the black autobiographical genre. The Modern Library placed it at number 19 on its list of the 100 best 20th-century nonfiction books. 
Baldwin castigates Harriet Beecher Stowe's Uncle Tom's Cabin for being too sentimental, and for depicting black slaves as praying to a white God so as to be cleansed and whitened. He proceeds to repudiate Richard Wright's Native Son for portraying Bigger Thomas as an angry black man, viewing this as an example of stigmatizing categorization. 
Baldwin offers a sharp critique of Richard Wright's Native Son, citing its main character, Bigger Thomas, as unrealistic, unsympathetic and stereotypical. 
Baldwin criticises Carmen Jones, a film adaptation of Carmen using an all-black cast. Baldwin is unhappy that the characters display no connection to the condition of blacks and sees it as no coincidence that the main characters have lighter complexions. 
Baldwin tells the story that happened to The Melodeers, a group of jazz singers (including two of Baldwin's brothers) employed by the Progressive Party to sing in Southern Churches. However, once in Atlanta, Georgia, they were used for canvassing until they refused to sing at all and were returned to their hometown. They now enjoy success in New York City. 
Corydoras cortesi is a tropical freshwater fish belonging to the subfamily Corydoradinae of the family Callichthyidae found in Colombia. 
There were some instances of slaves in early 19th century, such as the Green family of Bent's Fort. Former enslaved men and women settled in Colorado, establishing themselves as business people, legislators, and other professions. 
In 1877, the state passed a law that made slavery and servitude illegal, except for convicted individuals. In 2018, an Amendment was passed to make slavery, or forced labor, of convicted people illegal. 
Apache, Jumanos, and Kiowa settlements were raided by Utes and Comanche natives on horseback. Children and adults were captured and sold in villages. 
Before Colorado Territory was formed, previous territories were formed from the Louisiana Purchase (1803) and subsequent treaties that encompass land of the present-day state of Colorado. 
James Beckwourth, born into slavery in 1805 in Virginia, escaped slavery. He came west, including to the Colorado area beginning in 1822. He was part of an expedition to lead mines, was an explorer of the Rocky Mountains, and was a fur trapper and mountain man. He was also a co-founder of El Pueblo. 
After Utes raided El Pueblo (now known as Pueblo, Colorado in the Massacre of 1854, young Juan Isidro Sandoval was captured by the Utes and sold as a slave. He was enslaved for eight years and then freed in exchange for a Hawken rifle and $300 dollars (equivalent to $7,777 in 2020) in silver. 
In the mid-19th century blacks came to Colorado with other fortune seekers during the Pike's Peak Gold Rush and lived in and around Denver, Boulder, Cripple Creek, and Central City, Colorado. A number of black members of the 9th and 10th United States Cavalry, the Buffalo Soldiers, settled in Colorado after they completed their military career. 
Barney Ford was an enslaved man from Virginia who ran away using the Underground Railroad, he lived in several places in the United States an in Central America before he settled in Denver. He was a civil rights activist and a successful businessman. He helped freed slaves attain an education. 
Henry O. Wagoner, an Underground Railroad conductor before moving to Colorado, promoted civil rights. He paid legal fees for fugitive slaves. William Jefferson Hardin, born free in Kentucky, came to Colorado in 1863. He was the mayor of Leadville, fought for civil rights, and was the first African American elected to the Wyoming Territory Legislative Assembly. 
On November 15, 1865, the Zion Baptist Church was founded. Its members, who "played sterling roles" throughout the city and beyond, included former enslaved people, activists, teachers, doctors, preachers, politicians and more. 
Ubell attended Brooklyn College in New York, where he earned a Bachelor of Arts in English Literature in 1961. He pursued studies in studio art, art history, and printmaking at various institutions, including Accademia di Belle Arti di Roma in Rome and Pratt Institute. 
Ubell is a recipient of the A. Frank Mayadas Online Learning Leadership Award, the highest honor given to an individual in digital education. In 2011, the Online Learning Consortium (formerly known as the Sloan Consortium) named him among its 2011 Fellows and a Council Member of the Chongqing (China) International Exchange Association. 
Disternopsis apicespinosa is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1939. It is known from Australia. 
After Francia's death in 1840, Carlos Antonio Lopez assumed power and modernized the army and expanded the navy. He opened an iron foundry at Ybycui that produced arms and bullets and also built up a railway system in the country to transport troops and materiel. 
As of 2016, the Paraguayan Army had a total strength of 10,600 personnel, including 2,500 conscripts. 
Six battalions of combat engineers, one communications battalion, one Special Forces battalion, seven regiments of infantry and six regiments of cavalry comprise the rest of the force. There is little organic aviation available to it. 
Each corps has a weapons school run by its command. The logistical command manages and addresses materials, mobilization, health care, etc. The command of the Army Institute of Education administers three schools, commissioned and noncommissoned officers, a military academy and the CIMEFOR (a center for pre-military study that trains Reserve officers). 
Each of the nine divisions that make up the three corps has one or two regiments of infantry or cavalry, its platoon of engineers, its communications section, military police units, etc. 
Dying Breed is a 2008 Australian horror film that was directed by Jody Dwyer and stars Leigh Whannell and Nathan Phillips. 
Tasmania, 1800s. Alexander Pearce, a convict known as "the Pieman", has escaped into the wilderness and he is being hunted by policemen with dogs. He is faced by a policeman who attempts to shoot Pearce, but his gun does not fire. Pearce then bites the policeman's neck, taking a large chunk from his throat, killing him, allowing Pearce to escape. In his escape he is confronted with a Tasmanian tiger, whom he sates by kicking a piece of the policeman over to for the predator to eat. 
Dying Breed premiered on 26 April 2008 at Tribeca Film Festival. The cinema release was originally planned for 14 August, but was changed to 6 November 2008. It is rated MA15+ for Strong Horror Violence and Sex Scene, Blood and Gore. It was part of the third After Dark Horrorfest in 2009. 
In Australia, one of the posters was banned, due to the "gruesome" picture; however, the poster was still allowed to be shown in cinema foyers, and online. 
In its first weekend in Australia it was ranked #11 making A$220,878 across 113 cinemas. The film did poorly in the Australian box office, and made $525,384. 
In Australia, the DVD was released during 8 April 2009. There are three different DVD covers that are available. The first features a meat pie, broken open with human organs inside. The second features four characters on the top, and the bottom is a woman running through woods. The third cover features a man being held by an elderly man. Special Features on all editions include: 
The New York and Massachusetts portions of the mountain are within protected areas; Taconic State Park and Mount Washington State Forest respectively. The Connecticut portions are privately owned and conserved. 
The summit of Brace is an open area with scrubby forest on the slopes. A cairn several feet high, with a small windsock attached, sits on the highest ground. There are views available in all directions. 
Northwest the Helderberg Escarpment is visible, south of Albany. Closer to the mountain, the lower hills of Columbia and Dutchess counties are below. In the latter, Stissing Mountain and its fire tower, south of Pine Plains stand out. The Hudson Highlands are in the distant southwest. 
The Mount Brace Outdoor Club, based in the valley below the mountain, operates the landing zone for hang gliding and paragliding from the summit. All such foot-launched aircraft pilots must sign in at the club, whether or not they are members. This is done under permit with the state Office of Parks, Recreation and Historic Preservation; pilots who do not check in with the club can be cited and fined. 
Born in Tokyo. In 1980 March, he graduated from the Faculty of Law, University of Tokyo and in April, he joined the Maritime Self-Defense Force as a 31st general executive candidate (equivalent to the 24th term of the National Defense Academy). 
In July 2003, Joint Staff Office, 5th Staff Office, Defense Planning Coordinator and General Team Leader. 
After Gamsakhurdia's death, the Zviadists never created a single party, but joined various political organizations and social movements, while some of them continued to fight Eduard Shevardnadze's government. 
Compliance can be confused with concordance, which is the process by which a patient and clinician make decisions together about treatment. 
In medicine, compliance (synonymous with adherence, capacitance) describes the degree to which a patient correctly follows medical advice. Most commonly, it refers to medication or drug compliance, but it can also apply to medical device use, self care, self-directed exercises, or therapy sessions. Both patient and health-care provider affect compliance, and a positive physician-patient relationship is the most important factor in improving compliance, 
The term concordance has been used in the United Kingdom to involve a patient in the treatment process to improve compliance, and refers to a 2003 NHS initiative. In this context, the patient is informed about their condition and treatment options, involved in the decision as to which course of action to take, and partially responsible for monitoring and reporting back to the team. 
An estimated half of those for whom treatment regimens are prescribed do not follow them as directed. 
Until recently,[when?] this was termed "non-compliance", which some regarded as meaning that someone did not follow the treatment directions due to irrational behavior or willful ignoring of instructions.[citation needed] The term adherence is often used to imply a collaborative approach to decision-making and treatment between a patient and clinician. 
Cost and poor understanding of the directions for the treatment, referred to as 'health literacy' have been known to be major barriers to treatment adherence.  There is robust evidence that education and physical health are correlated. Poor educational attainment is a key factor in the cycle of health inequalities. 
Educational qualifications help to determine an individual's position in the labour market, their level of income and therefore their access to resources.[citation needed] 
In 1999 one fifth of UK adults, nearly seven million people, had problems with basic skills, especially functional literacy and functional numeracy, described as: "The ability to read, write and speak in English, and to use mathematics at a level necessary to function at work and in society in general." This made it impossible for them to effectively take medication, read labels, follow drug regimes, and find out more. 
In 2003, 20% of adults in the UK had a long-standing illness or disability and a national study for the UK Department of Health, found more than one-third of people with poor or very poor health had literary skills of Entry Level 3 or below. 
Low levels of literacy and numeracy were found to be associated with socio-economic deprivation. Adults in more deprived areas, such as the North East of England, performed at a lower level than those in less deprived areas such as the South East. Local authority tenants and those in poor health were particularly likely to lack basic skills. 
A study of the relationship of literacy to asthma knowledge revealed that 31% of asthma patients with a reading level of a ten-year-old knew they needed to see the doctors, even when they were not having an asthma attack, compared to 90% with a high school graduate reading level. 
In children with asthma self-management compliance is critical and co-morbidities have been noted to affect outcomes; in 2013 it has been suggested that electronic monitoring may help adherence. 
Social factors of treatment adherence have been studied in children and adolescent psychiatric disorders: 
People of different ethnic backgrounds have unique adherence issues through literacy, physiology, culture or poverty.[citation needed] There are few published studies on adherence in medicine taking in ethnic minority communities. Ethnicity and culture influence some health-determining behaviour, such as participation in screening programmes and attendance at follow-up appointments. 
Prieto et al emphasised the influence of ethnic and cultural factors on adherence. They pointed out that groups differ in their attitudes, values and beliefs about health and illness. This view could affect adherence, particularly with preventive treatments and medication for asymptomatic conditions. Additionally, some cultures fatalistically attribute their good or poor health to their god(s), and attach less importance to self-care than others. also 
Measures of adherence may need to be modified for different ethnic or cultural groups. In some cases, it may be advisable to assess patients from a cultural perspective before making decisions about their individual treatment.[citation needed] 
Two forms of MPR can be calculated, fixed and variable. Calculating either is relatively straightforward, for Variable MPR (VMPR) it is calculated as the number of days' supply divided by the number of elapsed days including the last prescription. 
    V M P R =    All days' supply Elapsed days (inclusive of last prescription)      {\displaystyle VMPR={\dfrac {\text{All days' supply}}{\text{Elapsed days (inclusive of last prescription)}}}}   
For the Fixed MPR (FMPR) the calculation is similar but the denominator is the number of days in a year whilst the numerator is constrained to be the number of days' supply within the year that the patient has been prescribed. 
A not-for-profit organisation called the Healthcare Compliance Packaging Council of Europe] (HCPC-Europe) was set up[when?] between the pharmaceutical industry, the packaging industry with representatives of European patients organisations. The mission of HCPC-Europe is to assist and to educate the healthcare sector in the improvement of patient compliance through the use of packaging solutions. A variety of packaging solutions have been developed by this collaboration. 
The World Health Organization (WHO) groups barriers to medication adherence into five categories; health care team and system-related factors, social and economic factors, condition-related factors, therapy-related factors, and patient-related factors. Common barriers include: 
In 2012 it was predicted that as telemedicine technology improves, physicians will have better capabilities to remotely monitor patients in real-time and to communicate recommendations and medication adjustments using personal mobile devices, such as smartphones, rather than waiting until the next office visit. 
The effectiveness of two-way email communication between health care professionals and their patients has not been adequately assessed. 
Depot injection's need to be taken less regularly than other forms of medication and a medical professional is involved in the administration of drugs so can increase compliance. Depot's are used for oral contraceptive pill and antipsychotic medication used to treat schizophrenia and bipolar disorder. 
A WHO study estimates that only 50% of patients suffering from chronic diseases in developed countries follow treatment recommendations. 
200,000 new cases of cancer are diagnosed each year in the UK. One in three adults in the UK will develop cancer that can be life-threatening, and 120,000 people will be killed by their cancer each year. This accounts for 25% of all deaths in the UK. However while 90% of cancer pain can be effectively treated, only 40% of patients adhere to their medicines due to poor understanding.[citation needed] 
Results of a recent (2016) systematic review found a large proportion of patients struggle to take their oral antineoplastic medications as prescribed. This presents opportunities and challenges for patient education, reviewing and documenting treatment plans, and patient monitoring, especially with the increase in patient cancer treatments at home. 
Partridge et al (2002) identified evidence to show that adherence rates in cancer treatment are variable, and sometimes surprisingly poor. The following table is a summary of their findings: 
In 1998, trials evaluating Tamoxifen as a preventative agent have shown dropout rates of around one-third: 
Patients with diabetes are at high risk of developing coronary heart disease and usually have related conditions that make their treatment regimens even more complex, such as hypertension, obesity and depression which are also characterised by poor rates of adherence. 
As a result of poor compliance,[citation needed] 75% of patients with a diagnosis of hypertension do not achieve optimum blood-pressure control.[citation needed] 
Nikenbah is a rural town and locality in the Fraser Coast Region, Queensland, Australia. In the 2016 census the locality of Nikenbah had a population of 657 people. 
The town was originally named Aalberg by Danish settlers. However, by 1883, it had acquired the name Nikenbah, which is a corruption of Aboriginal words (Kabi language), nguruin meaning emu and ba meaning place. 
Glendyne Education and Training Centre opened in Nikenbah in 2002 as a special assistance school for children who are unsuited to mainstream schooling. It is operated by Carinity (formerly Queensland Baptist Care). 
There are no mainstream schools in Nikenbah. The nearest primary schools are Yarrilee State School in neighbouring Urraween to the north and Kawungan State School in neighbouring Kawungan to the north-east. The nearest secondary schools are Hervey Bay State High School in Pialba to the north and Urangan State High School in Urangan to the north-east. 
Since the arrival of European settlers, the peninsula has been converted from native New Zealand bush to farmland. 
Although some people objected to giving their religion, 60.7% had no religion, 26.5% were Christian, and 3.6% had other religions. 
Of those at least 15 years old, 312 (13.0%) people had a bachelor or higher degree, and 522 (21.8%) people had no formal qualifications. The median income was $34,700. The employment status of those at least 15 was that 1,236 (51.6%) people were employed full-time, 354 (14.8%) were part-time, and 75 (3.1%) were unemployed. 
Awhitu District School and Waipipi School are coeducational full primary schools (years 1-8) with rolls of 113 and 143 students respectively as of March 2021. 
The Peninsula has a high sympatric diversity of native New Zealand land snails. Communities of >70 native species in a 4 ha patch of bush can be found here, whereas in other parts of the world, 15 sympatric land snail species would be considered high. Grazing and other habitat disturbances can negatively impact this diversity. 
Pinto began rallying in 1968. In 1972, he won the European Rally Championship in a Fiat 124 Sport Spider. The following year, the World Rally Championship was run for the first time, and Pinto competed with Fiat, winning the 1974 Rally Portugal. For 1975, he moved to Lancia, where he remained until the end of 1977, driving the legendary Lancia Stratos HF. 
This biographical article related to Portuguese auto racing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to European rallying is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Karnataka is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thomas Grady (born March 18, 1985) is an American football quarterback who primarily played in the Arena Football League (AFL).  
After a standout high school career at Edison High School,  Grady signed with the University of Oklahoma to continue his football career. After a lack of playing time for two years, Grady transferred to the University of Utah. While at Utah, Grady saw limited action again, making only three starts in his career.  
On July 8, 2003, Grady committed to Oklahoma. Grady chose Oklahoma over offers from Florida State, Tennessee, UCLA, USC and Washington. 
Grady began his college career at the University of Oklahoma, He redshirted in 2003, and watched from the sidelines as starter Jason White won the Heisman Trophy. As White's backup in 2004, Grady completed 12 of 14 passes for 63 yards and one touchdown. 
Grady was assigned to the Pittsburgh Power on September 6, 2013 after he was selected in the dispersal draft of the Chicago Rush and Blaze players. The Power folded after the 2014 season. 
On April 2, 2018, Grady returned to the AFL with the expansion Albany Empire.  He led the team to the best regular season record and was named the All-Arena team, but lost in the semifinals to two-win Washington Valor. He stayed with the Empire for the 2019 season and defeated the Philadelphia Soul in ArenaBowl 32, giving Grady his first Arena Bowl championship. Grady won the Most Valuable Player Award in 2018 and 2019. The AFL folded after the 2019 season. 
Landore is bounded by the wards of Castle to the south west; Cwmbwrla to the west; Mynydd-Bach to the north west; Morriston to the north; Bonymaen to the east; and St. Thomas to the south east. 
The electoral ward consists of some or all of the following areas: Castle Graig, Brynhyfryd, Hafod, Landore, Morfa and Plasmarl, in the parliamentary constituency of Swansea East.  However the Landore ward can be split into three chief areas from north to south: Plasmarl, Landore and Hafod. 
For electoral purposes, Landore is divided into a number of polling districts: Plasmarl, Cnap Llwyd, Glandwr and Hafod. 
The Elected Councillors for the Landore Ward are Cllr Viv Abbott (Liberal Democrat) and Cllr Rob Speht (Liberal Democrat). 
Landore is a residential area.  It has seen a number of new developments during the early millennium decade, such as the Liberty Stadium, now the Swansea.com Stadium, which opened in 2005 and a new out-of-town retail park built around the same time. 
Morfa is a former area of light industry, which is now dominated by a retail park in the north western part of the ward. 
Landore was one of the ten wards created to Swansea County Borough Council, electing two representatives in the November 1889 elections. 
The Redbirds received an invitation to the 1978 National Invitation Tournament. They were beaten by Indiana State University in the first round. 
Piervittorio Pampuro (born 22 April 1917) was an Italian field hockey player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1952 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to an Italian field hockey figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rhytiphora anaglypta is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Francis Polkinghorne Pascoe in 1867. It is known from Australia. 
CollegeNET, Inc. is an American developer of web technology for higher education and non-profit institutions based in Portland, Oregon. 
The company changed its name to CollegeNET in May 1999. In recent years, CollegeNET has expanded its products to include online course evaluation and all-purpose surveys; asynchronous video interviewing, international academic recruitment, and career services for students. 
CollegeNET is a major financial contributor to college students. The company operates the Mach 25 scholarship search engine and has distributed over $2.25 million through the CollegeNET.com scholarship election site. CollegeNET.com is the first social network in the higher education arena that awards weekly and quarterly scholarships to students based on interactive participation and peer-voting. 
CollegeNet produces the Social Mobility Index (SMI) which measures the degree that individual colleges and universities contribute to social mobility.  
The Nordic 10000m Challenge is an annual long-distance running competition over 10,000 metres between the Nordic countries: Norway, Sweden, Denmark, Finland and Iceland. The competition was established in 1997, the same year as the European 10,000m Cup. 
The organising body, Nordic Athletics, has also encouraged participation of the Baltic countries: Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania. 
Nyein Chan (born 2 June 1991) is a Burmese professional footballer who plays as a defender and currently plays in Shan United. 
In 2019, Nyein Chan was chosen for 2022 World Cup Qualification Stage and first time ever played for Myanmar national football team against Nepal national football team. And then, he played against Tajikistan national football team  and Mongolia national football team. 
This biographical article related to Burmese (Myanmar) association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Kuznetsov NK-6 was a low-bypass afterburning turbofan engine, designed by the Kuznetsov Design Bureau. 
Devereux was the son of Price Devereux, 9th Viscount Hereford and his wife Mary Sandys, daughter of Samuel Sandys of Ombersley Court, Worcestershire. He entered Balliol College, Oxford in 1711. 
In 1719 Devereux was High Sheriff of Brecknockshire, having inherited the estate of the Morgans of Pencoyd near Hay-on-Wye. The same year he was returned unopposed at a by-election as Member of Parliament for Montgomeryshire. He was returned again for Montgomeryshire at the general elections of 1722 and 1727. In 1727 he was also returned as MP for Orford but preferred to represent Montgomeryshire where he was returned again at the 1734 general election. 
In 1740 he surrendered his seat when, on the death of his father, he succeeded to the peerage as Viscount Hereford, premier viscount of England, inheriting Vaynor Park in Montgomery. He married as his second wife (1740) a daughter of William Price of Rhiwlas, Merioneth. 
On Devereux' death on 29 July 1748, the title passed to Edward Devereux, a distant cousin in Nantcribba, Montgomeryshire and the estate at Vaynor Park was sold. 
This biography of a viscount or viscountess in the Peerage of England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article relating to the superfamily Alucitoidea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This geographical article about a location in Denizli Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Despite its small size (fewer than 300 students are accepted each year, after a very selective exam), it is a crucial part of the infrastructure of Moroccan industry. 
The Mines Rabat is often compared at the Mines ParisTech in France. In the limit of available places candidates can be admitted to this title and by level: 
The admission to Mines Rabat in the normal cycle is made through a very selective entrance examination, and requires at least two years of preparation after high school in preparatory classes. Admission includes a week of written examinations during the spring followed sometimes by oral examinations over the summer. 
Mines Rabat is ranked among the top 3 Moroccan Grandes Ecoles, though it doesn't appear in international rankings due to its very limited number of students (300 students for the class of 2016). 
1st year at Mines Rabat - equivalent to - senior year of BSc. 2nd year at Mines Rabat - equivalent to - 1st year of MSc. 3rd (final) year at Mines Rabat - equivalent to - 2nd year of MSc. 
Sharzhenga is located 68 km northwest of Nikolsk (the district's administrative centre) by road. Shirokaya is the nearest rural locality. 
This Nikolsky District, Vologda Oblast location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
All the orphans had documents from both their life in Shanghai and their life after they transferred to their herdsmen foster parents in Xilin Gol League, Inner Mongolia. However, these records were all destroyed in the "Cultural Revolution" . 
Notocomplana lapunda  is a flatworm. This worm is a hermaphrodite which lives in salt water. The scientific name of the species was first published by Marcus & Marcus in 1968. 
This flatworm- (or platyhelminth-) related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The task of defining and mapping these ecoregions was carried out by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Region 6, EPA-National Health and Environmental Effects Research Laboratory (Corvallis, Oregon), and the Multi-Agency Wetland Planning Team.[Note 1] The new classification system they developed may differ from previous frameworks developed separately by the agencies. 
Arkansas is ecologically diverse. Though often simplistically split into halves from southwest to northeast, with "uplands" in the northwest half and "lowlands" in the southeastern half, the CEC system of levels reveals the diverse forests and floodplains, prairies and plateaus, ridges and river bottoms, and loess hills and lowlands of Arkansas. 
Tom Pecora (born January 21, 1958) is an American college basketball coach. Pecora was hired as associate head coach at Quinnipiac on March 28, 2017 under new head coach Baker Dunleavy. 
He has 198 wins as a Head Coach at the Division I level (Hofstra, Fordham), and 261 wins in his career as a collegiate coach. 
During his time in Hempstead, Hofstra was the winningest program in the Metropolitan New York area. Over his last six years, Hofstra won 121 games, including four 20-win seasons. In 2006 and 2009, he was named Coach of the Year by the Metropolitan Basketball Writers Association (MBWA) and he also received regional Coach of the Year honors from the National Association of Basketball Coaches (NABC) and the Basketball Coaches Association of New York (BCANY). 
Over his entire collegiate basketball coaching career, Pecora has a student-athlete graduation rate of 100 percent. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biography of a member of a Middle Eastern royal house is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
All For Latvia! started in 2000 as a non-formal Latvian youth group with a nationalist disposition and became a social organization in 2002. 
After a ban on symbols similar to the Nazi swastika or the Soviet hammer and sickle in 2003, members of the organization protested outside the Latvian parliament with ethnographic symbols bearing reversed versions of the swastika. All For Latvia! leader Dzintars Raivis defended the protest, arguing that "the swastika is by no means something Hitler thought of."[citation not found] The swastika symbol has featured prominently in Latvian folk symbology for centuries. 
The organization became a political party in January 2006, running in that year's elections. It received 1.48% of vote and no seats in the parliament. Following that election, All For Latvia! organized remembrance processions of the Latvian legionnaires who fought against the Communist Soviet Union on the side of Nazi Germany during World War II. 
On 23 July 2011, the For Fatherland and Freedom/LNNK Party and All For Latvia! merged to form the National Alliance. 
In April 2013, All For Latvia! officially established cooperation ties with the National Democratic Alliance, a political association in the Russian Federation, which "aims to create a Russian democratic state, which will break cleanly away from the Eurasian imperial legacy, opting instead for a European cultural and civilizational identity, based on the ideas of freedom and progress" and is "sustaining a course for consistent rapprochement and cooperation with the European Union and NATO". 
All For Latvia! supports protectionist economic policies to increase the role of locally owned businesses. It is supportive of the traditional family, opposed to homosexuality, gambling and favours more restrictive regulation of alcohol sales. It believes that the common interests of the nation have a higher value than the interests of individual people. 
All For Latvia! party leader Raivis Dzintars replied to accusations of Fascism by stating that there were "times when you could be called a fascist only because you replied in Latvian to a question asked in Russian."[citation not found] 
MEP from Harmony Centre Alexander Mirsky was successfully sued by All For Latvia! and other "National Alliance" members for calling them "Fascists" in public. In April 2013 Mirsky was found guilty by Riga District Court in smearing reputation of the plaintiffs and was asked to pay them damages. 
This biographical article relating to Portuguese cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The destination is accessible via road. However, tourists are prohibited to go close to the waterfall due to the poor route and treacherous nature of the fall. 
The adjacent areas are filled with pine trees. Some of the plant species include eupatorium, lantana, rubus, fern, osmundastrum cinnamomeum and phegopteris. 
It is believed by the local people that this fall is haunted. If people go in odd number, they return in even number. The waterfall has also been the subject of numerous suicides and is infamous for many deaths. 
Thomas Amweg of Jo Zeller Racing was crowned champion by 127 points over Inter Europol Competition driver Jakub Smiechowski. Florian Schnitzenbaumer became the Trophy class champion for the first time. 
Numbers used at Remus F3 Cup events listed; numbers used at races run to F2 Italian Trophy regulations displayed in tooltips. 
Round 6 (Imola) was held together with the F2 Italian Trophy. However, no Italian F2 Trophy competitors were eligible to score Remus F3 Cup points. 
Ware Lock (No2) is a lock on the River Lee Navigation at Ware. The lock stands adjacent to Ware Weir and is the only lock on the Navigation to be operated and maintained by the Environment Agency. 
Unlike most of the locks on the Lea, when travelling upstream, the temporary mooring before entering the lock is on the right-hand (starboard) side of the river, as is the mooring on leaving the lock.[citation needed] 
This article about a building or structure in Taiwan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Charles Bwale (born 29 July 1976) is a Zambian football coach and former player who coaches Konkola Blades. A defender, he played in nine matches for the Zambia national team from 2000 to 2003. He was also named in Zambia's squad for the 2002 African Cup of Nations tournament. Bwale was appointed coach of Konkola Blades in late 2020. 
This biographical article related to Zambian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Perry also stood as an umpire in four first-class matches between 1859 and 1866.  He died at Thatcham, Berkshire, on 15 March 1913. 
Cendant Corporation was an American provider of business and consumer services, primarily within the real estate and travel industries. In 2005 and 2006, Cendant broke up and spun off or sold its constituent businesses. Although the company was based in New York City, the majority of Cendant's headquarters employees were located in Parsippany-Troy Hills, New Jersey. 
Blackstone took Hospitality Franchise Systems public in a December 1992 IPO. HFS was among the fastest growing companies of its size in the 1990s and the company's stock rose from its IPO price of $4 per share to $77 per share in 1998. 
In 1993, HFS purchased the Super 8 brand, franchised to 1,000 motels, for $125 million, and bought the 61-hotel Park Inn brand. The company made a brief foray into the casino industry, but then spun off that business in November 1994 as National Gaming. In 1995, HFS launched a new hotel brand, Wingate Inn. 
In 1996, HFS acquired the Avis car rental company for $793 million. In keeping with HFS's strategy of being primarily a franchisor, it kept ownership of the Avis brand name and reservations system, while selling off the operations of Avis's corporate-owned locations as a new company, Avis Rent a Car, Inc. HFS also bought Resort Condominiums International, a timeshare exchange service, for up to $825 million. 
In 1997, HFS acquired PHH Corp. for $1.8 billion. PHH's businesses of mortgage brokerage, relocation services, and fleet management were expected to synergize with HFS's real estate and car rental businesses. 
In January 1998, Cendant purchased Jackson Hewitt, a franchised chain of tax preparation offices, for $480 million. 
In March 2001, Forbes and Shelton were indicted by a federal grand jury and sued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, which accused the company of directing the massive accounting fraud that ultimately cost the company and its investors billions of dollars. Shelton served 8 of his 10-year prison sentence before being released early for exemplary behavior. Former CEO Walter Forbes was sentenced to 12 years in prison in 2007. 
Under Silverman, Cendant bounced back from the accounting scandal far outperforming the markets in the early 2000s. 
Following the fraud debacle, Cendant began selling businesses to reduce its debt and repair the financial damage caused by the accounting scandal. In 1998 the company sold Hebdo Mag, a publisher of classified advertising publications, for $450 million to a management buyout group. In 1999 it sold its consumer software division, Cendant Software (consisting of Blizzard Entertainment, Davidson & Associates, Knowledge Adventure, and Sierra On-Line), to French publisher Havas for $770 million. 
In 2004, Cendant began a series of moves to simplify its business and focus on its core areas of real estate and travel. 
On October 23, 2005, Cendant's strategy of simplification culminated in the announcement that it would split into four separate companies, focused respectively on hotels, real estate, travel services, and rental cars. Silverman said the breakup would improve shareholder value by allowing the market to better recognize the value of Cendant's component businesses. 
Cendant originally planned to spin off its travel services division to shareholders as a company named Travelport, but on June 30, 2006, Cendant announced it would sell Travelport to Blackstone for $4.3 billion. 
On July 31, 2006, Cendant's real estate and hotel divisions were spun off and became separate companies under the names Realogy and Wyndham Worldwide, respectively. 
The sale of Travelport to Blackstone was completed on August 23, 2006. This left Cendant with only its car rental business, comprising Avis, Budget Rent a Car, and Budget Truck Rental. The company retired the Cendant name and renamed itself to Avis Budget Group on September 1, 2006. 
Cendant owned the rental brands of Avis and Budget, holding these properties in the CCRG (Cendant Car Rental Group).  Avis and Budget operate a shared fleet of cars, and have the same "back end" system, but operate at different locations, offer different service levels, and have somewhat different pricing. After the Cendant name was dissolved, the car rental segment became known as Avis Budget Group and currently trades on the NASDAQ stock exchange under the ticker symbol CAR. 
This geographical article about a location in Baskil District, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Many of the named portions of the course are due to historic falls or crashes by racers. The best known sections of the Lauberhorn downhill, or Lauberhornrennen, race are the following (in descending order): 
One of the first reports of skiing from the Lauberhorn to Wengen was in 1912 when the Roberts of Candahar Ski Challenge Cup was offered. By 1927 it was just known as the Lauberhorn Ski Cup. 
This article about a member of the Legislative Assembly of New Brunswick is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Sri Lankan cricket person born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to an Italian film of the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Graham and his family moved to Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania in 1968, where he later attended Gateway High School. Graham gained interest in science and mathematics from his father who was a nuclear physicist. 
Graham received a Bachelor of Arts in philosophy from Cornell University (1986). He then attended Harvard University, earning Master of Science (1988) and Doctor of Philosophy (1990) degrees in computer science. He has also studied painting at the Rhode Island School of Design and at the Accademia di Belle Arti in Florence. 
In 2001, Graham announced that he was working on a new dialect of Lisp named Arc. It was released on 29 January 2008. Over the years since, he has written several essays describing features or goals of the language, and some internal projects at Y Combinator have been written in Arc, most notably the Hacker News web forum and news aggregator program. 
In 2005, after giving a talk at the Harvard Computer Society later published as "How to Start a Startup", Graham along with Trevor Blackwell, Jessica Livingston, and Robert Morris started Y Combinator to provide seed funding to a large number of startups, particularly those started by younger, more technically oriented founders. Y Combinator has now invested in more than 1300 startups, including Reddit, Justin.tv, Xobni, Dropbox, Airbnb and Stripe. 
BusinessWeek included Paul Graham in 2008 edition of its annual feature, The 25 Most Influential People on the Web. 
In response to the proposed Stop Online Piracy Act (SOPA), Graham announced in late 2011 that no representatives of any company supporting it would be invited to Y Combinator's Demo Day events. 
In October 2019, Graham announced a specification for another new dialect of Lisp, written in itself, named Bel. 
Graham proposed a "disagreement hierarchy" in a 2008 essay "How to Disagree", putting types of argument into a seven-point hierarchy and observing that "If moving up the disagreement hierarchy makes people less mean, that will make most of them happier." Graham also suggested that the hierarchy can be thought of as a pyramid, as the highest forms of disagreement are rarer. 
Following this hierarchy, Graham notes that articulate forms of name-calling (e.g., "The author is a self-important dilettante") are no different from crude insults. 
 Graham considers the hierarchy of programming languages with the example of "Blub", a hypothetically average language "right in the middle of the abstractness continuum. It is not the most powerful language, but it is more powerful than Cobol or machine language." It was used by Graham to illustrate a comparison, beyond Turing completeness, of programming language power, and more specifically to illustrate the difficulty of comparing a programming language one knows to one that one does not.
...These studies would like to formally prove that a certain language is more or less expressive than another language. Determining such a relation between languages objectively rather than subjectively seems to be somewhat problematic, a phenomenon that Paul Graham has discussed in "The Blub Paradox".
Graham describes this as the "Blub paradox" and concludes that "By induction, the only programmers in a position to see all the differences in power between the various languages are those who understand the most powerful one." 
Amboyna was a 232-ton merchant ship built at Rangoon, British Burma in 1807. She made several voyages to Australia with cargo from the East Indies and China. She also carried some military convicts to Australia. She was wrecked in the China Seas in 1825. 
Amboyna was built at Rangoon, British Burma. She was rebuilt in 1813 on the Hooghly River, British India. 
Amboyna was wrecked in the China Seas in 1825, while on a voyage to China from Australia and under the command of David Wilson. 
Absolute Polysics is the ninth full-length studio album from Japanese new wave act Polysics, and the last to feature vocalist and keyboardist Kayo before her departure in 2010. The album was released in September 2009 in Japan and in January 2010 in the U.S. 
Lake Center Christian School is a private Christian school in Lake Township, between Uniontown and Hartville, Ohio, United States. The school teaches students from pre-school through 12th grade and is no longer affiliated with the Mennonite Church USA, but continues to be based on Mennonite principles. The school is accredited by the Association of Christian Schools International and AdvancED. 
Lake Center was established in September 1947 with 183 students. High school grades were added beginning in 2003 with the first graduating class in 2007, a class of 34 students. 
In the summer of 2013 the school began fundraising in order to build the "cafenasium," a multifunctional addition that would serve as a cafeteria and a gymnasium, amongst other things. In May 2016, construction of the project commenced with a groundbreaking ceremony. The project was officially completed in 2020. 
Teams are fielded in baseball, basketball, cheerleading, golf, soccer, softball, cross country, track & field, bowling and volleyball. 
Lake Center Christian began play in the Portage Trail Conference County Division in August 2015 after previously competing as an independent. 
Rainin' in My Heart is an extended play 45 rpm record released by the English beat group Pretty Things in 1965.  The record reached # 12 in the British EP charts in October of that same year. 
This gene encodes a tumor suppressor protein that can induce cell growth arrest and apoptosis. The encoded protein is a nuclear protein that physically interacts with the tumor suppressor protein TP53 and is a component of the p53 signaling pathway. Reduced expression and rearrangement of this gene have been detected in various cancers. Multiple alternatively spliced transcript variants encoding distinct isoforms have been reported. 
This article incorporates text from the United States National Library of Medicine, which is in the public domain. 
Cactus Plain is a plain east of the Colorado River and Parker Valley, in La Paz County, western Arizona, United States. 
Cactus Plain is a landform within the Lower Colorado River Valley. It is adjacent to Bouse Wash, which is on the south. The wash drains northwest-west into the Colorado River. 
Recreation activities in both protected areas includes backpacking, day hiking, sightseeing, horseback riding, photography, and botanical and wildlife study. 
The wilderness study area is an immense open area of stabilized and semi-stabilized sand dunes, unique in western Arizona.  Recreation activities include backpacking, day hiking, sightseeing, horseback riding, and botanical and wildlife study. 
Carenum tinctilatum (digger carab beetle) is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Scaritinae. It was described by Newman in 1838. It is found in Australia. 
Louise Dean School is a public combined junior and senior high school in Calgary, Alberta, Canada, that teaches Grades 9 through 12.  It is designed exclusively for teenage mothers, both current and expectant.  It is operated by the Calgary Board of Education (CBE) with assistance from The Catholic Family Service of Calgary; despite the organization's name, the program is secular. 
The Catholic Family Service assists students with counseling, and organizes support groups for the teen mothers, fathers (although only the mothers can be students), and grandparents of the babies.  It provides an on-site daycare, the Dr. Clara Christie Infant Learning Centre, which allows the mothers to attend classes, but still visit their children frequently.  The staff also helps teach new mothers parenting and life skills. 
The Calgary Health Region assists students and their babies in areas of nursing, childbirth education and dental hygiene. 
In addition to political claims, the site monitors the progress elected officials make on their campaign promises, including a "Trump-O-Meter" for President Donald Trump and an "Obameter" for President Barack Obama. PolitiFact.com's local affiliates review promises by elected officials of regional relevance, as evidenced by PolitiFact Tennessee's "Haslam-O-Meter" tracking Tennessee Governor Bill Haslam's efforts and Wisconsin's "Walk-O-Meter" tracking Wisconsin Governor Scott Walker's efforts. 
PolitiFact.com was started in August 2007 by Times Washington Bureau Chief Bill Adair, in conjunction with the Congressional Quarterly.  
In March 2010, the Times and its partner newspaper, The Miami Herald, launched PolitiFact Florida, which focuses on Florida issues. The Times and the Herald share resources on some stories that relate to Florida. 
Since then, PolitiFact.com expanded to other papers, such as The Atlanta Journal-Constitution, The Providence Journal, Milwaukee Journal Sentinel, The Plain Dealer, Richmond Times-Dispatch, the Knoxville News Sentinel and The Oregonian. The Knoxville News Sentinel ended its relationship with PolitiFact.com after 2012. 
In 2013, Adair was named Knight Professor of the Practice of Journalism and Public Policy at Duke University, and stepped down as Bureau Chief at the Times and as editor at PolitiFact.com. The Tampa Bay Times' senior reporter, Alex Leary, succeeded Bill Adair as Bureau Chief on July 1, 2013, and Angie Drobnic Holan was appointed editor of PolitiFact in October 2013. Adair remains a PolitiFact.com contributing editor. 
In 2014, The Plain Dealer ended its partnership with PolitiFact.com after they reduced their news staff and were unwilling to meet "the required several PolitiFact investigations per week". 
The organization was acquired in February 2018 by the Poynter Institute, a non-profit journalism education and news media research center that also owns the Tampa Bay Times. 
Since 2009, PolitiFact.com has declared one political statement from each year to be the "Lie of the Year." 
In December 2009, they declared the Lie of the Year to be Sarah Palin's assertion that the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2009 would lead to government "death panels" that dictated which types of patients would receive treatment. 
In December 2010, PolitiFact.com dubbed the Lie of the Year to be the contention among some opponents of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act that it represented a "government takeover of healthcare". PolitiFact.com argued that this was not the case, since all health care and insurance would remain in the hands of private companies. 
PolitiFact's 2016 Lie of the Year was "fake news" referring to fabricated news stories including the Pizzagate conspiracy theory. 
Politifact's 2019 Lie of the Year was Donald Trump's claim that the anonymous whistleblower who reported possible presidential misconduct got the report of his phone call with Ukrainian President Volodymyr Zelensky "almost completely wrong." The whistleblower complaint alleged that President Trump urged President Zelensky to conduct an investigation into Trump's political rival in return for promised military aid. 
The 2020 Lie of the Year was misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic; specifically, theories that either deny the existence of the disease outright, or claim that the disease is much less deadly than it actually is. In particular, Donald Trump was mentioned as a main supporter of such conspiracy theories. 
PolitiFact.com was awarded the Pulitzer Prize for National Reporting in 2009 for "its fact-checking initiative during the 2008 presidential campaign that used probing reporters and the power of the World Wide Web to examine more than 750 political claims, separating rhetoric from truth to enlighten voters". 
A Wall Street Journal opinion editorial by Joseph Rago in December 2010 called PolitiFact "part of a larger journalistic trend that seeks to recast all political debates as matters of lies, misinformation and 'facts,' rather than differences of world view or principles". 
Mark Hemingway of The Weekly Standard criticized all fact-checking projects by news organizations, including PolitiFact, the Associated Press and the Washington Post, writing that they "aren't about checking facts so much as they are about a rearguard action to keep inconvenient truths out of the conversation". 
In December 2011, Northeastern University journalism professor Dan Kennedy wrote in The Huffington Post that the problem with fact-checking projects was "there are only a finite number of statements that can be subjected to thumbs-up/thumbs-down fact-checking". 
Matt Welch, in the February 2013 issue of Reason magazine, criticized PolitiFact and other media fact-checkers for focusing much more on statements by politicians about their opponents, rather than statements by politicians and government officials about their own policies, thus serving as "a check on the exercise of rhetoric" but not "a check on the exercise of power". 
PolitiFact was forced to retract its fact-check about a lab leak as the possible origin of COVID-19. The site had originally stated that the lab leak was a "conspiracy theory that has been debunked since the beginning of the coronavirus pandemic". However, after some scientists said they were "too quick to discount a possible link", the lab leak theory, PolitiFact changed its evaluation of the claim to "unsupported by evidence and in dispute". 
PolitiFact has drawn allegations of political bias from both left-leaning and right-leaning media outlets. Overall, right-leaning outlets get more negative results from fact-checkers than those on the left, including at PolitiFact, which some right-wing commentators have interpreted as evidence of bias. 
George H. Miller worked as a high school teacher in Marshall, Michigan, but decided to take a new job working in Chicago at Sears, Roebuck and Co. Shortly thereafter, Miller decided to form his own business, the Miller Fibre Box Company. The business was profitable, and he sold it to retire at the age of fifty. In his later years, Miller and his wife Bernice were active in Elmhurst city affairs. 
Haman County (Haman-gun) is a county in South Gyeongsang Province, South Korea.  The local government is seated in Gaya-eup.  The county magistrate is Seok Gyu Jin. 
In the early Common Era, Haman was the seat of Ara Gaya, a leading state of the Gaya confederacy.  Many relics from this period are still preserved in the county.  After the fall of Gaya, Haman was absorbed into Silla as Asirang-gun; in 757 its name was changed to Haman-gun, which it bears today. 
There is also a market day held every five days in Gaya-eup in the Gaya Market. When the market is open, the farmers from all over the county come to the market to display their fresh produce. There are also many different kinds of vendor that sell meat, fish, snacks and clothes. 
The Ancient Tomb Complex in Dohang-ri and Malsan-ri in Gaya-eup is another site worth seeing in Haman. It contains around 1000 tombs in mound form which are supposedly the tombs of kings. The largest royal tomb is Tomb 34. It is 39.3m in diameter and 9.7m in height. There is also a museum that accompanies the park. The exhibits are in Korean so admission is free for foreign visitors. 
There are two festivals in Haman. The first being the Araje Festival which is held on the weekend that April 15 falls. There are a number of cultural and sports events that commemorate the Ara Gaya. 
There is also the Watermelon Festival which is also held on a weekend April at Hamju Park in Dohang-ri, Gaya-eup. There are a number of entertainment events, concerts and fireworks. There is also a display of carved watermelons which is quite interesting to see. 
Educational facilities: 32 schools (elementary 19/middle 8 /high 5), covering 7,830 students. Some of the elementary schools have less than 30 students. 
Avinash Sharad Mahatekar (born 1948) is an Indian politician and member of the Republican Party of India (A). He is spokesperson of Republican Party of India (A). He was sworn as Minister of State for Social Justice and Special Assistance in Devendra Fadnavis cabinet in June 2019.  He was an activist in the Dalit Panther movement. He is an influential speaker in the Ambedkarite movement. He belongs to an Ambedkarite Buddhist family. 
He made his debut in the Russian Football National League for FC Dynamo Bryansk on 19 September 2020 in a game against FC Tekstilshchik Ivanovo. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
NeoAccel is a multinational company that sells computer network security products direct to the end-user and through OEM relationships. The company is best known for its SSL VPN-Plus product and related ICAA & TSSL technology. The company is headquartered in San Jose, California, USA with development and support offices in Navi Mumbai & Pune, India. 
NeoAccel was founded in 2004  by former NetScaler (purchased by Citrix) CEO & Founder, Michel Susai. 
NetScaler developed the technology that currently accelerates 75% of the world's internet traffic for companies like Google, Yahoo, and AOL. NetScaler was purchased by Citrix in 2005 for $300 million. 
NeoAccel has financial support and venture capital infusions from Hotmail founder Sabeer Bhatia, and inventor Prabhu Goel. In 2006 NeoAccel raised $4,000,000 from Baring Private Equity Partners and NTT Leasing. 
The company is headquartered in San Jose, California with a development office in Navi Mumbai, India, a support center in Pune, India, and a sales center in Beijing. 
NeoAccel's flagship product is SSL VPN-Plus. The company claims it to be the fastest VPN available due to its use of ICAA and TSSL technologies. The product uses SSL for transport and is often categorized as an SSL VPN, although the company markets it as the 3rd Generation VPN. 
In finance, the clean price is the price of a bond excluding any interest accrued since bond's issuance and the most recent coupon payment. Comparatively, the dirty price is the price of a bond including the accrued interest. Therefore, 
In Bloomberg Terminal or Reuters, bond prices are quoted using the clean price. Traders tend to think of bonds in terms of their clean prices. 
Clean prices are more stable over time than dirty prices. When clean prices change, it is for an economic reason such as a change in interest rates or the bond issuer's credit quality.  Dirty prices change day to day depending on the date relative to the coupon payment dates, as well as economic reasons. 
XYZ Ltd. issues a bond with a $1000 face value and a $980 published price, with a coupon rate of 5% paid semi-annually and a maturity date of five years. The annual coupon payment is 5% of $1000, or $50. The investor receives a $25 coupon payment every six months until the maturity date.  
In this case, $980 is the clean price of the bond. The bond price quoted to investors is $980 plus the accrued interest. Brokers quote the dirty price, found by adding the clean price and accrued interest since that day.  
If the bond's last coupon payment was made on 1 June, on 1 September, the dirty price is: Clean Price + Accrued Interest (where accrued interest is the interest accumulated from the 1st of June to the 31st of August on the bond according to its coupon rate.)  
The price changes continuously, as it depends on how many days have passed since the last coupon payment on the bond. 
This list is presented in the taxonomic sequence of the Check-list of North and Middle American Birds, 7th edition through the 62nd Supplement, published by the American Ornithological Society (AOS). Common and scientific names are also those of the Check-list, except that the common names of families are from the Clements taxonomy because the AOS list does not include them. The following tags have been used to highlight several categories of occurrence. 
Anatidae includes the ducks and most duck-like waterfowl, such as geese and swans. These birds are adapted to an aquatic existence with webbed feet, flattened bills, and feathers that are excellent at shedding water due to an oily coating. 
Guineafowls are a group of African, seed-eating, ground-nesting birds that resemble partridges, but with featherless heads and spangled gray plumage. 
The New World quails are small, plump terrestrial birds only distantly related to the quails of the Old World, but named for their similar appearance and habits. 
The Phasianidae are a family of terrestrial birds which consists of quails, partridges, snowcocks, francolins, spurfowls, tragopans, monals, pheasants, peafowls, and jungle fowls. In general, they are plump (although they vary in size) and have broad, relatively short wings. 
Grebes are small to medium-large freshwater diving birds. They have lobed toes and are excellent swimmers and divers. However, they have their feet placed far back on the body, making them quite ungainly on land. 
Pigeons and doves are stout-bodied birds with short necks and short slender bills with a fleshy cere.  
The family Cuculidae includes cuckoos, roadrunners, and anis. These birds are of variable size with slender bodies, long tails, and strong legs. The Old World cuckoos are brood parasites. 
Nightjars are medium-sized nocturnal birds that usually nest on the ground. They have long wings, short legs, and very short bills. Most have small feet, of little use for walking, and long pointed wings. Their soft plumage is camouflaged to resemble bark or leaves. 
The potoos (sometimes called poor-me-ones) are large near passerine birds related to the nightjars and frogmouths. They are nocturnal insectivores which lack the bristles around the mouth found in the true nightjars. 
Swifts are small birds which spend the majority of their lives flying. These birds have very short legs and never settle voluntarily on the ground, perching instead only on vertical surfaces. Many swifts have long swept-back wings which resemble a crescent or boomerang. 
Hummingbirds are small birds capable of hovering in mid-air due to the rapid flapping of their wings. They are the only birds that can fly backwards. 
Rallidae is a large family of small to medium-sized birds which includes the rails, crakes, coots, and gallinules. Typically they inhabit dense vegetation in damp environments near lakes, swamps, or rivers. In general they are shy and secretive birds, making them difficult to observe. Most species have strong legs and long toes which are well adapted to soft uneven surfaces. They tend to have short, rounded wings and to be weak fliers. 
Cranes are large, long-legged, and long-necked birds. Unlike the similar-looking but unrelated herons, cranes fly with necks outstretched rather than retracted. 
Recurvirostridae is a family of large wading birds which includes the avocets and stilts. The avocets have long legs and long up-curved bills. The stilts have extremely long legs and long, thin, straight bills. 
The oystercatchers are large and noisy plover-like birds, with strong bills used for smashing or prising open molluscs. 
The family Charadriidae includes the plovers, dotterels, and lapwings. They are small to medium-sized birds with compact bodies, short thick necks, and long, usually pointed, wings. They are found in open country worldwide, mostly in habitats near water. 
The jacanas are a group of waders which are found throughout the tropics. They are identifiable by their huge feet and claws which enable them to walk on floating vegetation in the shallow lakes that are their preferred habitat. 
Scolopacidae is a large diverse family of small to medium-sized shorebirds including the sandpipers, curlews, godwits, shanks, tattlers, woodcocks, snipes, dowitchers, and phalaropes. The majority of these species eat small invertebrates picked out of the mud or soil. Variation in length of legs and bills enables multiple species to feed in the same habitat, particularly on the coast, without direct competition for food. 
The family Stercorariidae are, in general, medium to large birds, typically with gray or brown plumage, often with white markings on the wings. They nest on the ground in temperate and arctic regions and are long-distance migrants. 
Auks are superficially similar to penguins due to their black-and-white colors, their upright posture, and some of their habits. 
Tropicbirds are slender white birds of tropical oceans with exceptionally long central tail feathers. Their heads and long wings have black markings. 
Loons, known as divers in Europe, are a group of aquatic birds found in many parts of North America and northern Europe. It is the size of a large duck or small goose, which it somewhat resemble when swimming, but is completely unrelated to these waterfowl. 
The storm-petrels are the smallest seabirds, relatives of the petrels, feeding on planktonic crustaceans and small fish picked from the surface, typically while hovering. The flight is fluttering and sometimes bat-like. Until 2018, this family's species were included with the other storm-petrels in family Hydrobatidae. 
Though the members of this family are similar in many respects to the southern storm-petrels, including their general appearance and habits, there are enough genetic differences to warrant their placement in a separate family. 
The procellariids are the main group of medium-sized "true petrels", characterised by united nostrils with medium septum and a long outer functional primary. 
Storks are large, long-legged, long-necked, wading birds with long, stout bills. Storks are mute, but bill-clattering is an important mode of communication at the nest. Their nests can be large and may be reused for many years. Many species are migratory. 
Frigatebirds are large seabirds usually found over tropical oceans. They are large, black-and-white, or completely black, with long wings and deeply forked tails. The males have colored inflatable throat pouches. They do not swim or walk and cannot take off from a flat surface. Having the largest wingspan-to-body-weight ratio of any bird, they are essentially aerial, able to stay aloft for more than a week. 
The sulids comprise the gannets and boobies. Both groups are medium to large coastal seabirds that plunge-dive for fish. 
Phalacrocoracidae is a family of medium to large coastal, fish-eating seabirds that includes cormorants and shags. Plumage coloration varies, with the majority having mainly dark plumage, some species being black-and-white, and a few being colorful. 
Pelicans are large water birds with a distinctive pouch under their beak. As with other members of the order Pelecaniformes, they have webbed feet with four toes. 
The family Ardeidae contains the bitterns, herons, and egrets. Herons and egrets are medium to large wading birds with long necks and legs. Bitterns tend to be shorter necked and more wary. Members of Ardeidae fly with their necks retracted, unlike other long-necked birds such as storks, ibises, and spoonbills. 
Threskiornithidae is a family of large terrestrial and wading birds which includes the ibises and spoonbills. They have long, broad wings with 11 primary and about 20 secondary feathers. They are strong fliers and despite their size and weight, very capable soarers. 
The family Pandionidae contains only one species, the osprey. The osprey is a medium-large raptor which is a specialist fish-eater with a worldwide distribution. 
Accipitridae is a family of birds of prey which includes hawks, eagles, kites, harriers, and Old World vultures. These birds have powerful hooked beaks for tearing flesh from their prey, strong legs, powerful talons, and keen eyesight. 
Barn-owls are medium to large owls with large heads and characteristic heart-shaped faces. They have long strong legs with powerful talons. 
The typical owls are small to large solitary nocturnal birds of prey. They have large forward-facing eyes and ears, a hawk-like beak, and a conspicuous circle of feathers around each eye called a facial disk. 
The family Trogonidae includes trogons and quetzals. Found in tropical woodlands worldwide, they feed on insects and fruit, and their broad bills and weak legs reflect their diet and arboreal habits. Although their flight is fast, they are reluctant to fly any distance. Trogons have soft, often colorful, feathers with distinctive male and female plumage. 
Todies are a group of small near passerine forest species endemic to the Caribbean. These birds have colorful plumage and resemble small kingfishers, but have flattened bills with serrated edges. They eat small prey such as insects and lizards. 
Water kingfishers are medium-sized birds with large heads, long, pointed bills, short legs, and stubby tails. 
Woodpeckers are small to medium-sized birds with chisel-like beaks, short legs, stiff tails, and long tongues used for capturing insects. Some species have feet with two toes pointing forward and two backward, while several species have only three toes. Many woodpeckers have the habit of tapping noisily on tree trunks with their beaks. 
Falconidae is a family of diurnal birds of prey. They differ from hawks, eagles, and kites in that they kill with their beaks instead of their talons. 
Parrots are small to large birds with a characteristic curved beak. Their upper mandibles have slight mobility in the joint with the skull and they have a generally erect stance. All parrots are zygodactyl, having the four toes on each foot placed two at the front and two to the back. 
Tyrant flycatchers are passerine birds which occur throughout North and South America. They superficially resemble the Old World flycatchers, but are more robust and have stronger bills. They do not have the sophisticated vocal capabilities of the songbirds. Most, but not all, have plain coloring. As the name implies, most are insectivorous. 
The vireos are a group of small to medium-sized passerine birds. They are typically greenish in color and resemble New World warblers apart from their heavier bills. 
The family Corvidae includes crows, ravens, jays, choughs, magpies, treepies, nutcrackers, and ground jays. Corvids are above average in size among the Passeriformes, and some of the larger species show high levels of intelligence. 
The family Hirundinidae is adapted to aerial feeding. They have a slender streamlined body, long pointed wings, and a short bill with a wide gape. The feet are adapted to perching rather than walking, and the front toes are partially joined at the base. 
The kinglets, also called crests, are a small group of birds often included in the Old World warblers, but frequently given family status because they also resemble the titmice. 
The waxwings are a group of passerine birds with soft silky plumage and unique red tips to some of the wing feathers. In the Bohemian and cedar waxwings, these tips look like sealing wax and give the group its name. These are arboreal birds of northern forests. They live on insects in summer and berries in winter. 
These dainty birds resemble Old World warblers in their build and habits, moving restlessly through the foliage seeking insects. The gnatcatchers and gnatwrens are mainly soft bluish gray in color and have the typical insectivore's long sharp bill. They are birds of fairly open woodland or scrub, which nest in bushes or trees. 
The wrens are mainly small and inconspicuous except for their loud songs. These birds have short wings and thin down-turned bills. Several species often hold their tails upright. All are insectivorous. 
The mimids are a family of passerine birds that includes thrashers, mockingbirds, tremblers, and the New World catbirds. These birds are notable for their vocalizations, especially their ability to mimic a wide variety of birds and other sounds heard outdoors. Their coloring tends towards dull-grays and browns. 
Starlings are small to medium-sized passerine birds. Their flight is strong and direct and they are very gregarious. Their preferred habitat is fairly open country. They eat insects and fruit. Plumage is typically dark with a metallic sheen. 
The thrushes are a group of passerine birds that occur mainly in the Old World. They are plump, soft-plumaged, small to medium-sized insectivores or sometimes omnivores, often feeding on the ground. Many have attractive songs. 
Old World flycatchers are a large group of small passerine birds native to the Old World. They are mainly small arboreal insectivores. The appearance of these birds is highly varied, but they mostly have weak songs and harsh calls. 
Weavers are a group of small passerine birds related to the finches. These are seed-eating birds with rounded conical bills, most of which breed in sub-Saharan Africa, with fewer species in tropical Asia. Weavers get their name from the large woven nests many species make. They are gregarious birds which often breed colonially. 
The estrildid finches are small passerine birds of the Old World tropics and Australasia. They are gregarious and often colonial seed eaters with short thick but pointed bills. They are all similar in build and habits, but have wide variation in plumage colors and patterns. 
Sparrows are small passerine birds. In general, sparrows tend to be small, plump, brown or gray birds with short tails and short powerful beaks. Sparrows are seed eaters, but they also consume small insects. 
Motacillidae is a family of small passerine birds with medium to long tails. They include the wagtails, longclaws, and pipits. They are slender ground-feeding insectivores of open country. 
Finches are seed-eating passerine birds that are small to moderately large and have a strong beak, usually conical and in some species very large. All have twelve tail feathers and nine primaries. These birds have a bouncing flight with alternating bouts of flapping and gliding on closed wings, and most sing well. 
The Calcariidae are a group of passerine birds that had been traditionally grouped with the New World sparrows, but differ in a number of respects and are usually found in open grassy areas. 
Until 2017, these species were considered part of the family Emberizidae. Most of the species are known as sparrows, but these birds are not closely related to the Old World sparrows which are in the family Passeridae. Many of these have distinctive head patterns. 
The members of this small family are native to the Greater Antilles. They were formerly classified as tanagers (family Thraupidae) but were placed in their own family in 2017. 
These two species were formerly placed in the New World warblers (Parulidae) but were moved to their own family in 2017. 
This species was historically placed in the New World warblers, but nonetheless most authorities were unsure if it belonged there. It was moved to its own family in 2017. 
The icterids are a group of small to medium-sized, often colorful, passerine birds restricted to the New World and include the grackles, New World blackbirds, and New World orioles. Most species have black as the predominant plumage color, often enlivened by yellow, orange, or red. 
The New World warblers are a group of small, often colorful, passerine birds restricted to the New World. Most are arboreal, but some are terrestrial. Most members of this family are insectivores. 
The cardinals are a family of robust, seed-eating birds with strong bills. They are typically associated with open woodland. The sexes usually have distinct plumages. 
The tanagers are a large group of small to medium-sized passerine birds restricted to the New World, mainly in the tropics. Many species are brightly colored. As a family they are omnivorous, but individual species specialize in eating fruits, seeds, insects, or other types of food. Most have short, rounded wings. 
Apostates is a monotypic moth genus in the family Geometridae described by Warren in 1897. Its only species, Apostates solitaria, was first described by Hugo Theodor Christoph in 1887. It was found in Transcaspia, then an oblast of the Russian Empire. 
The inhabitants of the commune are known as Ambliais or Ambliaises, alternatively Ambligeois or Ambligeoises  
It can be accessed by the D22 road from Caen which passes through the south of the commune and continues to Creully. Access to the village is by the D35 road from Reviers in the north-east passing through the village and continuing south-west to Saint-Gabriel-Brecy. Apart from the village there are also the hamlets of Le Bout de Haut and Les Planches. Apart from a patch of forest in the west and small patches of forest at scattered points, the commune is entirely farmland. 
The Seulles river forms the northern border of the commune flowing east then north to join the sea at Courseulles-sur-Mer. The Thue river flows from the south through the village to join the Seulles. The commune's floodplain (meadows and marshes), its light hillsides, and its agricultural plain provide it with rich agricultural production. 
On 29 June 1944 the Canadian Red Ensign flew over the headquarters of the First Canadian Army near Amblie. For the first time in history the Canadian Armed Forces were fighting under their own colours. 
The following table is a complete list of provinces changing hands as a result of the election based on the notional results of the 2002 and 2007 elections, notwithstanding the results of 2003 by-election in Siirt. 
This biographical article related to association football in Belgium, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Turkish association football goalkeeper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Model 1940 Light Rifle was a military semi-automatic carbine designed for Great Britain in preparation for World War II.  The design was not considered suitable for full-scale production.  Most trials rifles sent to Great Britain were destroyed at the end of World War II. 
Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against, Pts = Points. 
Emmanuel Yisa Orker-Jev is a Nigerian politician and a member of the Peoples Democratic Party (PDP). He defeated George Akume in the 2019 general elections for the Benue North-West Senatorial District by polling 157,726 votes to the Akume's 115,422. The total valid votes cast was 287,028 votes. 
Orker-Jev hails from Benue State and attended NKST Primary School from 1970 to 1976 and proceeded to Bristow Secondary School to obtain his West African Senior Certificate (WASC). He proceeded to the University of Jos 1985 to Study Law, he graduated in 1988 before he proceeded to the Nigerian Law School and was called to the Nigerian bar in 1989. 
Throughout the series, the O'Brian family also faces conflict from other sources, such as mortals attempting to unmask them and feuds with other vampire families. 
Junior's Grill was a restaurant in Atlanta, Georgia, in the United States. It was located on the Georgia Tech campus in the Bradley Building near Tech Tower. It was a family business owned by Tommy Klemis. The restaurant served breakfast, lunch and dinner Monday through Thursday (breakfast and lunch only on Friday), and was famous among students for its French toast and battered chicken fingers. It closed on April 21, 2011, due to declining business. 
The wing fought in combat as the 12th Tactical Fighter Wing during the Vietnam War and was the host unit at two major air bases in South Vietnam. Its McDonnell Douglas F-4 Phantom II aircraft flew thousands of combat missions between 1965 and 1971 before being withdrawn as part of the U.S. withdrawal from Vietnam and Southeast Asia. 
The current commander of the 12th Flying Training Wing is Colonel Scott Rowe. The current Command Chief Master Sergeant is Chief Master Sergeant Joseph A. Stuart. 
The wing consists of three flying groups and a maintenance directorate spanning more than 1,600 miles from JBSA-Randolph, Texas to Naval Air Station Pensacola, Florida, to Pueblo Memorial Airport and the U.S. Air Force Academy in Colorado.[citation needed] 
The 12th Operations Group controls all Instructor Pilot Training and airfield operations at Randolph AFB and Randolph AFB Auxiliary Field/Seguin Field. 
The 479th Flying Training Group is a geographically separated unit located at Naval Air Station Pensacola, Florida and conducts Undergraduate Combat Systems Officer Training. 
The 306th Flying Training Group is a geographically separated unit located at the United States Air Force Academy, Colorado.  The 306 FTG conducts powered flight training, soaring, and parachute training for Air Force Academy cadets. 
The wing was first organized at Turner Air Force Base, Georgia on 1 November 1950 as the 12th Fighter-Escort Wing, but moved a month later to Bergstrom Air Force Base, Texas. 
The wing was reactivated as the 12th Tactical Fighter Wing and organized in April 1962 at MacDill Air Force Base, Florida. 
The wing was redesignated the 12th Flying Training Wing and activated on 1 May 1972, when the personnel, mission and equipment of the 3510th Flying Training Wing were assumed by the wing, while the 3510th was simultaneously inactivated 
In the second decade of the 21st century, the wing's mission is to provide instructor pilot training in the Raytheon-Beech T-6A Texan II, the Northrop T-38 Talon and the Beech T-1A Jayhawk jet trainers.[citation needed] Previously, the wing also conducted Introduction to Fighter Fundamentals (IFF) in the Northrop AT-38 Talon, a role now performed with T-38s.[citation needed] 
The wing is responsible for numerous aviation training programs. These programs include Pilot Instructor Training, Combat Systems Officer Training, Remotely Piloted Aircraft Pilot Indoctrination, Basic Sensor Operator Qualification, Airmanship programs for U.S. Air Force Academy cadets, and Introductory Flight Screening. 
EDGE (Techno management fest of Techno India, main campus, Saltlake) the largest techno management event of the city and 2nd in eastern India with a cash prize money of 11 lakhs 
A long-time member of the Italian Socialist Party (PSI) and close aide of Bettino Craxi, he was spokesman of the PSI and representative of the party in the Socialist International. He founded the Socialist Party (PS) in 1996 and joined the Italian Democratic Socialists (SDI) in 1998. 
He led the electoral list of PSI in the region Liguria after Pertini and therefore was elected three times in the Chambre of deputies from 1983 to 1994. In 2001 (until 2006) he was elected again in a uninominal constituency of Genova Est. He served two times in the Government: from 2000 to 2001 as undersecretary to the Foreign Affairs  and from 2006 to 2008 as Deputy Minister. 
The school initiated new areas of research into Biblical history and textual analysis. Its influence is also discernable in the Christ myth theory. 
This article relating to a myth or legend from the ancient Middle East is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2016 Hell in a Cell was the eighth annual Hell in a Cell professional wrestling event produced by WWE. It was held exclusively for wrestlers from the promotion's Raw brand division. The event aired on pay-per-view (PPV) and the WWE Network and took place on October 30, 2016, at the TD Garden in Boston, Massachusetts. 
The card included eight matches, including one on the Kickoff pre-show, that resulted from scripted storylines, where wrestlers portrayed heroes, villains, or less distinguishable characters in scripted events that built tension and culminated in a wrestling match or series of matches, with results predetermined by WWE's writers on the Raw brand. Storylines were produced on WWE's weekly television show Monday Night Raw. 
At Clash of Champions, Roman Reigns won the United States Championship from Rusev. The following night on Raw, the rematch between the two ended in a double countout. On the October 3 episode of Raw, Rusev's wife, Lana, demanded a rematch, after which Rusev attacked Reigns and tried to leave with the title belt, but Reigns attacked him with a Superman Punch and declared he would fight Rusev in a Hell in a Cell match, a request that was later approved by management. 
Dana Brooke defeated Bayley on the October 17 episode of Raw and attacked her the following week during an arm wrestling contest. On October 26, a match between the two was scheduled for Hell in a Cell. 
At Clash of Champions, T.J. Perkins defeated Brian Kendrick to retain the WWE Cruiserweight Championship. Kendrick attacked Perkins after the match. The following night on Raw, Kendrick challenged Perkins to another match. The following week, Kendrick defeated Perkins by submission. On the October 10 episode of Raw, a match between the two was scheduled for Hell in a Cell. 
At Clash of Champions, the final match of the best-of-seven series for a title opportunity between Cesaro and Sheamus ended in a no contest. The following night on Raw, Foley wouldn't allow further matches between the two and decided to put Cesaro and Sheamus as a team against Raw Tag Team Champions The New Day. The following weeks, the two continued to argue with each other. On the October 10 episode of Raw, a title match between the two teams was scheduled for Hell in a Cell. 
On the October 10 episode of Raw, Luke Gallows and Karl Anderson attacked Enzo Amore and Big Cass. The following week on Raw, Big Cass defeated Karl Anderson. On October 24, a match between the two teams was scheduled for Hell in a Cell. 
On October 26, a match pitting Cedric Alexander, Lince Dorado, and Sin Cara against Tony Nese, Drew Gulak, and Ariya Daivari was scheduled for the Hell in a Cell Kickoff pre-show. 
During the Hell in a Cell Kickoff pre-show, cruiserweights Cedric Alexander, Lince Dorado, and Sin Cara faced Tony Nese, Drew Gulak, and Ariya Daivari. Alexander won the match for his team by pinning Gulak after executing the "Lumbar Check". 
Next, Bayley fought Dana Brooke. In the end, Bayley performed a "Bayley-to-Belly" Suplex on Brooke to win the match. 
After that, Enzo Amore and Big Cass wrestled Luke Gallows and Karl Anderson. Gallows and Anderson executed the "Magic Killer" on Enzo to win the match. 
Next, TJ Perkins defended the WWE Cruiserweight Championship against The Brian Kendrick. The match ended when Kendrick feigned a knee injury. A concerned Perkins checked on Kendrick, who attacked Perkins with a headbutt and applied the "Captain's Hook". Perkins submitted, meaning Kendrick won the title. 
While the 2016 Hell in a Cell event was held exclusively for Raw, the 2017 event was SmackDown-exclusive. 
Ryno Township is one of thirty-one townships in Custer County, Nebraska, United States. The population was 95 at the 2000 census. A 2006 estimate placed the township's population at 92. 
This Custer County, Nebraska state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The star's apparent magnitude, or how bright it appears from Earth's perspective, is 18.8. Therefore, it is too dim to be seen with the naked eye (the limit for that is 5.5). 
Models, and so scientists, divide on if their convergent solutions from the data for TRAPPIST-1d indicates Earth-like habitability or a severe greenhouse effect. 
In some respects, this exoplanet is one of the most Earth-like found. Much smaller than Earth which may impair on its magnetosphere, it superficially receives just more than our planet's radiation. It does not have a hydrogen or helium-based atmosphere, which makes largest planets uninhabitable. The planet may also have liquid and atmospheric water, up to many times more than Earth. Likely tidally locked, a dense atmosphere could be enough to transfer heat to the much colder dark side. 
The original claim and presumed size of the planet was revised when the full seven-planet system was revealed in 2017: 
North Judson-San Pierre High School's athletic teams are the Blue Jays and they compete in the Hoosier North Athletic Conference. The school offers a wide range of athletics including: 
The Institute of Management and Technology, Enugu, popularly known as IMT Enugu, is a polytechnic college located in Enugu State, Nigeria. 
This article on a Nigerian institution of higher education is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Towards the edge of the parish near Horton in Ivinghoe is the hamlet of Horton Wharf. The village of Grove is also within the boundary of Slapton parish. 
The village name is Anglo Saxon in origin, and means "farm by a slippery place". It is a common place name. This village was recorded in the Domesday Book of 1086 as Slapetone. 
The manor of Slapton once belonged to a convent in Barking, Essex, though it was seized by the Crown in the Dissolution of the Monasteries in 1547. The manor was for some time after that the property of the Earl of Bridgwater. 
The village hall was built and given to the village by the Griffin family of Bury Farm in memory of Elizabeth Griffin in the 1950s. Until recently, the Griffin family continued to own Bury Farm, and had the unusual distinction of farming buffalo in the village. Slapton once had a splendid 18th century rectory of classical design. This was demolished in the 1960s and a development of four-bedroom terraced and semi-detached houses in the style of that era was built on its site. 
Today Slapton contains few old buildings of any architectural merit. The church, dedicated to the Holy Cross, is of plain design with tower, nave and chancel. The chancel is probably the oldest part of the building. The churchyard contains many memorials to the Turney and Buckmaster families. 
The Great Train Robbery took place at Bridego Railway Bridge (No. 127) on 8 August 1963, which is situated one mile (as the crow flies) from Slapton, heading towards Ledburn. 
Harold T. Dennis (born 1903) was a professional footballer who played as a defender for Newark Town, Grantham Town, Huddersfield Town and Southend United. He was born in Romsey, Hampshire. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a defender born in the 1900s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Construction of the church begun in late 1832. In February 1833 construction was stopped, but it was resumed next month. It was projected by architect Valentin Presani in Classicist style. In 1836, the church was dedicated. Dormitory was constructed next to the church. 
In 1947, the church burnt down after a lighting struck it and ignited hay which was stored inside by the Partisans. At the same time, dormitory was turned into elementary school. 
Artem Znachkov (born January 19, 1979) is a former pair skater who competed with Maria Krasiltseva for Armenia. They teamed up in 1998 and represented Armenia at the 2002 Winter Olympics, where they placed 20th. 
This Armenian biographical article relating to sports is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The ME postcode area, also known as the Rochester postcode area, is a group of twenty postcode districts in South East England, within eleven post towns. These cover north central Kent, including the Medway unitary authority and the borough of Swale, plus parts of the boroughs of Maidstone, Tonbridge and Malling, and Gravesham. The letters in the postcode are derived from the name of the Medway conurbation. 
A Help key, found in the shape of a dedicated key explicitly labeled Help, or as another key, typically one of the function keys, on a computer keyboard, is a key which, when pressed, produces information on the screen/display to aid the user in their current task, such as using a specific function in an application program. 
In the case of a non-dedicated Help key, the location of the key will sometimes vary between different software packages. Most common in computer history, however, is the development of a de facto Help key location for each brand/family of computer, exemplified by the use of F1 on IBM compatible PCs. 
The standard help key on the Apple IIe and Apple III series computers is either OPEN-APPLE-? or SOLID-APPLE-? ... The standard help key on the Apple II and Apple II+, where practical, is a question mark or slash, or else ESCAPE ? or ESCAPE /.
On a full-sized Apple keyboard, the help key was labelled simply as Help, located to the left of the Home. Where IBM compatible PC keyboards had the Insert, Apple keyboards had the help key instead. As of 2007, new Apple keyboards do not have a help key. In its place, a full-sized Apple keyboard has a Fn instead. Instead of a mechanical help key, the menu bar for most applications contain a Help menu as a matter of convention. 
The keyboards of the Atari 16- and 32-bit computers had a Help key above the arrow keys on the keyboard. Atari 8-bit XL and XE series keyboards had dedicated Help keys, but in the group of differently-styled system keys separated from the rest of the keyboard. 
Most of the Sun Microsystems keyboards have a dedicate "Help" key in the left top corner (left from the "Esc" key above block of 10 (Stop,Again,Props,Undo,Front,Copy,Open,Paste,Find,Cut) extra keys. 
Holden's early architectural training was in Bolton and Manchester where he worked for architects Everard W. Leeson and Jonathan Simpson before moving to London. After a short period with Arts and Crafts designer Charles Robert Ashbee, he went to work for Henry Percy Adams in 1899. He became Adams' partner in the firm in 1907 and remained with it for the rest of his career. 
Holden designed two memorials for the missing dead of the First World War as part of his work for the Imperial War Graves Commission between 1920 and 1928. Both are memorials to the missing from the New Zealand Expeditionary Force. They are located in Belgium and are within cemeteries also constructed to his design. 
This article about a Norwegian politician born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to Italian artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1918 he was appointed director of the Landeskundliche Kommission in Romania. In 1922 he was named an associate professor of cartography at the University of Berlin, and afterwards was a professor of geography at Frankfurt University (from 1923) and at the Free University of Berlin (from 1948). In 1954 he attained "professor emeritus" status. 
Terrell Joseph-Nathaniel Burgess is an American football free safety for the Los Angeles Rams of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Utah and was drafted by the Rams in the third round of the 2020 NFL Draft. 
Burgess attended San Marcos High School in San Marcos, California. He played defensive back and wide receiver in high school. He committed to the University of Utah to play college football. 
Burgess played at Utah from 2016 to 2019. After spending his first three seasons as mostly a backup, he was a full-time starter his senior year in 2019. During his career, he had 116 tackles and one interception. 
Burgess was drafted by the Los Angeles Rams with the 104th overall pick in the third round of the 2020 NFL Draft. He suffered a broken ankle in Week 7 and was placed on injured reserve on October 27, 2020. 
This biographical article relating to an American football defensive back born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Spectroscopy, primarily in the electromagnetic spectrum, is a fundamental exploratory tool in the fields of physics, chemistry, and astronomy, allowing the composition, physical structure and electronic structure of matter to be investigated at the atomic, molecular and macro scale, and over astronomical distances. Important applications arise from biomedical spectroscopy in the areas of tissue analysis and medical imaging. 
The broadening of the field of spectroscopy is due to the fact that any part of the electromagnetic spectrum may be used to analyze a sample from the infrared to the ultraviolet telling scientists different properties about the very same sample. For instance in chemical analysis, the most common types of spectroscopy include atomic spectroscopy, infrared spectroscopy, ultraviolet and visible spectroscopy, Raman spectroscopy and nuclear magnetic resonance. 
Spectroscopy is a sufficiently broad field that many sub-disciplines exist, each with numerous implementations of specific spectroscopic techniques. The various implementations and techniques can be classified in several ways. 
The types of spectroscopy are distinguished by the type of radiative energy involved in the interaction. In many applications, the spectrum is determined by measuring changes in the intensity or frequency of this energy. The types of radiative energy studied include: 
The types of spectroscopy also can be distinguished by the nature of the interaction between the energy and the material. These interactions include: 
Spectroscopic studies are designed so that the radiant energy interacts with specific types of matter. 
Atomic spectroscopy was the first application of spectroscopy developed. Atomic absorption spectroscopy and atomic emission spectroscopy involve visible and ultraviolet light. These absorptions and emissions, often referred to as atomic spectral lines, are due to electronic transitions of outer shell electrons as they rise and fall from one electron orbit to another. Atoms also have distinct x-ray spectra that are attributable to the excitation of inner shell electrons to excited states. 
Modern implementations of atomic spectroscopy for studying visible and ultraviolet transitions include flame emission spectroscopy, inductively coupled plasma atomic emission spectroscopy, glow discharge spectroscopy, microwave induced plasma spectroscopy, and spark or arc emission spectroscopy. Techniques for studying x-ray spectra include X-ray spectroscopy and X-ray fluorescence. 
Studies in molecular spectroscopy led to the development of the first maser and contributed to the subsequent development of the laser. 
Nuclei also have distinct energy states that are widely separated and lead to gamma ray spectra. Distinct nuclear spin states can have their energy separated by a magnetic field, and this allows for nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy. 
There are several applications of spectroscopy in the fields of medicine, physics, chemistry, and astronomy.  Taking advantage of the properties of absorbance and with astronomy emission[disambiguation needed], spectroscopy can be used to identify certain states of nature.  The uses of spectroscopy in so many different fields and for so many different applications has caused specialty scientific subfields. Such examples include: 
Sinomicrurus macclellandi, commonly known as MacClelland's coral snake, is a species of venomous snake in the family Elapidae. The species is endemic to southern and eastern Asia. 
The specific name, macclellandi, is in honor of John McClelland, a physician and naturalist, who worked for the East India Company. 
S. macclellandi is found in East and Northeast India (Darjeeling, Assam, Sikkim, Arunachal Pradesh), Bangladesh, Bhutan, Nepal, Northern Myanmar, Thailand, Vietnam, Central and Southern China (including Hong Kong, Hainan, north to Gansu and Shaanxi), Taiwan, and Japan (Ryukyu Islands). 
S. m. iwasakii is found on Ishigaki Island and other Ryukyu Islands in Japan. S. m. swinhoei is found in Taiwan. S. m. univirgatus is found in Nepal, and Sikkim. 
S. macclellandi is mainly nocturnal and terrestrial. It occurs in forest litter, hillside, and lowland. It is often found hiding under leaves. Although this is a venomous species, it is quite docile and not likely to strike actively. 
Like other elapids, S. macclellandi possesses a potent neurotoxic venom, which is capable of killing a person. Bite symptoms include numbness of lips and difficulty of speech and breathing, followed by blurred vision. Severe bite victims may die of instant heart failure, although there have been only a few human deaths recorded in Thailand. 
A press conference was held at Cafe Melba in the new Mediacorp campus on 26 July 2016. Chen Hanwei, Pierre Png, Aloysius Pang, Carrie Wong, Paige Chua, Cynthia Koh and Jin Yinji attended the conference. 
This is a list of places on the Victorian Heritage Register in the Shire of Colac Otway in Victoria, Australia. The Victorian Heritage Register is maintained by the Heritage Council of Victoria. 
The Victorian Heritage Register, as of 2020, lists the following 11 state-registered places within the Shire of Colac Otway: 
The Pines was a house in Anniston, Alabama.  It was designed by architect Walter T. Downing and built in 1896.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1991.  The listing included one contributing building and one contributing structure. The house was demolished in April 2014. 
This article about a property in Alabama on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Best of Cold Chillin': Masta Ace is a compilation album released by Cold Chillin' Records, featuring songs released during Masta Ace's tenure at the label. The compilation features eleven of the fifteen songs originally released on Ace's debut Take a Look Around, as well as one single, one B-Side single, one remix and the original version of "Letter to the Better". 
The Withers-Maguire House is a small event venue and historic house museum in Ocoee, Florida. It is located at 16 East Oakland Avenue and is owned by the City of Ocoee. It was added to the U.S. National Register of Historic Places on April 2, 1987. 
This article about a property in Orange County, Florida on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Blumenau founded schools and hospitals in his growing city, and by 1880 its population totaled approximately 15,000 people, most of whom were Germans. This population has managed to preserve its German heritage and, even today, German schools still prevail.[citation needed] 
In 1884, Blumenau returned to Braunschweig, Germany with his wife (whom he had married in 1867) and their three sons. He died on October 30, 1899 in Braunschweig. 
Known to travel in swarms numbering in the trillions in some years, it is believed that the grasshoppers found in the glacier may have been caught in severe storms and perished. Until the late 20th century, the grasshopper remains were quite common; however, lower snowfall rates since the late 1980s and higher temperatures have contributed to a higher melting rate of the glacier and many specimens decompose before they can be retrieved. 
The men's 73 kilograms (Lightweight) competition at the 2002 Asian Games in Busan was held on 2 October at the Gudeok Gymnasium. 
The first settlers came to the area from nearby Johnsburg in 1847. A Catholic parish was soon formed in the area, and mass was first held in a log cabin church in 1860. The present-day stone St. Joseph's Church was built in 1870. A creamery used to be in the area. 
This article about a location in Fond du Lac County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In mathematics, Kingman's subadditive ergodic theorem is one of several ergodic theorems. It can be seen as a generalization of Birkhoff's ergodic theorem. Intuitively, the subadditive ergodic theorem is a kind of random variable version of Fekete's lemma (hence the name ergodic). As a result, it can be rephrased in the language of probability, e.g. using a sequence of random variables and expected values.  The theorem is named after John Kingman. 
Kingman's subadditive ergodic theorem can be used to prove statements about Lyapunov exponents. It also has applications to percolations and probability/random variables. 
The Blackburn Type D, sometimes known as the Single Seat Monoplane, was built by Robert Blackburn at Leeds in 1912. It is a single-engine mid-wing monoplane. Restored shortly after the Second World War, it remains part of the Shuttleworth Collection and is the oldest British flying aeroplane. 
The design inherited some features from the earlier Mercury: it too had thin wings of constant chord with square tips of about the same span as the later Mercuries and used wing warping rather than ailerons. The wing was wire braced from above via a kingpost and below via the undercarriage, and was built up around machined I-section ash spars. The Type D also had the triangular cross-section fuselage seen on several of Blackburn's aircraft from the Second Monoplane onward. 
The aircraft first flew late in 1912. Some modifications followed in time: the engine cowling was extended into a semicircular shape to discourage the discharge of smoke and hot oil from the rotary into the cockpit; the wingtips were slightly rounded, and the crook-shaped skids were replaced by skids of hockey stick form. 
Later in 1913 Foggin sold the aircraft to Montague Francis Glew. Glew qualified RAeC #410 at the Blackburn school on a "Blackburn monoplane", apparently an earlier model. Glew gave flying demonstrations at towns in the English countryside, with several crashes, and on at least one occasion was involved in air racing (from Cardiff to Ilfracombe, cancelled due to weather). Glew crashed his aircraft in 1914, beyond his ability to repair as World War I began. 
The Frank Golden Block, at Brougher and Main Sts. in Tonopah, Nevada is a historic building that was built in 1902.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1982. 
This article about a property in Nevada on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
From Brush & Stone is a studio album by guitarist Gordon Giltrap and keyboardist Rick Wakeman. The album is the first opportunity to record together for Gordon Giltrap and Rick Wakeman. Both are long time friends who have been on separate musical paths for forty years until this release in 2010 on Voiceprint in the UK. 
Secourt (German: Unterhofen) is a commune in the Moselle department in Grand Est in north-eastern France. 
The B-sides are covers of Woody Guthrie's "Deportee Song" and the Rolling Stones' "Wild Horses", performed live. 
A fleet of six new 305 series six-car electric multiple unit (EMU) commuter trains was introduced on the Chikuhi Line from February 2015. 
At the time of the Council of Basle, James promoted the reunion of the moderate Hussites with the Catholic Church, and later that of the Eastern Orthodox at the Council of Ferrara-Florence. Against the Ottomans, he preached several crusades, and at the death of St. John Capistran, in 1456, James was sent to Hungary as his successor. In 1457 he was sent to Danish king Christian I to discuss the Turkish crusade and also the Bohemian issue. 
He instituted several montes pietatis (literally, "mountains of piety": nonprofit credit organizations that lent money at very low rates on pawned objects), and preached in all the greater cities. He was offered the bishopric of Milan in 1460, which he declined. 
St. James belonged to the Observant branch of the Friars Minor, then rapidly spreading and stirring up much controversy. In this task, he encouraged reforms in the Order of Friars Minor. How much he suffered on this account is shown in a letter written by him to St. John Capistran. King Tvrtko II was a major opponent of James's reforms in Bosnia, and was probably strongly influenced in that regard by Queen Dorothy. 
His writings have not yet been collected. His library and autographs are preserved in part at the Municipio of Monteprandone (see Crivellucci, "I codici della libreria raccolta da S. Giacomo della Marca nel convento di S. Maria delle Grazie presso Monteprandone", Leghorn, 1889). 
On his notebook, or "Itinerarium", See Luigi Tasso, O.F.M., in "Miscellanea Francescana", I (1886), 125-26: "Regula confitendi peccata" was several times edited in Latin and Italian during the fifteenth century. "De Sanguine Christi effuse" and some other treatises remained in manuscript. 
The electoral district of Melbourne is an electorate of the Victorian Legislative Assembly. It currently includes the localities of Carlton, North Carlton, Melbourne, East Melbourne, West Melbourne, North Melbourne, Parkville, Newmarket, Kensington and Flemington, and includes Melbourne University. The district has been in existence since 1856 (it was abolished in 1859 and reestablished in 1889). 
 Melbourne was one of the inaugural districts of the first Assembly in 1856. Its area was defined by the 1855 Act as: 
Melbourne was abolished in 1859, its area was split into the new electoral districts of East Melbourne and West Melbourne, each having two members. 
Melbourne was re-created as a single-member electorate by the Electoral Act Amendment Act 1888 which took effect at the 1889 elections. 
^#  O'Shanassy won both Melbourne and Kilmore districts, he decided to represent the latter resulting in a by-election for Melbourne. 
Judith and the Head of Holofernes (also known as Judith I, German: Judith und Holofernes)  is an oil painting by Gustav Klimt, painted in 1901. It depicts the biblical figure Judith holding the head of Holofernes after beheading him. The beheading and its aftermath have been commonly portrayed in art since the Renaissance, and Klimt himself would paint a second work depicting the subject in 1909.  
The cranial pia mater covers the surface of the brain.  This layer goes in between the cerebral gyri and cerebellar laminae, folding inward to create the tela chorioidea of the third ventricle and the choroid plexuses of the lateral and third ventricles.  At the level of the cerebellum, the pia mater membrane is more fragile due to the length of blood vessels as well as decreased connection to the cerebral cortex. 
In conjunction with the other meningeal membranes, pia mater functions to cover and protect the central nervous system (CNS), to protect the blood vessels and enclose the venous sinuses near the CNS, to contain the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) and to form partitions with the skull.  The CSF, pia mater, and other layers of the meninges work together as a protection device for the brain, with the CSF often referred to as the fourth layer of the meninges. 
The pia mater also functions to deal with the deformation of the spinal cord under compression.  Due to the high elastic modulus of the pia mater, it is able to provide a constraint on the surface of the spinal cord. This constraint stops the elongation of the spinal cord, as well as providing a high strain energy.  This high strain energy is useful and responsible for the restoration of the spinal cord to its original shape following a period of decompression. 
Ventral root afferents are unmyelinated sensory axons located within the pia mater.  These ventral root afferents relay sensory information from the pia mater and allow for the transmission of pain from disc herniation and other spinal injury. 
Brain with arachnoid mater, and an area where it is removed, showing cerebral gyri covered by the translucent pia mater. 
Diagrammatic representation of a section across the top of the skull, showing the membranes of the brain, etc. 
In January 1979, nearly 3,000 farmers drove their tractors to Washington, D.C., many of them from thousands of miles away. The Jimmy Carter administration agreed that the Farmers Home Administration would stop all foreclosures. Soon after the rally was over, the Home Administration resumed foreclosures of farms with past due loans.  
On February 5, 1979, farmers arrived in Washington, D.C.; 17 tractors had been impounded.  Police confined the tractors to the National Mall.   They blocked traffic, creating significant tie-ups.  A blizzard hit while they were in town, and then the tractors became useful as they were the only vehicles that could reliably travel through the snow, often delivering doctors and nurses to hospitals. 
Concern that traffic would be hopelessly tangled led DC area commuters to head to transit in record numbers. An estimated 277,000 trips were taken on February 5, breaking the single-day record set in early January and topping 250,000 trips for the first time ever. The record would last until the summer when the oil crisis caused an uptick in metro use. 
Conger finished his four-year career at St. Bonaventure with 1,206 career points (26th all-time), 645 rebounds, 249 assists and 83 steals. He became just the third player all-time with 1,000 points, 500 rebounds and 200 assists. Over his four-year career, he posted 12 double-doubles, including four each in the last three seasons. He had 58 career double-figure point games and nine contests with at least 20 points or more. 
After going undrafted in the 2013 NBA draft, Conger moved to the Dominican Republic for a seven-game stint with Indios de San Francisco. 
On August 12, 2014, Conger signed with Paffoni Omegna for another stint in the Serie A2 Basket. In 30 games for Omegna, he averaged 13.6 points, 6.3 rebounds and 1.3 assists per game. 
On August 19, 2015, Conger signed with Aries Trikala of the Greek Basket League. He left Trikala in early February 2016, and joined Israeli team Hapoel Tel Aviv. In 17 games for Trikala, he averaged 16.3 points, 6.4 rebounds, 1.5 assists and 1.5 steals per game. In 18 games for Tel Aviv, he averaged 7.8 points, 4.4 rebounds and 1.6 assists per game. 
In July 2018, Conger played for the Boston Celtics in the 2018 Las Vegas Summer League. On August 6, 2018, he signed with French team Le Mans Sarthe Basket. On November 13, 2018, after beginning the season in France, Conger signed with the Adelaide 36ers, returning to the Australian NBL for a second stint. In 19 games played for the 36ers, he averaged 11.7 points, 4.8 rebounds and 2.3 assists per game. 
On February 22, 2019, Conger joined Hapoel Jerusalem as an injury cover for Chris Johnson, signing a one-month temporary contract with an option to extend it for the rest of the season. On April 6, 2019, Conger parted ways with Jerusalem after appearing in eight games. 
On August 14, 2019, Conger signed a two-year deal with Spanish club Coosur Real Betis. On May 15, 2020, Real Betis parted ways with Conger. He signed with ratiopharm Ulm of the German Basketball Bundesliga on November 24, 2020. 
Two cultivars, 'Long' and 'Nadler' were patented. 'Nadler' was patented and trademarked in 2007. The mother tree of both cultivars is a Quercus robur f. fastigiata (upright English oak, a narrow form) growing in Columbia, Missouri. The ortet of 'Nadler' is growing in Jacksonville, Illinois. Approximately 1000 seeds were collected from the mother plant in 1974 and propagated, with two selected for further development as cultivars, which are now propagated clonally. 
Yale is an old style serif typeface designed by Matthew Carter and first released in 2004. It was commissioned by Yale University for use in all of its signage, promotional and internal material. 
In 2010, Yale was named one of the "Ten Typefaces of the Decade" by Print magazine. It is influenced by Bembo, a popular book typeface by Monotype, and is also similar to Carter's previous ITC Galliard. 
The late 15th century De Aetna typeface, cut by Francesco Griffo for Aldus Manutius, served as a basis for Yale, with elements of one of Carter's earlier typefaces, Galliard. Some of Yale's unique characteristics are its curved leg of the "h", its flat-topped "A", its open apertures of the "c" and "e", and the bent tops of its lowercase ascenders. 
Although originally developed for use in signage, several variants have been added to the Yale family for use in print and on the web: 
Brooker is a town in Bradford County, Florida, United States. The population was 338 at the 2010 census. 
A post office was established under the name Vandy, and the post office was renamed Brooker in 1894. The town was named for Ed Brooker, an early settler. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 352 people, 123 households, and 93 families residing in the town.  The population density was 670.7 people per square mile (261.4/km2).  There were 136 housing units at an average density of 259.1 per square mile (101.0/km2).  The racial makeup of the town was 97.44% White, 0.57% African American, 1.14% from other races, and 0.85% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 3.12% of the population. 
There were 123 households, out of which 36.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 60.2% were married couples living together, 13.8% had a female householder with no husband present, and 23.6% were non-families. 22.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 8.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.69 and the average family size was 3.16. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 26.1% under the age of 18, 8.8% from 18 to 24, 24.1% from 25 to 44, 25.0% from 45 to 64, and 15.9% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 38 years. For every 100 females, there were 86.2 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 88.4 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $40,000, and the median income for a family was $40,938. Males had a median income of $29,000 versus $22,000 for females. The per capita income for the town was $15,091.  About 8.8% of families and 14.0% of the population were below the poverty line, including 2.6% of those under age 18 and 22.0% of those age 65 or over. 
Path 15, along with the Pacific DC Intertie running far to the east, forms an important transmission interconnection with the hydroelectric plants to the north and the fossil fuel plants to the south. Most of the three AC 500 kV lines were built by Pacific Gas and Electric (PG&E) south of Tesla substation. 
Path 15 consists of three lines at 500 kV and four lines at 230 kV.  The 500 kV lines connect Los Banos to Gates and Los Banos to Midway.  All four 230 kV lines have Gates at one end with the other ends at Panoche, Gregg, and McCall. 
From Tesla substation to Midway substation, a set of 230 kV lines follows the main 500 kV lines. The dual-circuit 230 kV power lines run to the east of the 500 kV lines. Most of these lines were built by PG&E. 
Path 15 can transmit 2,000-3,265 MW of electrical power from north to south. The capacity for south to north power transmission is 4,800-5,400 MW. 
In the section south of Tracy, the eastern two lines form an infrastructure corridor along with an aqueduct and Interstate 5 and provide some artificial scenery to look at, especially when they do not run in the hills west of Interstate 5. The eastern parallel PG&E lines cross Interstate 5 twice. 
Thinner towers north of Table Mountain crossing SR 36, cutting through the woodlands of the Sierra foothills. They resemble the southern towers to the left, but look closely to see the differences. 
 Merge is a software system which allows a user to run DOS/Windows 3.1 on SCO UNIX, in an 8086 virtual machine. 
In the late 1980s, the main commercial competitor of Merge was VP/IX developed by Interactive Systems Corporation and Phoenix Technologies. AT&T's Simultask 2.0 was based on VP/IX. 
Locus eventually joined the Microsoft WISE program which gave them access to Microsoft Windows source code, which allowed later versions of Merge to run Windows shrink wrapped applications without a copy of Windows. 
The Merge technology was bought by a company called DASCOM in 1999, which was in turn bought by IBM. A company called TreLOS was spun off in 2000 that continued the development of the virtual machine software and created Win4Lin. TreLOS later merged into NeTraverse, Inc. 
The SCO Group distributes NeTraverse Merge 5.3, which supports their current products SCO OpenServer 5.x and UnixWare 7. 
This biographical article related to Sudanese association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was educated at the Academy of Fine Art in L'Aquila, Italy. Diodati's work has mainly been exhibited in the United States and Italy. His first paintings were exhibited in 1980. In 2002 he went to Cuba to get cultural inspiration for his work. This lead his working with clay and entering the world of sculpture. 
It has been said that Dioati's artistic style is a mixture of cinema, theatre and painting, and that he is a perilous exponent of immoral irony. Diodati uses critical humor and a great deal of color in his paintings. 
Kunstclub.com profile for Lucio Diodati http://www.kunstclub.com/member/Diodati/ Lixow-com profile for Lucio Diodati http://www.lixow.com/Lucio_DIODATI Artreview.com profile for Lucio Diodati http://www.artreview.com/profile/LucioDiodati Artelista.com profile for Lucio Diodati http://diodatilucio.artelista.com/ Gigarte.com profile for Lucio Diodati http://www.gigarte.com/iscritto/index.php?&id=6203&p=&s= 
Cast Acrylic is a form of poly(methyl methacrylate) (PMMA). It is formed by casting the monomer, methyl methacrylate, mixed with initiators and possibly other additives into a form or mold. Sheet and rod stock are generated by casting into static forms, while tubing is done in rotational molds. 
Advantages of Acrylic: Excellent optical clarity & transparency Highly resistant to variations in temperature Up to 17 times the impact resistance of ordinary glass Half the weight of glass and ideal for precision machining Highly resistant to many different chemicals Acrylic (PMMA*) has certain properties making it an ideal material for use in a wide range of applications, including medical, life sciences and food/beverage testing. 
This type of acrylic is often used for aquariums, awards, financial tombstones, trophies, corporate gifts, and other products that require shaping or machining. It tends to be more clear and made to a higher quality standard, but in doing so makes it more expensive than extruded acrylic. 
It has a weekday passenger service of two trains to Limerick Junction and two to Waterford. There is no Sunday service. Until 19 January 2013 (inclusive) there were three trains each way. However, the late-morning Waterford to Limerick Junction and early-afternoon Limerick Junction to Waterford trains are now discontinued. 
Passengers should change at Limerick Junction for connections to Limerick, Cork, Tralee, Galway and Dublin. 
Bothriochloa bladhii (commonly called, variously, Australian bluestem, Caucasian bluestem, forest-bluegrass, plains bluestem, and purple plume grass) is a Neotropic grass in the family Poaceae, found primarily in tropical Africa, and tropical and temperate Asia, and Australia. The type specimen was collected from China by Finnish botanist Peter Johan Bladh. The name of Bladh is honored in the specific epithet. 
Bothriochloa bladhii is used as stored food for local livestock, and as a grazing plant by both livestock and wild ruminants. It is sometimes planted as a revegetator, to restore disturbed land. 
The station is a street-level station with two side platforms. It is located at the junction of Cingnian 2nd Road, Yongping Road, and Haibian Road, beside Glory Pier. 
The Apostate is the eighth studio album by Art Bergmann, released in 2016 on weewerk records. It is his first new full-length album since 1998's Design Flaw.  The digital release date was April 8, 2016 and the CD / LP release date was May 13, 2016. 
The album was funded in part by a crowdfunding campaign on PledgeMusic. Musician Craig Northey also publicized the campaign by releasing a cover of Bergmann's 1991 single "Faithlessly Yours". 
Sunningdale Park is a country estate centred around a property known as Northcote House in Sunningdale, Berkshire. 
The house is thought to have been built by James Wyatt, almost certainly for James William Steuart, a farmer, in around 1787. It was acquired by Sir Charles Decimus Crosley, a former Sheriff of London from the Steuart family in 1859. It then passed to Sir James Thompson Mackenzie, 1st Baronet in 1883, to Major William James Joicey, the then serving High Sheriff of Durham, in 1890 and to Sir Hugo Cunliffe-Owen, an industrialist, in 1930. 
Northcote House accommodated the Civil Defence College from 1950 until it closed in 1968. The Civil Service College was then established in the building in June 1970. The ill-fated Sunningdale Agreement on power-sharing in Northern Ireland was signed in Northcote House on 9 December 1973. 
The Civil Service College evolved to become the National School of Government, which provided training, organisational development and consultancy courses for UK civil servants and private individual learners until its closure in March 2012. In March 2015, the College of Policing opened an office in the Albert Day building. Sunningdale Park was then sold to Audley Retirement and Berkeley Homes in December 2016. 
Born in Lviv, Sapuha is a product of the FC Karpaty Lviv youth sportive system, where his first trainer was Oleh Rodin. 
This biographical article related to a Ukrainian association football midfielder born in the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The second generation model called Yuan Plus was revealed in July 2021, featuring slightly larger dimensions and a more upmarket design. 
The BYD S1 is a gasoline-powered subcompact crossover launched by BYD in 2015. Besides the Chinese market, it was also offered in the Philippines. In the Chinese market, with the introduction of the Yuan nameplate in 2016, the S1 was renamed and was since sold as the gasoline version of the Yuan. 
In some non-Chinese markets, the old S1 name was kept, despite the renaming of the vehicle in China. Even the all-electric variant of the Yuan was known in some markets as the S1 EV. 
The interior is largely carried over from the pre-facelift model with the 10.1-inch multimedia screen, and is integrated with the DiLink3.0 intelligent connected system featuring voice command, voice notifications, Bluetooth phone calls, phone connectivity and mobile onboard television. 
The BYD S2 is an all-electric subcompact crossover, shorter than the Yuan and the S1 (4100 mm vs 4360 mm) and sold in China since 2019. The battery capacity is 40.62 kWh. 
OCT gave rise to a family of techniques to perform OCT-A including speckle variance OCT, phase variance OCT, optical microangiography, and split-spectrum microangiography. 
Speckle variance OCT uses only the amplitude information of the complex OCT signal, whereas phase variance OCT uses only the phase information. 
Split-spectrum amplitude decorrelation angiography (SSADA)  computes average decorrelation between consecutive B-scans to visualize blood flow. 
The intensity or speckle of an OCT signal is the random interference pattern produced by backscattered light from a random medium. OCT captures cross-sectional images, known as B-scans. In SV-OCT, multiple B-scans are captured at the same location, creating a 3D data set, with time as the third dimension. The pixel-wise variance is computed between consecutive B-scan frames. A speckle variance image,      I  S V     {\displaystyle I_{SV}}   is calculated as[citation needed] 
where      N    {\displaystyle {N}}   is the number of B-scans obtained at a single location and      I  i j k     {\displaystyle I_{ijk}}   is the intensity of a pixel with image coordinates     ( j , k )   {\displaystyle (j,k)}   in the B-scan indexed by     i   {\displaystyle i}  . 
SV-OCT has advantages for microvasculature imaging due to its high sensitivity and independence to the Doppler angle. In addition, it has low computational complexity and requires relatively low data storage compared to PV-OCT. However, SV-OCT it is susceptible to bulk tissue motion and multiple scattering induced artifacts. 
Aside from applications in ophthalmology, SV-OCT has been used to study blood flow in embryos, cardiac tissue, and spinal tissue  
Acremonium species are usually slow-growing and are initially compact and moist. Their hyphae are fine and hyaline, and produce mostly simple phialides. Their conidia are usually one-celled (i.e. ameroconidia), hyaline or pigmented, globose to cylindrical, and mostly aggregated in slimy heads at the apex of each phialide. 
Liaisons Dangereuses inspired the naming of an underground dance and "electro" music program on Antwerp SIS radio (103.9 FM) presented by Sven Van Hees that became notable during the rise of AB music and New Beat during the late 1980s. 
This article about a German band or other musical ensemble is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Plaid collaborated with video artist Bob Jaroc for their live performances and on the 5.1 audio/visual project entitled Greedy Baby. The project was completed on 20 July 2005, and was first shown at the Queen Elizabeth Hall in the South Bank Centre, and subsequently at the BFI Imax cinema in Waterloo, London. Greedy Baby was released on DVD from Warp on 26 June 2006. 
In 2006, Plaid composed and performed the original score to Michael Arias' anime film Tekkonkinkreet, and then went on to rejoin Arias for his second feature, Heaven's Door, as well as two of his subsequent short films. 
In 2009, they contributed a cover of a Plone song to the Warp20 (Recreated) compilation.[citation needed] 
Plaid's music has been used in the LittleBigPlanet series. In 2014, they helped produce some of the soundtrack for LittleBigPlanet 3. 
Plaid's style crosses a number of genres - electronica, dance, ambient, experimental - and is sometimes to referred to by some critics as "post-techno." They are known to employ a variety of time-signatures in their music and often create syncopated beats and melodies using a variety of real instruments and samples. 
Brazil had attended the competition without two of their most notable players, defender Domingos da Guia (champion with Boca Juniors two years before) and striker Leonidas da Silva, nicknamed the Black Diamond. As the tournament was played in a single round-robin system, Argentina and Brazil finished tied on points at the end of the tournament. Therefore, a playoff match had to be played to crown a champion, according to the rules. 
The match was held in San Lorenzo stadium, were both teams played hard, committing several number of fouls. After Brazilian player Domingos Spitalletti kicked Francisco Varallo violently in the 36th minute, a riot involving all the players (even some substitutes) started. After a hiatus of 40', the match restarted. Nevertheless, just two minutes a new riot happened after Cunha hit Cherro on his face.  
When I was substituted vs Uruguay, I became demoralised. Still sweated, I stayed to watch the second half. Then I got ill, probably with bitterness. I scored the two goals but I wanted to play more time. I didn't.
In his early career he worked as Max Wolf's assistant at Heidelberg, Germany and discovered a number of asteroids. He worked in Germany, Italy and Argentina before returning to Italy for good in 1908. 
He was director of Trieste Observatory starting in 1919; Trieste had just been annexed to Italy following World War I. He then became director of Capodimonte Observatory in Naples starting in 1932 and until his retirement in 1950. In 1943 during World War II, the observatory was temporarily occupied by American and British troops in order to install a radar station. 
Giap was hospitalized at the 108 Hospital on  September 24, 2009. After his 100th birthday, Giap's health deteriorated as he slowly lost the ability to both speak and walk.  In 2011, VTV showed footage of him voting (from a wheelchair) to dispel rumors of his failing health.  At 6:09 PM  on October 4, 2013, he died after a four-year stay at the hospital, at the age of 102.  According to East Asian age reckoning, he was 103. 
In Vietnam, news of Giap's death spread quickly through the local social media, especially through Facebook, before the government-controlled media began to pick it up. VnExpress, an online newspaper, reported the news more than four hours later, and domestic media began to report the story.  However, before an official acknowledgement from the government, the media could only briefly mention the news without any commentary. 
Fully one day later, the official news agency acknowledged the news that Giap was dead and announced a national funeral.  There was an immediate outpouring of grief in the country where he was highly revered and many people regard him as second only to Ho Chi Minh. His family opened his residence for visitations and hundreds of thousands of people came to pay their respects before the official funeral. 
Rolf Franke (born 7 April 1967) is a Dutch retired basketball player and current coach. As a player, Franke played for multiple clubs in the Netherlands and he represented the Dutch national basketball team in 60 games as well. 
As a player, Franke won the Dutch Eredivisie title eight times, while winning the NBB Cup four times. 
On 11 June 2018, Franke signed a one-year contract to become the head coach of ZZ Leiden. On 31 March 2019, Franke won the NBB Cup with Leiden, the club's first trophy since 2013. On 24 April 2019, it was announced that Franke won the DBL Coach of the Year. 
In 1984, the MCO assumed the then recently disbanded CBC Winnipeg Orchestra's Candlelight Concerts series, which was broadcast nationally on CBC radio. Canadians across the country and fans around the world continue to enjoy the orchestra online and in frequent broadcasts of its recordings. 
In 1988, the orchestra represented Manitoba at the Winter Olympics in Calgary, Alberta. The MCO toured southern Italy in August 1999, and British Columbia twice: in the spring of 2003, and in the autumn of 2009 together with the celebrated percussion soloist, Dame Evelyn Glennie. The MCO toured with Glennie a second time in the fall of 2016, with stops in Ontario and Quebec. 
In January 2018, the MCO presented the Canadian premiere of Philip Glass's third piano concerto. It was performed with American pianist Simone Dinnerstein, and co-commissioned as the inaugural installment in the MCO's three-year New Concerto Project. 
In 1995, the MCO released its first compact disc, on Sweden's BIS label. Canadian Music for Chamber Orchestra marked the first recording by a North American orchestra for the prestigious company. It was distributed in more than 45 countries. There have been eight subsequent CDs, four of them with CBC Records. A new disc recorded with Dame Evelyn Glennie, is scheduled to be released in 2017. 
The orchestra has received three nominations for Juno Awards: in 1999 for A Britten Serenade; and in 2005 for So much to tell, which has sold nearly 10 thousand copies, and in 2013 for Troubadour and the Nightingale. 
In October 2019, the MCO were named Classical Artist / Ensemble of the Year at the Western Canadian Music Awards.  
Concertmasters have been Arthur Polson, 1972-1987; Gwen Hoebig, 1987-1990; Victor Costanzi, 1990-1991; Claude Richard, 1991-1992; David Stewart, 1992-1999; and Karl Stobbe, 1999 to present. Rita Menzies became the orchestra's general manager in 1979, and was succeeded by Vicki Young in 2003. 
Saddle Butte Township is a township in Golden Valley County, North Dakota, United States. Its population was 25 as of the 2010 census, down from 27 in 2000. 
The township of Saddle Butte is located on the western border of the county and the state. It borders the following other townships in Golden Valley County: 
He played his junior hockey with the Barrie Flyers and Niagara Falls Flyers, and started his professional career with the Kingston Frontenacs. By 1961 he joined the Bruins, although he had stints the next two years with the Frontenacs and the Providence Reds of the American Hockey League (AHL). By 1966, he was firmly ensconced on Boston's checking line. 
Westfall retired having played 1226 career NHL games, scoring 231 goals and 394 assists for 625 points. 
Westfall was part of CTV's broadcast team for the 1984 Canada Cup tournament.  He provided reports and did interviews from ice level. 
On November 19, 2011, Westfall was inducted into the New York Islanders Hall of Fame. The Islanders held "Ed Westfall Night" in his honor. He and his former partner in the booth "Jiggs" McDonald called the second period in the game that night between two of his former teams, the New York Islanders and the Boston Bruins. 
In April 1953, Weber was successful in having the Ohio General Assembly proclaim September 17 as statewide Constitution Day. 
In 1953, Representative Frank T. Bow took the idea to make Constitution Day a national holiday to the House of Representatives. Bow recognized Weber and Romary for their part in encouraging the creation of the holiday. Congress passed a resolution creating Constitution Week. The Senate and the House approved her request and President Dwight D. Eisenhower signs it into law. 
On April 15, 1957, the city council of Louisville, Ohio declared the city, Constitution Town. In 1958 the Ohio State Archaeological and Historical Society donated four historical markers for the main entrances to the city which explained Louisville's role as the originator of Constitution Day. 
The Special Groups or GE (Grupos Especiais in Portuguese) were small military units of platoon size, set up from 1966 to 1974 by the Portuguese Armed Forces in Angola and in Mozambique. Later, Paratrooper Special Groups or GEP (Grupos Especiais Paraquedistas) were formed, these being units able to conduct airborne operations. By 1974 there were 84 GE and 12 GEP, with 7,700 members, operating in Mozambique and 90 GE, with 3,069 members, operating in Angola. 
The GE had,  as a standard uniform,  a completely black battledress. However, they often used the camouflaged uniform of the Portuguese Army in the field. As headgear, the GE used a Yellow beret and one GEP garnet red beret, both with the emblem of GE (Shield of Mozambique Province on a dagger and surrounded by a laurel wreath).  
The GEP wore the Portuguese Air Force paratroopers camouflaged uniform and a Maroon beret. The GEP was the first Portuguese military force to use a red beret, prior to the commandos who only officially adopted its use in 1974. 
Sylvia Morales (born 1943 in Phoenix, Arizona) is an American film director, writer, producer, and editor. Morales is recognized as one of the first female Mexican-American filmmakers to have established a Latino cinema. In her filmmaking career, Morales has been nationally recognized winning awards for film and video documentary on topics ranging from the farm workers struggle to the music of Los Lobos. 
While the majority of her work is in the documentary film genre, she has also done work for the mass media television. She has also published essays and photographs on Latina and feminist issues. Sylvia Morales has lectured and taught in different Universities throughout Southern California. Morales' work is characterized by strong documentaries that portray the Latino community. She also has work that demonstrates the feminist issues that arise in the Chicano community. 
Morales was born in Phoenix, Arizona but was raised in Southern California, United States. Morales studied at the University of California, Los Angeles where she received her Bachelor of Arts in 1972. She then went on to receive her Master of Fine Arts in 1979 in film with an emphasis in motion picture production. 
Recommended...The film does a fine job of combining social history and biography, providing a glimpse of an important social justice movement, along with some of the significant individuals who carried it forward 
Sylvia Morales work has been shown widely in film festivals, Universities, conferences and in community gatherings throughout the U.S., Mexico, South America, Spain and France. In many of her screenings she has been a guest speaker in which she allows for dialogue about the film and about her life. 
Morales's documentary Chicana was released in 1979. The film depicts back to pre-Columbian to present times, where it illustrates the women's role starting with the Aztec society till present day where she shows that Chicanas have become an active part in Mexico and the United States. Linda Gross from Los Angeles Times, describes Chicana as "A well-researched and spirited documentary made with much love." 
This article about a place in Canelones Department is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The original 12" vinyl EP was pressed twice: once on black vinyl and the classic tan cover, and then again in 1986, on both red and black vinyl (with a maroon sleeve), and white vinyl (with tan cover). 
He made his league debut for Rosenborg in the first league game of the 2010 season against Molde on 14 March 2010 
Captain Henry Mitchell Jr. (1862-1894) was managing director of a brewery company co-founded by his father Henry Mitchell. He was also superintendent of the fire brigade at the company's Cape Hill brewery, and a captain in the Smethwick Rifle Volunteers. 
Harry was born on 11 September 1862, in Smethwick (then part of Staffordshire), and died from typhoid at the age of just 32. 
Henry also built and donated Smethwick Drill Hall and the accompanying Sergeant Instructor's house. A plaque from the drill hall, now in the Harry Mitchell Leisure Centre which replaced it, reads: 
 This drill hall  for use of the Smethwick Volunteers  and the surrounding recreation grounds  called 'Harry's Park' were presented to  the inhabitants of Smethwick in memory of  Captain Henry Mitchell  of the Smethwick Rifle Volunteers and  Cape Hill Brewery Fire Brigade  born at Smethwick September  11th 1862 
This is a list of media in the Regional Municipality of Waterloo, Ontario, including Kitchener, Waterloo, Cambridge and the surrounding area. 
Stations from neighbouring cities such as Hamilton, Guelph, London, Brantford and Toronto can also be received in some areas of the Waterloo Region. 
The only broadcast television station based in Waterloo Region is CTV owned-and-operated station CKCO-DT, which is branded on-air as CTV Kitchener. It is located in Kitchener and is owned by Bell Media. The region is also served by Rogers TV, a community channel based in Kitchener available only to Rogers Cable subscribers providing local talk shows, coverage of special events, and local hockey games. 
Although other networks / systems such as City and CTV Two are not readily available over the air, stations from adjacent markets for most such services are available on the basic service of most pay television subscriptions. The incumbent cable television provider in Waterloo Region is Rogers Cable. 
The regional townships are also served by their own local newspapers. The Observer is aimed towards readers in Elmira, Woolwich, and Wellesley, and New Hamburg Independent for New Hamburg and Wilmot. The Ayr News is aimed towards readers in Ayr and the surrounding township of North Dumfries. 
This German road or road transport-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
while two of them (    L   {\displaystyle L}   and     P   {\displaystyle P}  ) are active production factors, the other     K   {\displaystyle K}   is a passive one. 
The theory can be applied to any  national economy; principles of consistent analysis and forecast are considered.  As an example, dynamics of Russian economy for  years 1960 - 2060  is considered in one-sector and three-sector approximations(see. Chapter 8 and 9). The elementary, three-branch model is used (see. Section 2.2.2, Table 2.2 in Chapter 2 and Section 9.5 in Chapter 9) for the description of dynamics of production (the expanded reproduction, in Marx's terms). 
Like Iowa City Transit and Cambus, Coralville Transit uses the Transit app to show estimated arrival times at stops and precise locations of buses on the map. Prior to 2019, the BONGO (Bus on the Go) system was used for bus tracking on the three transit systems in the Iowa City area. 
Acacia uncifera is a shrub or tree belonging to the genus Acacia and the subgenus Phyllodineae native to north eastern Australia. 
The species was first formally described by the botanist George Bentham in 1848 as part of Thomas Mitchell's work Journal of an Expedition into the Interior of Tropical Australia. It was reclassified as Racosperma unciferum by Leslie Pedley in 1987 then transferred back to genus Acacia in 2001. 
It is endemic only in a small area in Queensland from the White Mountains to Torrens Creek and the headwaters of the Nogoa River where it is found on plains and hills where it grows in sandy soils over and around sandstone as a part of open forest or woodland communities composed of Angophora and Eucalyptus species. 
On 21 January 2016 Rocha moved abroad for the first time in his career, after agreeing to a three-year deal with Major League Soccer side Houston Dynamo.  On 6 July 2016, he mutually terminated his contract with Dynamo after alleging "family reasons". 
Erupa nampa is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Schaus in 1929. It is found in Brazil (Santa Catharina). 
Sphynx is Melechesh's third full-length album. The album presents the band's Mesopotamian/Sumerian metal in a more aggressive and intricate manner. The CD version includes an enhanced multimedia section featuring a trip to the world of Melechesh (lyrical overviews, wallpaper, photos, glossary of terms, and a videoclip for the track "Genies, Sorcerers and Mesopotamian Nights"). There is a guest appearance from Andy LaRocque on the track "Purifier of the Stars". 
I Am Nancy is a 2011 American documentary that follows actress Heather Langenkamp as she explores her role as Nancy Thompson in the A Nightmare on Elm Street films, the fandom that surrounds the franchise, and why most of it focuses on Freddy Krueger, rather than Nancy. 
Actress Heather Langenkamp attends several horror conventions across the globe as she interacts with fans to gain insight into why people are so drawn to the series and the characters of Nancy and Freddy. Additionally, she interviews Robert Englund and Wes Craven to understand what qualities make Nancy a definitive film hero. 
Langenkamp was inspired to make a documentary about herself and Nancy after a receptionist rebuffed her efforts to contact director Wes Craven.  The film was originally planned to coincide with the 25th anniversary of A Nightmare on Elm Street but was delayed for her participation in Never Sleep Again.  Langenkamp felt that documentary did not answer all the questions that she had.  Production took two years. 
In a positive review for Dread Central, Emilie Noetzel wrote, "I Am Nancy is a must-see for fans of the A Nightmare on Elm Street series and of Heather Langenkamp. It is at times funny, at times quite serious, and oftentimes very touching. What really makes the documentary about Nancy, and Heather, feel so real and personal is that Heather understands the fact that Nancy is secondary to Freddy to most people, and she has no problem poking fun at herself." 
William Whitlock, Jr., of New York, was interested in sailing packet lines from the early twenties and made the first sailing of the Cadmus (ship) (306 tons) in the New York-Havre Whitlock Line in 1823. 
He was also one of the pioneers in the New York-Savannah packet line, which commenced weekly sailings between the ports in early 1824. Whitlock, who was unique in being the sole owner and operator of several packet ships, came from a New Jersey family and was the son of a sea captain. 
Joseph A. Scoville says that the first business ventures of Whitlock soured him against partnerships and that he played a lone hand. "Even in ship-owning he preferred to hold an undivided interest if he could. If there was a loss, he could stand it, and if a profit, he did not wish to divide it with anybody." 
In his early life, Whitlock spent some time in Georgia as a cotton factor, and this experience really got him interested in ships for transporting cotton from Georgia to New York and to markets in continental Europe. 
In the thirties, Whitlock owned a few Havre packets outright, operated them in his own name, but ran them for some time in conjunction with James J. Boyd's Havre Second Line and later with the "Fox & Livingston line." Samuel M. Fox and Mortimer Livingston, sons-in-law of Francis Depau, took over the Havre Old Line, which had been founded by Depau in 1822, upon the latter's death early in 1836. Later, the Havre Old Line and the Whitlock Line were joined and operated as the Havre Union Line. 
Emarginula bonfittoi is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Fissurellidae, the keyhole limpets. 
Her Country First is a 1918 American comedy silent film directed by James Young and written by Edith Kennedy and Mary Roberts Rinehart. The film stars Vivian Martin, John Cossar, Florence Oberle, J. Parks Jones, Larry Steers, and Bernadine Zuber. The film was released on September 22, 1918, by Paramount Pictures. 
There are no listings for this film in the Library of Congress's database which suggest that it is a lost film. 
Dorothy Grant returns from boarding school so fired up with patriotism that she organizes her friends into a military company they call the Girls' Aviation Corps with help from a woman farmer who served in the military. Dorothy then discovers that German spies have come to town to get access to her father's munitions plant. 
Sher Ali was born to a well off and educated Zamindar family that was part of the Ranjha Jat tribe.  He was the son of Maulvi Nizam ud Din. His mother died on 7 March 1907. A daughter of Sher Ali, with the name Khadija Beguum wrote his short biography Seerat Hadrat Maulvi Sher Ali. Sher Ali did his B.A. in 1897. 
His wife died on 12 July 1942 and Sher Ali died on 13 November 1947 at Lahore. He was buried at the Bahishti Maqbara (The Heavenly Graveyard) at Rabwah. 
Fan is interested in statistical theory and methods in data science, finance, economics, risk management, machine learning, computational biology, and biostatistics, with a particular focus on high-dimensional statistics, nonparametric modeling, longitudinal and functional data analysis, nonlinear time series, wavelets, among other areas. 
Animania was an annual anime convention that was held in Sydney, Australia. Originally run by local University anime societies, Animania is now organised by Aurora Entertainment, and includes several events in Sydney, Brisbane, Melbourne, and Adelaide. The term Animania in the 1990s referred to online-organized meetings of Animaniacs fans from around the world. 
At the main Sydney Animania in 2007, Halcyon played two sets, including an acoustic set (without drums) at the Friday preview night, and with the full band on the Saturday night. 
Halcyon's "style" is playing songs that have appeared in anime and Japanese video games, creating original translations (and occasionally reinterpretations) of the Japanese lyrics. Songs they have covered include Fly Me to the Moon from Neon Genesis Evangelion and HT from Trigun. 
At the September 2007 Sydney event Animania announced they had been accepted by the World Cosplay Summit to host the Australian competitions to compete in Japan at WCS 2009. This will be the first time Australia has been represented at WCS. 
Preliminary competition events will be held at the 2008 events with the finals taking place at August 2008 Sydney event. The winning team will be flown to Japan in 2009 to compete in the World Cosplay Summit. The team representing Australia for the first time is the Love and Peace Movement, consisting of Tsubaki Chan and Cattypatra. 
In 2008 the first World Cosplay Summit Australian Preliminaries took place at Animania, with the finalists competing in the 2009 World Cosplay Summit Championship (Japan). 
The 2008 Sydney August event featured two live concerts: Argent La Rosa, a J-Rock styled band, and Yunyu. 
This article about a football club in North Macedonia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Beale started his career in 1991 using various aliases creating oldschool hardcore tracks. He continued fine tuning the deep jungle sound under the Orca and Koda aliases on Lucky Spin Records and its sister label, Deejay Recordings, releasing "Tranquility to Earth" in 1994. In 1995 he first used the Decoder pseudonym, pioneering the dark or 'tech step' style of drum & bass, often on Mark Caro's label Tech Itch Recordings. 
1997 saw the release of Decoder's Decoded EP, which achieved press recognition with a number eighteen placing in NME's "Vibes Singles of the Year" chart.[citation needed] 
Decoder releases appeared on various labels, including Breakbeat Culture with Markee Ledge as Decoder & Substance, Tech Itch Recordings, BS1 Records, Hard Leaders, 31 Records and Audio Couture. Decoder also provided production for Peshay's Miles From Home. 
Scythris tumidella is a moth of the family Scythrididae. It was described by Kari Nupponen and Timo Nupponen in 2001. It is found in Russia (Altai). 
The GT1 class champion was the #1 Calsonic Nissan Skyline GT-R driven by Masahiko Kageyama, and the GT2 class champion was the #29 Korg Kegani Porsche 964 driven by Sakae Obata. 
Gjerdrum Idrettslag is a Norwegian sports club from Gjerdrum, Akershus. It has sections for association football, team handball, alpine skiing, Nordic skiing, biathlon, floorball and volleyball. 
It was founded as Gjerdrum IF on 25 January 1920. In August 1940 it merged with the AIF club Gjerdrum AIL to form Gjerdrum IL. 
The men's football team currently plays in the Third Division, the fourth tier of football in Norway. Its only stint at the third tier came in 1988. 
Members of the skiing section include the 2014 Olympic cross-country sprint champion Maiken Caspersen Falla. 
The Ireland national under-20 rugby team was formed in 2006, having previously been known as the under-21 team. They won the Grand Slam during the 2007 and 2019 Six Nations Under 20s Championship's, and also won the championship in 2010. 
Jesse Robinson House was a historic home located at Seaford, Sussex County, Delaware, United States. It consisted of two sections: the rear wing, built about 1820 as a single-pile, one-room-plan frame house, and the front section, added about 1860 as a two-story single-pile, center-hall-plan frame structure.  Five bays in width and resting on a brick foundation, it had design elements that mixed the Greek Revival and Italianate styles. 
This article about a property in Delaware on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jack Royce Woolf was born to Jeff D. and Emily Mahaza (Bradley) Woolf on June 10, 1924, in Trinidad, Texas.  His grandmother Woolf's family settled in the Trinidad, Texas, area after the Civil War. 
Upon graduation from Purdue, Woolf accepted a position as a research engineer and supervisor of propulsion research and a team member on the B-58 project with Convair (now Lockheed Martin) in Fort Worth, Texas. 
During Woolf's tenure as president, Arlington State College was elevated to a four-year institution effective September 1, 1959. The College was authorized to offer seventeen bachelor's degree programs in business administration, engineering, liberal arts, and the sciences.  At this time, Woolf recruited Wendell Nedderman as the first dean of engineering. By 1966, three more bachelors were added as well as teacher certification programs in seven academic departments. 
In 1966, in a historic move, Woolf established the graduate school with approval for six new master's degree programs:  electrical engineering, engineering mechanics, mathematics, economics, physics, and psychology. The university's first doctoral program, a Ph.D. in engineering, was to come on September 1, 1969. 
Under Woolf's leadership, ASC was the first Texas A&M System school to integrate (1962) and the first to accept black athletes (1963). Under his presidency, ASC/UTA expanded rapidly from an enrollment of 5,000 to 11,500. He instituted the first bachelor's and master's degree programs. 
On Sept. 1, 1968, Woolf resigned the presidency and was named President Emeritus and University Professor of Engineering and Higher Education.  He continued to teach courses in mechanical engineering until retiring in 1989. In addition to his career at UT Arlington, he was a consultant to several universities and educational agencies.  He was the executive director of the Association of Texas Colleges and Universities for over 10 years. 
Woolf was designated a "Distinguished Alumnus" of the College of Engineering of Purdue University in 1964, one of the first ten to be so honored. He also was selected to the Academy of Distinguished Graduates of Mechanical Engineering, Texas A&M University. 
In 1995, UT Arlington renamed the Engineering Building, the first building constructed during his presidency, to Woolf Hall. 
The Rennes Congress was the thirteenth national congress of the French Socialist Party (Parti socialiste or PS). It took place from 15 to 18 March 1990. 
During the Rennes Congress, Mitterrand wanted impose Fabius as First Secretary. For a second time, he was opposed by a Rocard-Jospin alliance. The Rennes Congress was marked by the violence in the Mitterrandist group which split between Jospiniens and Fabiusiens, the later group being those "high fliers" who had joined the party relatively recently. 
Pierre Mauroy was re-elected First Secretary with the support of Jospin and Rocard. Mitterrand accused Jospin of being responsible for the split of the Mitterrandist current. His relations with Jospin and Rocard deteriorated until the "resignation" of Rocard from the head of the cabinet in 1991. The next year, Jospin was ejected from the government. 
The violence of the debates gave a very bad public image to the PS and contributed to its decline at the beginning of the 1990s. The Rennes Congress is a traumatic event in the memory of the French Socialists. 
Pycnarmon geminipuncta is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by George Hampson in 1912. It is found in China. 
The Act also omitted the term "natural born" in the characterisation of children born outside the US to US citizen parents. The Act repeated the limitation in the 1790 Act that naturalization was reserved only for "free white person[s]."  It also changed the requirement in the 1790 Act of "good character" to read "good moral character." 
The 1795 Act continued the 1790 Act limitation of naturalization being available only to "free white person[s]." The main change was the increase in the period of required residence in the United States before an alien can be naturalized from two to five years, and the introduction of the Declaration of Intention requirement, or "first papers", which required to be filed at least three years before the formal application, creating a two-step naturalization process.  
The Act removed the characterization of children born outside the US to US citizen parents as "natural born citizens", providing instead that such children "shall be considered as citizens of the United States". 
The 1795 Act was superseded by the Naturalization Act of 1798, which extended the residency requirement to 14 years and notice period to five years. The 1798 Act was repealed by the Naturalization Law of 1802, which restored the residency and notice requirements of the 1795 Act.  
Riolan had other disagreements with Harvey, such as the role of the liver as a blood-manufacturing organ. Riolan was an opponent to the practice of vivisection, asserting that violent and painful deaths suffered by research animals, placed them in an unnatural condition that led to incorrect assumptions about the functionality of healthy animals. 
Riolan's best known written works are Anthropographia (1618), which is a treatise on human anatomy, and Opuscula anatomica (1649), in which he is critical of Harvey's views of the circulatory system. In his Anthropographia he also defined what traits a good anatomist had to have. 
The Kirindy Mitea National Park is a national park on the coast of the Mozambique Channel, in south-west Madagascar. The 72,200 hectares (178,000 acres) park contains many endemic animals and plants and claims to have the greatest density of primates in the world. 
There are a wide range of ecosystems due to reserve being in an area where southern and western biotypes meet. Within the park is the largest remaining area of dry deciduous forest, tropical dry forest, spiny forest, beaches and sand-dunes, mangroves and coral reefs. One hundred and eighty-five species of plants have, so far, been recorded, among them three species of baobab, as well as seven species of mangrove trees. 
The government press conference takes place three times a week on Mondays, Wednesdays, and Fridays, to which the press secretaries of the Federal Government and the ministries are invited. After brief introductory statements, they answer questions from the journalists. They may flag particular answers as confidential and it is in line with the journalists' voluntary commitment to the press code to maintain this confidentiality, though in practice, this power is rarely used. 
The earliest roots of today's Federal Press Conference are in the press conferences organized by the General Staff of the Imperial Army during the First World War, which held from 1915, the former stock market journalist and Major Georg Schweitzer. He had already been one of the founding members of the Imperial Press Ball. The "teaching of the people" corresponded to the then prevailing patriotic mood. 
Komarov was one of the most highly experienced and qualified candidates accepted into the first squad of cosmonauts selected in 1960. He was declared medically unfit for training or spaceflight twice while he was in the program, but his perseverance, superior skills, and engineering knowledge allowed him to continue playing an active role. During his time at the cosmonaut training center, he contributed to space vehicle design, cosmonaut training, evaluation and public relations. 
In 1946, Komarov completed his first year of training at the Chkalov Higher Air Force School in Borisoglebsk in Voronezh Oblast. He then completed his training at the A.K. Serov Military Aviation College in Bataisk. Komarov's mother died in 1948, seven months before his graduation in 1949, at which he received his pilot's wings and commission as a lieutenant in the Soviet Air Force. 
In December 1949, Komarov served as the pilot of a fighter plane with the 383rd Regiment of the 42nd North Caucasian Fighter Air Division that was based in Grozny. 
In September 1959, Komarov was promoted to engineer-captain and invited to participate in the selection process for cosmonaut candidate along with approximately 3,000 other pilots. He was one of twenty candidates selected for "Air Force Group One"; he and the others reported to the newly formed TsPK just outside Moscow for assignment on 13 March 1960. 
In April 1964 Komarov was declared space-flight ready with Bykovsky, Popovich, Titov, Volynov, Leonov, Khrunov, Belyayev, and Lev Demin. From this group the commander of the planned Voskhod mission scheduled for late 1964 would be chosen. In May the group was reduced to Volynov, Komarov, Leonov and Khrunov. 
On 9 October, Komarov and the crew inspected the Voskhod with Korolev and other members of the administration. Later that day they were interviewed by the state press and played tennis for the benefit of photographers. 
In December 1964, the RVSN (Strategic Rocket Forces) requested that Komarov be transferred from the VVS (Soviet Air Force) to the RVSN, in a move possibly motivated by the poor record of the RVSN in producing successful rockets compared to the VVS. The request was opposed by Kamanin. 
As a result of the problems with the craft, the Soviets did not launch the second Soyuz module, from which cosmonauts were to perform an extra-vehicular activity (EVA) to the Soyuz 1, and cut the mission short. 
On 26 April 1967, Komarov was given a state funeral in Moscow, and his ashes were interred in the Kremlin Wall Necropolis at Red Square. The American astronauts requested the Soviet government to allow a representative to attend, but were turned down. 
Komarov was posthumously awarded his second Order of Lenin and also Hero of the Soviet Union.[citation needed] 
Komarov is commemorated with other prominent figures from the early Russian space program with a bust on Cosmonauts Alley in Moscow, and he is also honored with a monument at the crash site near Orsk. 
The asteroid 1836 Komarov, discovered in 1971, was named in the honor of Komarov, as was a crater on the Moon. This asteroid and the cosmonaut inspired the composer Brett Dean to write a piece of symphonic music commissioned by conductor Simon Rattle in 2006. The composition is named Komarov's Fall, and it can be found on the EMI Classics Album of Simon Rattle's The Planets. 
There was formerly a Soviet satellite-tracking ship named for Komarov, the Kosmonaut Vladimir Komarov. 
A Klondike derby is an annual event held by some Boy Scouts of America and Scouts Canada districts during the winter months and is based on the heritage of the Klondike Gold Rush. BSA units have been running Klondike derbies since 1949. 
The event varies by district, but the typical Klondike derby consists of several stations where patrols/units must test their Scoutcraft skills and their leadership abilities, earning points towards a total score.  Often, one or more races are included while the Scouts navigate between stations. 
The unit must transport their gear on a homemade sled pulled by the Scouts. Districts may have specific guidelines for the construction of sleds. 
Nintendo Campus Challenge was a video game competition sponsored by Nintendo and held at nearly 60 college campuses and other events throughout the United States, including a Canadian Tour.  There were two Campus Challenge events, one in 1991 and another in 1992. 
Like Nintendo World Championships, the official event gave each player 6 minutes and 21 seconds to play in the contest, but there are three different minigames. The first minigame of the competition is Super Mario Bros. 3, where players must collect 25 coins. The next minigame is a version of Pin*Bot, where players must get 100,000 points. The final minigame is Dr. Mario, which lasts until the time expires. Once time expires, a player's score is totaled using the following formula: 
The following advertisement was printed in Game Players Strategy Guide to Nintendo Games Vol. 4, issue #5: 
Rad Racer was not used in the final version of the competition cartridge, as it had previously appeared on the Nintendo World Championships cartridge and that both games used a different mapper chip from what the 1991 Nintendo Campus Challenge uses. 
There is only one known original copy of the 1991 Campus Challenge cartridge known to exist. The game was found by a video game collector, Rob Walters, at a garage sale in New York  in 2006. The game sold for $14,000 in July 2009 to collector JJ Hendricks. After 3 months, Hendricks resold the game on eBay for $20,100. 
The cartridge is known to have been utilized in the 1991 Campus Challenge; however, it was also used in the French 'Nintendo Super Tour 1992', and a competition in Scandinavia in the same year. 
The Nintendo Campus Challenge 1991 was held at 58 college campuses and spring break locations. The event consisted of three stages. The main stage had the competition on 12 different game stations. The second stage was Nintendo Entertainment System systems with various games while the third stage had Game Boy systems. Attendees at the events could play as many times as they wanted and the highest score at the end of the day was announced the winner. 
The winner from each location was flown to Disney World in Orlando, Florida over New Year's weekend in January 1992. All the competitors played in the first round followed by a second round with the six highest scoring players only. The final round was a head-to-head match between Steven Lucas and Matt Sekelsky. Steven Lucas won with a score of 2,394,130. 
The rules are the same as the 1991 version, except with three SNES minigames. The first minigame of the competition is Super Mario World, where players must collect 50 coins (very similar to Nintendo World Championships' first minigame, Super Mario Bros.). The second game is a version of F-Zero, where players must complete two laps. The final minigame is Pilotwings, where players must land on two targets successfully. Once time expires, a player's score is totaled using the following formula: 
There are reportedly three cartridges in existence, but only two are known. One was found at the same New York garage sale by Rob Walters as the 1991 cartridge. The cartridge is owned by a video game collector named Rick Bruns.  The second one was found in an attic of a former employee of a company who did projects for Nintendo.  Nintendo sent the cartridge to the company along with some systems and other games. 
The cartridge is also known to have been used in the French 'Nintendo Super Tour 1992', and a Scandinavian-based competition the same year. 
Similar competitions were held in Europe and Japan in 1992. The winner of the US competition, Jeff Hanson, won against the winner of the Japanese competition, Yuichi Suyama, and became the World Champion at the 1993 Consumer Electronics Show. 
The series consists of three main phases: a blind audition, a battle phase, and live performance shows. The four judges / coaches choose teams of contestants through a blind audition process. Each judge has the length of the auditioner's performance to decide if he or she wants that singer on his or her team. If two or more judges want the same singer (as happens frequently), the singer has the final choice of coach. 
In the final phase, the remaining contestants compete against each other in live broadcasts. The audience and the coaches have equal say in deciding who moves on to the final 4 phase. With one contestant remaining for each coach, the four contestants will compete against each other in the final round with the outcome decided solely by public vote. However, in Season 4, there may be multiple contestants for a coach to enter the Grand Final, or may be no contestants for the respective coaches. 
The first season of The Voice of China premiered on 13 July 2012, and concluded on 30 September. The coaching panel consisted of Liu Huan, Na Ying, Yang Kun, and Harlem Yu. Hu Qiaohua as the host. 
Four finalists were advanced to the final round. Bruce Liang was announced as the winner of the season, while Momo Wu, Jike Junyi, and Kim Ji-mun placed second, third, and fourth, respectively. 
Season two premiered on 12 July 2013, and concluded on 7 October 2013. The coaching panel was modified, with A-mei and Wang Feng replacing Liu and Yang. This is the only season with two female coaches, which are A-mei and Na Ying. Hu continued appearing as the host of the show. 
Four finalists were advanced to the final round. Li Qi was announced as the winner of the season, while Zhang Hengyuan, Xuan Xuan, and Jin Runji placed second, third, and fourth, respectively. 
Season three premiered on 18 July 2014 and concluded on 7 October 2014. Na and Wang return as coaches for their third and second season respectively, along with Yang who returns after a one season break, and Chyi Chin completes the panel as a new coach. 
Four finalists were advanced to the final round. Diamond Zhang was announced as the winner of the season, while Perhat Khaliq, Yu Feng, and Qin Yuzi placed second, third, and fourth, respectively. 
Season four premiered on 17 July 2015 and concluded on 7 October 2015. Na and Wang return as coaches for their fourth and third season respectively, along with Yu who returns after a one season break, and Jay Chou completes the panel as a new coach. 
Five finalists were advanced to the final round. Zhang Lei was announced as the winner of the season, while Tifa Chen, Tan Xuanyuan, Bei Bei and Leon Lee placed second, third, fourth and fifth, respectively. 
This Osaka Prefecture railroad station-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aquaventure is a large water park with large focus on theming and some attractions not typically found at local water parks. A concept originally introduced for the expansion to the Paradise Island resort complex, Aquaventure is now located at both resorts. The main features of both complexes are The Current, a lazy river-water raft ride hybrid, and the Mayan temple slide tower. 
Deep Purple Secret Mexican Tour was a small warm-up tour of British hard rock band Deep Purple with new guitarist Steve Morse and consisted of two shows in Mexico and one show in the USA 
Marcoux won in the 1998 elections the Vaudreuil seat which was formerly held by Daniel Johnson Jr. former Quebec Premier. 
Marcoux was named Transport Minister in 2003 before being promoting to Justice Minister in a Cabinet shuffle in February 2005. He was re-elected in the 2007 elections for a third term but was not named in the new cabinet. Jacques P. Dupuis, who was the Minister of Public Safety, was appointed to the portfolio of Minister of Justice. 
In fire and explosion prevention engineering, purging refers to the introduction of an inert (i.e. non-combustible) purge gas into a closed system (e.g. a container or a process vessel) to prevent the formation of an ignitable atmosphere.  Purging relies on the principle that a combustible (or flammable) gas is able to undergo combustion (explode) only if mixed with air in the right proportions.  The flammability limits of the gas define those proportions, i.e. the ignitable range. 
Assume a closed system containing a flammable gas, which shall be prepared for safe ingress of air, for instance as part of a shut-down procedure.  The system can be flushed with an inert gas to reduce the concentration of the flammable gas so that when air is introduced, an ignitable mixture cannot form.  In NFPA 56 this is known as purge-out-of-service. 
It is useful with two terms for purging because purge-out-of-service requires much larger quantities of inert agent than purge-into-service. The terminology of German standards refers to purge-into-service as partial inerting, and purge-out-of-service as total inerting, clearly indicating the difference between the two purging practices, although the choice of the term inerting, rather than purging, can be confusing, see below. 
The purge gas is inert, i.e. by definition non-combustible, or more precisely, non-reactive. The most common purge gases commercially available in large quantities are nitrogen and carbon dioxide.  Other inert gases, e.g. argon or helium may be used.  Nitrogen and carbon dioxide are unsuitable purge gases in some applications, as these gases may undergo chemical reaction with fine dusts of certain light metals.  
Because an inert purge gas is used, the purge procedure may (erroneously) be referred to as inerting in everyday language.  This confusion may lead to dangerous situations.  Carbon dioxide is a safe inert gas for purging.  Carbon dioxide is an unsafe inert gas for inerting, as it may ignite the vapors and result in an explosion. 
It is said to be the place where the wake for Fernando IV "The Summoned", who died in Jaen on 17 September 1312, was held. For this reason, throughout the centuries prayers for the dead have been held in the arch during funerals for the city's bishops. 
The church at 2-4 San Lorenzo Street has a single nave. It was noted for its objets d'art, including an All Souls Altarpiece, a panel of Saint Dominic and Saint Bartholomew of La Cuesta, and a painting on linen of Cristo de las Injurias, all housed in the nearby Church of La Merced. 
His brother, Bernard Koenen was arrested briefly during the Great Purge. He and his brother are both buried at the Socialists' Memorial at the Berlin cemetery, Zentralfriedhof Friedrichsfelde. A street in Sangerhausen is named after Wilhelm Koenen. 
Lime Street Chapel was a Roman Catholic place of worship in the City of London, in use during a short period of the reign of James II and VII of Great Britain. 
The chapel was shortly given a diplomatic status, with James Stanford, Resident for Philip William, Elector Palatine, as owner: he was an English Catholic, considered to have been acting as a figurehead for a group of influential Catholics. James II backed the chapel's construction. Besides the king's support, there were contributions from Catholic merchants and priests. The Elector Palatine's views were not consulted. 
The house on which the chapel was based had been leased by Betts, in 1676. It was later associated with Thomas Abney as Lord Mayor. The chapel was a separate structure, constructed possibly after Stanford (name given at the time also as Stamford or Sandford) had made a chapel in the house, and involved Catholic priests. There were hostile attentions from April 1686. 
The chapel's activity came to an end in 1688. When Charles Petre SJ, brother of Edward Petre, preached there on 30 September against the King James Version, there was a riot, on which John Evelyn reported: Petre was removed from the pulpit, which was damaged, as was the altar. The chapel was protected against another attack on 29 October, by the trained bands and the watch. 
Following the Glorious Revolution, James Stanford moved to Lancashire, where he lived in the Ribble Valley area. He had raised funds for Catholic churches in London, but the Elector Palatine wanted nothing to do with those efforts. Some of his papers passed into the Tempest Manuscripts, of Stephen Tempest of Broughton Hall, Skipton in Yorkshire. 
Stanford (name recorded as "Stanphord") died on 6 December 1695 at Stydd. He was then of Clayton-le-Dale, and left a charitable foundation, "Stanford's Dole", with money to provide support for the poor, especially Catholics, of Stydd, Ribchester and the adjacent manor of Bailey. At this period, Catholic charitable bequests were hedged around by legal restrictions. 
El Salvador is an electoral parish (parroquia electorale urban) or district of Quito, the capital city of Ecuador.  The parish was established as a result of the October 2004 political elections when the city was divided into 19 urban electoral parishes. 
A four-wire terminating set (4WTS) is a balanced transformer used to perform a conversion between four-wire and two-wire operation in telecommunication systems. 
For example, a 4-wire circuit may, by means of a 4-wire terminating set, be connected to a 2-wire telephone set. Also, a pair of 4-wire terminating sets may be used to introduce an intermediate 4-wire circuit into a 2-wire circuit, in which loop repeaters may be situated to amplify signals in each direction without positive feedback and oscillation.  
The 4WTS differs from a simple hybrid coil in being equipped to adjust its impedance to maximize return loss. 
Kevin Healy is a former Australian rules footballer who played with Collingwood in the Victorian Football League (VFL). 
The list is sortable; the basic order follows the alphabet according to the last name of the victim. 
Three and a half weeks later, his son was also deported to Auschwitz and murdered at the age of 14. Also his mother-in-law was murdered during the Shoah. The fate of his wife is unknown. 
According to the website of Gunter Demnig the Stolpersteine of Prague were posed on 8 October 2008, 7 November 2009, 12 June 2010, 13 to 15 July 2011 and on 17 July 2013 by the artist himself. A further collocation occurred on 28 October 2012, but is not mentioned on Demnig's page. 
Later he played with FK Mladost Podgorica in the Montenegrin First League and next with FK Rudar Prijedor in the Premier League of Bosnia and Herzegovina. 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football midfielder born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chrysoscota is a genus of moths in the family Erebidae. The genus was erected by George Hampson in 1900. 
Nyai Ahmad Dahlan was born Siti Walidah in Kauman, Yogyakarta, in 1872 to Kyai Haji Muhammad Fadli, an ulama (Muslim religious leader) and member of the Sultanate of Yogyakarta; the area housed many religious figures from the palace. She was homeschooled in various aspects of Islam, including Arabic and the Qur'an; she read the Qur'an in the Jawi script. 
Nyai Ahmad Dahlan married her cousin, Ahmad Dahlan. As he was busy developing the Islamic group Muhammadiyah at the time, she followed him in his travels. However, as some of Ahmad Dahlan's reformationist views on Islam were considered radical, the couple at times received threats; for example, before a scheduled trip to Banyuwangi in East Java they received death threats from conservatives there. 
In 1914 she established the prayer group Sopo Tresno (literally Who Loves); she and her husband took turns leading the group in reading the Qur'an and discussing its meaning. Soon she began focusing on passages in the Qur'an that dealt with women's issues. By teaching reading and writing through the group, the couple slowed the Christianization of Java through schools sponsored by the colonial government. 
With her husband and several other Muhammadiyah leaders, Nyai Ahmad Dahlan discussed the formalization of Sopo Tresno as a women's group. Rejecting the first proposal, Fatimah, they decided on the name Aisyiyah, derived from Muhammad's wife Aisha. The new group was formalized on 22 April 1917, with Nyai Ahmad Dahlan as its head. Five years later the organization became a part of Muhammadiyah. 
After Ahmad Dahlan's death in 1923, Nyai Ahmad Dahlan continued to be active in Muhammadiyah and Aisyiyah. In 1926, she chaired the fifteenth Muhammadiyah Congress in Surabaya; she was the first woman to chair such a conference. As a result of widespread media coverage in newspapers such as Pewarta Surabaya and Sin Tit Po, more influential women joined Aisyiyah, while branches opened on other islands in the archipelago. 
Nyai Ahmad Dahlan died at 1 p.m. local time (UTC+7) on 31 May 1946 and was buried behind the Great Mosque of Kauman in Yogyakarta four hours later. State Secretary Abdoel Gaffar Pringgodigdo and Minister of Religion Rasyidi represented the government at her funeral. 
On 10 November 1971, Nyai Ahmad Dahlan was declared a National Heroine of Indonesia by President Suharto with Presidential Decree Number 42/TK of 1971; Ahmad Dahlan had been declared a National Hero ten years earlier. The award was accepted by her granddaughter, M Wardan. She has been compared to women's rights advocate Kartini and guerrillas Cut Nyak Dhien and Cut Nyak Meutia. 
In Hanung Bramantyo's 2010 film Sang Pencerah (The Englightener), Nyai Ahmad Dahlan was played by Zaskia Adya Mecca; Ahmad Dahlan was played by Lukman Sardi. 
Saros cycle series 118 for solar eclipses occurs at the Moon's descending node, repeating every 18 years, 11 days, containing 72 events. All eclipses in this series occurs at the Moon's descending node. 
Umbral eclipses (annular, total and hybrid) can be further classified as either: 1) Central (two limits), 2) Central (one limit) or 3) Non-Central (one limit). The statistical distribution of these classes in Saros series 118 appears in the following table. 
This geographical article about a location in Denizli Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Happiness" is a song by Australian singer-songwriter, music producer, and former child actor Sam Sparro. The song was released on 17 February 2012 as the lead single from his second studio album Return to Paradise (2012). The single was certified platinum by the Belgian Entertainment Association. 
The song hit number one in the Belgian charts. The Magician Remix (by Belgian DJ Stephen Fasano) is the version that is most popular in Belgium (and the one that made the hit list). 
A music video to accompany the release of "Happiness" was first released onto YouTube on 8 March 2012 at a total length of three minutes and seven seconds. 
On 2 March 2012 Sam performed the song live Australian breakfast television program Sunrise. He also performed the song on Australian television variety program Young Talent Time. 
English National Opera (ENO) is an opera company based in London, resident at the London Coliseum in St Martin's Lane. It is one of the two principal opera companies in London, along with the Royal Opera, Covent Garden. ENO's productions are sung in English. The company, formerly known as Sadler's Wells Opera, has long had a policy of commissioning new works, and has staged many world and British premieres. 
Rogaia Mustafa Abusharaf is a Sudanese ethnographer and is Professor of Anthropology at Georgetown University in Qatar. 
Abusharaf was born on 2 October 1961 in Sudan. Her parents Mustafa and Fatima were both teachers. In 1987 she married the academic Mohamed Hussein, they have two children. She was educated at Cairo University, where she was awarded a BA from the School of Social and Political Sciences. She studied at the University of Connecticut for both her MA and her PhD. 
Abusharaf's research focuses on the anthropology of gender, human rights and diaspora issues in Sudan, culture and politics. Migration whether inside Sudan, or externally in a major theme in her research and she has worked on Sudanese migration to North America. Her interest in Sudanese politics has led to a study of Abdel Khaliq Mahgoub, his role in the Sudanese Communist Party and his interpretation of Marxism. 
Violence in the lives of women in Sudan is another area of Abusharaf's research, particularly within politics. This study has extended to research on how violence in Darfur is discussed within Sudan, Qatar and the United States. She has also written about the intersection of gender justice and religion in Sudan. She has worked on interpretations of feminism within the life of the radical Mona Abul-Fadl. 
Abusharaf also researches relationships between Africa and the Gulf region. She has published the first research into migration to pre-oil Qatar, looking to the country's history pre-1930s. 
She has previously been a Visiting Scholar in Human Rights at Harvard Law School. She is co-editor of HAWWA: Journal of Women of the Middle East and Islamic World. 
"Beauty of the Ride" is a song by Sebadoh from their 1996 album Harmacy.  It was released as a CD Single, a 7" vinyl record, and a 10" vinyl record. 
Svensson is known for opposing Europe-wide restrictions on freedom of speech and to prevent perceived gender stereotyping. 
This article about a Member of the European Parliament from Sweden is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nirmala College of Engineering is a private engineering college situated in Kunnappilly, Thrissur district of Kerala, India. The college is affiliated to APJ Abdul Kalam Technological University and University of Calicut. It is situated near the banks of Chalakudy River in the valleys of Athirappilly-Vazhachal range. 
Paulo Roberto was born in Rio de Janeiro, and played as a left back. A Botafogo youth graduate, he spent the vast majority of his career with lower league clubs. 
Paulo Roberto began his managerial career in 1988, with Pouso Alegre FC. He only came into prominence in the early 2000s, after being in charge of Rio Claro while the club achieved successive promotions in the lower levels of the Campeonato Paulista. 
 William Campbell-Taylor is an Anglican minister who became the first candidate standing for any political party to be elected to the Common Council of the City of London Corporation. He won the by-election in Portsoken  for the Labour Party in March 2014 and remained a Common Councilman until the elections of March 2017, after which there were five Labour Common Councilmen. 
He has stated that he has been a victim of stalking and that a number of small blog articles making accusations against him were a smear campaign from his stalker intended to discredit him in his election and damage his name. 
This biography of a United Kingdom religious figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Historically Khangura Jatts held in Nanu Mazara also known as Nano Mazara Sardar Hukam Singh Khangura Son of Sardar Natha Singh Khangura is the first sarpanch of village Nanu Mazara, Ladha Ganja, and parts of Samrari and Mahl in Tehsil Phillaur. There is also a village Toderwal near Nabha distt Patiala which is the Village of all Khanguras. 
The Jathera of the Khangura Jatt Clan is a village Samrari in Jalandhar District Punjab and village Malakpur in Ludhiana District. Jathera is the place of the grave mound of the common ancestor and still worshipped even today by Jats. These sites are also called Wadae Wadhere. 
There also is a village called Akoi Sahib, near Sangrur in Punjab, which almost entirely comprises Jatts of the Khangura clan. One of the great builders of North India, especially of Colonial India's capital New Delhi, was Sardar Rai Bahadur Narain Singh, who belonged to the village Akoi Sahib and was from the Khangura clan.  
They have traditionally, like many Jatts, been farmers. Recently many Khanguras have emigrated to Canada, the United Kingdom, the United States, and there are a few in New Zealand, Italy and Australia. 
They are mostly found in the Jalandhar, Ludhiana and Kapurthala districts of Punjab, and have around 15-25 villages. They are also found In Patiala, Moga, Sangrur Districts in the Malwa Region of Punjab. In western Punjab Pakistan) they are found in Sialkot, Narowal, sheikhupura and Gujranwala District. 
Most recently two brothers who appeared on a channel 4 documentary "Hunted" produced by Shine TV (UK); Harinder Singh & Davinder Singh 
A hydrological code or hydrologic unit code is a sequence of numbers or letters that identify a hydrological feature like a river, river reach, lake, or area like a drainage basin (also called watershed in North America) or catchment. 
One system, developed by Strahler, known as the Strahler stream order, ranks streams based on a hierarchy of tributaries. Each segment of a stream or river within a river network is treated as a node in a tree, with the next segment downstream as its parent. When two first-order streams come together, they form a second-order stream. When two second-order streams come together, they form a third-order stream, and so on. 
Another example is the system of assigning IDs to watersheds devised by Otto Pfafstetter, known as the Pfafstetter Coding System or the Pfafstetter System. Drainage areas are delineated in a hierarchical fashion, with "level 1" watersheds at continental scales, subdivided into smaller level 2 watersheds, which are divided into level 3 watersheds, and so on. Each watershed is assigned a unique number, called a Pfafsetter Code, based on its location within the overall drainage system. 
"Remnant areas" occur along coasts where individual streams are too small for the given subdivision type. Such remnants were combined into a single unit if they were adjacent and could be combined. These "composite" units are called "frontal units". They are non-classic because they have more than one outlet. 
The cross-country team relay is an event at the annual UCI Mountain Bike & Trials World Championships. It has been held since the 1999 championships. 
The keel of Nomadic was laid down in the Harland and Wolff shipyards, Belfast in 1910 (yard number 422). She was built on slipway No. 1 alongside RMS Olympic and RMS Titanic, which were constructed on slipways 2 and 3, of the Arrol Gantry, respectively. She was launched on 25 April 1911 and delivered to the White Star Line on 27 May, following sea trials. 
Nomadic is of steel construction, with steel frames, beams, bulkheads and riveted hull plating. She had four working decks with various hold spaces beneath. She could carry up to 1,000 passengers when fully loaded. 
Passenger accommodation consisted of lower- and upper-deck passenger lounges and open deck areas on the bridge and flying bridge decks. The vessel was divided into first- and second-class passenger areas, with first-class passengers enjoying the fore areas of the ship. A small area in the aft end of the lower deck was assigned for overspill of third-class passengers from SS Traffic. 
Internally, Nomadic was fitted out to a similar standard as the liners Olympic and Titanic, which she was built to serve. As such, she had more luxuries than most tenders of her day, with cushioned benches, tables, porcelain water fountains, sex-specific bathrooms and a buffet bar. She contained ornate decorative joinery and plasterwork, particularly in the first-class lounges of the ship. 
Nomadic was built in the United Kingdom, but as she was operated in French coastal waters by a French crew, she had a number of peculiarities, such as imperial and metric draught marks on opposing sides of the hull. 
During World War I and until 1919, Nomadic was requisitioned by the French government, and she saw service as an auxiliary minesweeper, also ferrying American troops to and from the harbour in Brest (France). After the war, she returned to her tendering duties, but in 1927 she was sold and continued to tender under the ownership of the Compagnie Cherbourgeoise de Transbordement. 
During World War II, Ingenieur Minard again saw service; on 18 June 1940 she took part in the evacuation of Cherbourg. She was subsequently requisitioned by the Royal Navy and based in Portsmouth harbour, she operated as an accommodation ship. 
During the war, Cherbourg port was heavily damaged, so large ocean liners could no longer dock there. Ingenieur Minard was saved from the shipbreakers and again returned to tendering duties for the SCSR from Cherbourg. She served the ocean liners of the day, such as Queen Mary and Queen Elizabeth. She finally retired from these duties on 4 November 1968. 
SS Nomadic left Le Havre to return to Belfast on 12 July 2006, and arrived close to where she was built, on 18 July 2006. The vessel was welcomed back by the Department for Social Development Minister, David Hanson MP and the Deputy Lord Mayor of the City of Belfast, Councillor Ruth Patterson and a number of well-wishers. Nomadic arrived "piggy backed" on a marine transportation barge, which had been contracted by the department. 
The NCT transferred ownership of Nomadic to the Titanic Foundation in April 2015. The ship is now run by Titanic Belfast Nomadic Limited and incorporated into the Titanic Belfast visitor attraction. 
The Nomadic Preservation Society (NPS) was also founded in 2006. Its stated aims include collaboration with the NCT and all other parties involved in preserving Nomadic, including raising and donating funds, conducting historical research and publicising Nomadic as a tourist attraction. 
On appointment, the NCS began essential maintenance works, fund raising and preparation for the planned restoration. 
In August 2008, Nomadic was considered by National Historic Ships and was entered into the National Register of Historic Vessels as part of the National Historic Fleet. This recognises Nomadic's historic significance as the register includes a list of vessels, including Cutty Sark, Mary Rose and the Royal Yacht Britannia. 
In August 2009 Nomadic was moved to Hamilton Graving Dock, on Queen's Road, Belfast. This dry dock, itself a piece of maritime heritage, was partly refurbished in a joint partnership between the Belfast Harbour Commission and Titanic Quarter Ltd. The dock is believed to be where Nomadic was originally fitted out and has now been leased as a permanent location for Nomadic. 
By late 2009 the NCS had sufficient funding to begin major conservation and restoration works. In February 2010, major works commenced with external blasting and priming of the steel hull, preventing further deterioration of the steelwork. 
Nomadic's lifeboats were removed around October 1974 after Vincent moved the ship to Paris. They lay onto the quayside opposite Nomadic for 13 years, being vandalised and having pieces stolen. 
Then, historian Philippe Delaunoy rediscovered the remaining lifeboat. In 2007 it was purchased from the museum. To transport the lifeboat back to Belfast by lorry a special cradle was built to support the boat, and it was taken to Petticrew Marine. Over the next five years the boat hung from a cradle there and slowly returned to its original shape. At the same time funds were being raised to restore the boat, and a grant was awarded from the Heritage Lottery Fund. 
With the lifeboat nearing completion there was some dispute as to how it would be put on public display. Originally the Ulster Folk and Transport Museum had agreed to take it as an exhibit, but they withdrew as there was not space for it. Attempts were made to return the lifeboat to Nomadic, to be displayed alongside her in a weatherproof box, but this was unsuccessful. 
The lifeboat is displayed on the Queen Mary, in Long Beach, California. The lifeboat is near the entrance to the engine room. She arrived in June 2017 and is still there as of 2021, thanks to White Star Memories, who have loaned it to them. 
Fear No ART Presents The Dinner Party is a live arts talk show that features host Elysabeth Alfano sitting down with three individuals from differing creative fields for a conversation over a dinner prepared by a guest chef. It premiered in January 2012. The show is also streamed live online and distributed through TiVo. 
The audience is encouraged to participate in these conversations during the show. Both the live audience and those watching the internet broadcast of show are allowed to use Twitter to ask questions of the guests. Audience members who have their questions "picked" win prizes. 
Each show begins with an opening act. The main show runs for 90 minutes, with host Elysabeth Alfano facilitating conversation between her three guests. Alfano picks guests from a variety of fields to talk about the creative experience. Each guest performs live or has their work featured in some way throughout the course of the show. Additionally, demo videos highlight the food that the chef prepares for the guests and the audience. 
On September 20, 2012, the show was held at Navy Pier as part of the inaugural EXPO Chicago Art Exhibition. 
Injury Time is a novel by English author Beryl Bainbridge and first published in 1977 by Duckworth. It won the 1977 Whitbread Book of the Year Award. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Yerbury was  ordained in 1935.  After a curacy in Kingstown he was Priest in charge at Carriacou. Later he held incumbencies in Antigua before his appointment as Archdeacon. 
This biographical article related to association football in Iceland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
State insects are designated by 48 individual states of the fifty United States. Some states have more than one designated insect, or have multiple categories (e.g., state insect and state butterfly, etc.). Iowa and Michigan are the two states without a designated state insect. 
More than half of the insects chosen are not native to North America, because of the inclusion of three European species (European honey bee, European mantis, and 7-spotted ladybird), each having been chosen by multiple states. 
From at least the 17th century, Dunton Green was a centre for making bricks and tiles. In 1862, the Dunton Green Brick, Tile and Pottery Works was established: a large concern with clayholes or pits, kilns and an engine house. While clay was being dug for, many fossils were discovered. 
Dunton Green railway station provides train services every 30 mins to London Bridge, Waterloo East and London Charing Cross taking around 40-50 mins. 
Otford Station is about a 5 minute drive away and has fast trains running every 30 mins to London Victoria and stopping services running every 30 mins to London Blackfriars. 
Sevenoaks Information provides a comprehensive What's on events diary for Dunton Green and the surrounding area. 
The nearest local Library is in Riverhead and is run by Kent County Council; it has specific week day hours of opening.  You can order library items online for collection and there are telecottage facilities available. 
Digital television has been available for aerials pointing east in Dunton Green since 2006 from the Blue Bell Hill Transmitter for Kent & Sussex TV transmissions, which is also now broadcasting in HD. 
Pappobolus nigrescens is a species of flowering plant in the family Asteraceae. It is found only in Ecuador. Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist montane forests. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
He made his senior debut for Romania in October 2019, after previously being capped at under-17, under-19 and under-21 levels. 
Suspension & Displacement is the fourth studio album by Djam Karet, released in 1991 by HC Productions. 
Mesosindris is a monotypic snout moth genus described by Pierre Viette in 1960. Its only species, Mesosindris paulianalis, described by the same author in the same year, is known from Madagascar. 
John Henry Days is a 2001 novel by American author Colson Whitehead. This is his second full-length work. 
Building the railways that made America, John Henry died with a hammer in his hand moments after competing against a steam drill in a battle of endurance. The story of his death made him a legend. Over a century later, freelance journalist J. Sutter is sent to West Virginia to cover the launch of a new postage stamp at the first John Henry Days festival. 
Maya Jaggi, writing for The Guardian, praised John Henry Days, writing that it is "propelled by the quality of the writing and observation which, together with his serious intent, elevate it above frothier social satire." Writing in The New York Times, novelist Jonathan Franzen likened the novel to Ulysses and Moby-Dick in its "encyclopedic aspirations", but added: "John Henry Days is funny and wise and sumptuously written, but it's only rarely a page turner." 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
The tenth season of NYPD Blue premiered on ABC on September 24, 2002, and concluded on May 20, 2003. 
Andy reaches out to Diane Russell, working now in SVU, to try to get Frank's sister Adrian to open up about her relationship with her father, pointing out that if Michelle is adopted, the same thing will likely happen to her.  When a mild young woman is found dead, her friends and family are unconcerned though her brother-in-law was using her apartment for affairs and her boyfriend is deep in debt to loan sharks.  John and Dr. Jennifer Devlin kindle a torrid relationship. 
Mena Cleary was the daughter of Martin Cleary and Maria Coghlan Cleary. She attended a convent school in Ottawa, Canada, then moved to Boston, where she studied music. She also studied voice in Paris with Giovanni Sbriglia. 
Mena Cleary was a soprano, her voice "by no means powerful but...very sweet," and "managed with rare skill". Cleary was a member of The Bostonians, a performing troupe. She appeared as "Mirabel" in the original cast of the comic opera Prince Ananias by Victor Herbert, when it debuted in 1894. She also appeared in Girofle-Girofla in 1884 Fra Diavolo and The Poachers in 1888, and in Robin Hood, Fatinitza and The Maid of Plymouth in 1894, with the Bostonians. 
Mena Cleary married "millionaire physician, yachtsman, and globe trotter" John Miller Masury in 1897; they divorced in 1909. Mena Cleary Masury died in 1929, aged 62 years, in Brookline, Massachusetts. 
Her sister Louise Cleary married a popular singer, Eugene Cowles, whom she met through Mena Cleary's work (Cowles was also in the original cast of Prince Ananias). Their sister Eleanor Cleary married Gerrit Fort. Another sister, Phillinda A. Cleary, married Harley Ellsworth Cummings. 
The strain AcRS1, which was isolated for the enrichment culture used to describe the species in 1986, was taken from Rio di San Giacomo in Venice, Italy. 
D. hydrogenophilus is most commonly found in anoxic brackish or marine sediments, but has also been found in anoxic freshwater sediments and in activated sludge. 
The area was designated as the Lower Souris National Wildlife Refuge in 1935.  It was renamed to be the J. Clark Salyer National Wildlife Refuge in 1967 in honor of J. Clark Salyer II, who was chief during 1934 to 1961 of the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service's Division of Wildlife Refuges. 
The San Francisco Open was a golf tournament played in the San Francisco area. It was played at a number of different courses in the December to February period. From 1930 to 1941 it was a match-play event before becoming a 72-hole stroke play event from 1942 to 1946. 
A non-PGA Tour event was played in May 1954 at Lake Merced Golf Club and was won by Shelley Mayfield. It was played over 54 holes and had prize money of $10,000. 
This article about a property in Fulton County, Illinois on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Syringaldehyde is an organic compound that occurs in trace amounts widely in nature. Some species of insects use syringaldehyde in their chemical communication systems. Scolytus multistriatus uses it as a signal to find a host tree during oviposition. 
Because it contains many functional groups, it can be classified in many ways -  aromatic, aldehyde, phenol. It is a colorless solid (impure samples appear yellowish) that is soluble in alcohol and polar organic solvents. Its refractive index is 1.53.[citation needed] 
Syringaldehyde is also formed in oak barrels and extracted into whisky, which it gives spicy, smoky, hot and smoldering wood aromas. 
In the late 18th-century, the hospital became an important institution for clinical instruction; Louis Desbois de Rochefort (1750-1786) started a bedside instruction that focused on the patient's symptoms and physical signs as diagnostic indicators, marking a major development in the history of medicine in France. Rochefort was succeeded by his assistant Corvisart in 1788, who questioned the traditional humoral theory, and employed more physical methods such as palpitation and percussion. 
James Apollo (born December 25, 1982) is an American singer, bandleader and producer. He was born in Northwest Arkansas and spent formative years in Minneapolis, San Francisco, New York City and Tennessee. He currently lives and works out of Los Angeles. 
After touring the USA for several years, Apollo was picked up by Marterry Records, which released the debut, "Til Your Feet Bleed." 
First touring Europe with then Brooklyn band Grizzly Bear, James Apollo was invited by Tom Robinson to perform live on the BBC. This led to numerous radio appearances, and a live television session on Channel M in Manchester, gaining the singer a wide audience throughout the UK. He has since continued performing in both the United States and the UK. 
Apollo also contributed the track "One After 909" to Mojo's recreation of The Beatles record Let It Be album, given away free with the September 2010 edition of the magazine. 
Apollo then recorded the vinyl only, "Angels we have Grown apart" which features a number of prominent New York musicians such as members of Antibalas Clifton Hyde, Stefan Zeniuk, and Jesse Selengut. 
James Apollo began working with acclaimed indie artist Damien Jurado who produced the record "Little War, Little Less" which was recorded at the famous Bear Creek Studio in Washington's Cascade Mountains. The album's single "Blessed or Bust" reached No. 17 on the UK singles chart. 
Always an eccentric supporter of music in film, James Apollo was tapped to contribute sounds to 2013's award winning film The Notebook, which showcased some of the artist's epicly dark soundscapes. 
In 2019 James Apollo released "Beat the Mark Inside", a record Clash described as "Strident and passionate, with a full throat and a belly full of fury." It was after this release that James Apollo was invited to tour with LA based Lord Huron, a move which brought Apollo's material to an entirely new audience. 
The Birmingham Independent School of Performing Arts (BISPA) was a private foundation school In Birmingham, England. The School was based at the Old Fire Station in Birmingham which was established in 1912. In 2004 the building was converted into BISPA. 
This West Midlands school or sixth form college related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Farewell, unwashed Russia, Land of slaves, land of masters, And you, blue uniforms, And you, people, devoted to them.  Perhaps beyond the wall of the Caucasus, I will hide from your pashas, From their all-seeing eye, From their all-hearing ears. 
The poem was written in April 1841, when Lermontov was exiled to the Caucasus from St. Petersburg. However, it was first mentioned only on March 9, 1873 in a letter from Pyotr Bartenev to Pyotr Efremov and first published in 1887 in the journal Russkaya Starina by Pavel Viskatov. 
In the 20th century, the poem received a rise in popularity. A number of literary critics have expressed doubts about the authorship of the poem.  In 2017, an international round table dedicated to the issue of authorship was assembled, which included more than twenty leading Lermontovedians. As a result of the round table, a resolution was adopted that confirmed the authorship. 
In 1890, Vladimir Korolenko, speaking about the poem, wrote: "Bright and strong. Lermontov knew how to feel like a free man, he knew how to portray these feelings. In our time, this is already an anachronism, this does not happen anymore! ... Now, even behind the wall of the Caucasus, you can't hide from the all-seeing eyes!" Larissa Volpert said that the poem is "the pinnacle of Lermontov's political lyrics". 
 The East Moreton colonial by-election, 1870 was a by-election held on 19 February 1870 in the electoral district of East Moreton for the Queensland Legislative Assembly. 
Cribb's six-month prediction did not come true. However, Atkin did not complete his term, as he resigned on 7 March 1872 due to serious ill health (pulmonary tuberculosis) and died soon after. 
The release of the single was announced at an AKB48's handshake meeting held at Pacifico Yokohama on 4 February 2017. The list of the 32 members who will participate on the title track was also announced at the same meeting. Haruna Kojima was announced as the center performer for the title track, her first time in two years, and third time overall . 
Four days before official release of "Shoot Sign", AKB48 performed for the first time their 48th and upcoming single "Negaigoto no Mochigusare" during NCON (a school choir contest promoted by NHK). 
The complete version of the music video premiered on Japanese Space Shower TV on March 3, 2017. Lasting 7 minutes and 6 seconds, is directed by Yoshito Mori and is linked directly by the series[clarify]. The main set for this music video is a WIP (World Idol Pro-Wrestling) ring.[a] 
Sang by AKB48's U-19 Senbatsu, with the members being under the age of 19 at the time of this single's release. 
The Brazilian skate (Rajella sadowskii) is a species of fish in the family Rajidae. It is found in Brazil and Chile. Its natural habitat is open seas. It is not well known but is thought to be threatened by bycatch of Patagonian toothfish. 
Beddomixalus is a monotypic genus of frogs in the family Rhacophoridae. The only described species, Beddomixalus bijui, is endemic to the Western Ghats, India. Its name is derived from a combination of the cognomen of Richard Henry Beddome, in honour of his work on the amphibian diversity of the Western Ghats, as well as Ixalus, which is often used as a suffix for names of rhacophorid genera. 
It has a reddish- to orange-brown dorsum with similar dark and light bands and vermiculations as in the male, while its ventral surface is white. 
Tadpoles are small, exotrophic and nektonic. They are oval, depressed and dark pigmented from the snout to the tip of the tail, including their fins. The ventral side is pale pink and less pigmented. Eyes are reddish and of moderate size. The musculus interhyoideus and intestine are visible through the ventrum. Its naris is equidistant from its snout and eye. Its tail fin is moderate and rounded at the end. The lower jaw sheath is V-shaped. 
Tadpoles of this species were observed with completely developed hindlimbs at stage 40, with a pale dorsolateral band appearing at stage 42. Its eyes are bright red and its body pigmentation is a greenish-yellow by stage 44, whilst metamorphs begin emerging on land. During stage 46, froglets are found on swamp vegetation. 
Amplexus is pectoral. Eggs are non-pigmented and semiterrestrial, with an average diameter of 3.2mm. They are scattered on moist soil or a grassy substrate. Total clutch size was observed as 175 eggs. 
Hope 7 is the self-titled debut album from the pop rock band Hope 7. The album was released on March 15, 2005, and is the band's only album release to date. The tracks on this album were mainly written by Antonina Armato and Tim James (with the exception of tracks 3, which was written by Aaron Dudley and track 7 (which was written by Kristi McClave (the band's lead vocalist) and Dave Noble (Hope 7's guitarist). McClave also collaborated on the writing of track 8. 
He was born on July 17, 1967 in Sofia. He played professionally for the senior teams of Levski, Slavia and Svoge between 1986 and 1991. In 1994, Papazov was elected as president of the Slavia basketball club. The team won the Bulgarian Championship and the Bulgarian Cup in 1997. He has been the coach of the men's team "Levski" and "Academic" and the male and female national teams of Bulgaria. Papazov is married and has two sons. 
James David Maslow (born July 16, 1990) is an American actor and singer. He played the role of James Diamond on Nickelodeon's Big Time Rush, had roles in Getaway and The Frozen Ground, and is a member of the boyband Big Time Rush.  
In 2014, Maslow competed as a contestant on the eighteenth season of Dancing with the Stars, in which he reached fourth place. In 2018, Maslow was cast as one of the celebrity houseguests on the first American edition of Celebrity Big Brother where Maslow finished in 6th place. 
Maslow was born in New York City, New York and raised in La Jolla, California. Born to a Jewish father and Catholic mother, Maslow was raised Jewish. 
Maslow and Big Time Rush have a third album called 24/Seven which was released on June 11, 2013. The band promoted the album with the tour shared with Victoria Justice called the Summer Break Tour. which began on June 21 and ended on August 15. On late Winter 2014, Maslow and the band went to their latest tour called "Big Time Rush Live 2014 World Tour", where they performed in Texas and 7 countries in Latin America. 
Most recently, on April 26, 2019, Maslow released "Love U Sober", and announced that he is about to start releasing more singles. 
In May 2019, it was announced that Maslow would be starring in independent film We Need to Talk, co-starring Emily Bett Rickards, and written and directed by Todd Wolfe. 
Coladenia maeniata is a species of spread-winged skipper butterflies. It is found in China (north-western Yunnan and western Sichuan). 
16 May 1993: Play-off semi final 1st leg against Portsmouth played at City Ground due to reconstruction work at Filbert Street 
  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Moss was a three-piece English doom metal band that formed in 2001. Influenced by H. P. Lovecraft and the occult, songs usually average the 20 minute mark and incorporate dense and otherworldly atmospheres. Despite the use of extreme bass frequencies, Moss features no bass guitarist. 
Formed in Southampton, England, at the end of 2000, the band consists of Olly Pearson (vocals), Dominic Finbow (guitar) and Chris Chantler (drums). Moss self-released several demo recordings during its early years, the first being in 2001, and also appeared on a number of split records and compilation albums with bands such as Wolfmangler, Nadja, Unearthly Trance, Grief and Torture Wheel. 
On 25 December 2005 the band released its debut album Cthonic Rites on CD via Aurora Borealis Records. Cthonic Rites was produced/recorded in early 2005 at Chuckalumba Studio by Jus Oborn of veteran UK doom metal band Electric Wizard. The first press was available with a live CD-R limited to 115 copies, recorded on 20 August 2005 at the Camden Underworld on the 115th birthday of H. P. Lovecraft. 
The album title of Sub Templum was announced via the band's Myspace, with a release on Rise Above Records to follow on 26 May 2008. The album was eventually released worldwide in June on CD and LP via Rise Above in Europe and Candlelight in the US. Sub Templum was recorded at Foel Studio, Wales and was again produced by Jus Oborn. 
During December 2009 'Eternal Return' was released as a 12" single in special packaging, available in three different versions. This was a co-release between Superfi Records and Fuck Yoga. 
In 2012 Moss began recordings for the album Horrible Night, which was released in March 2013 on Rise Above, followed by their first headlining European tour, including appearances at the Roadburn Festival and a headlinging appearance at the 2nd annual Heavy Days in Doom Town. This was Moss' final album for Rise Above Records, choosing to not re-sign following the release of Horrible Night. 
On 31 October 2014 a 10" EP was released, Carmilla (Marcilla)/Spectral Visions self-released via the band's own Stone Tapes imprint. 
Hall was born in Chadderton, Lancashire, where his parents ran a working men's club. He was educated at St Patrick's School in Oldham and at De La Salle College in Pendleton, Salford. Hall initially worked as a ventriloquist with a boy dummy, named Mickey Finn, and won a talent show aged 15. 
Hall and Lenny continued to work in variety through the 1970s, appearing on television in programmes such as Crackerjack and 3-2-1. From 1977 to 1980, Hall regularly appeared in the educational television programme Reading With Lenny. He wrote the Kevin the Kitten series of children's reading books which accompanied the series. 
Nicolas Turquois (born 27 July 1972) is a French politician of the Democratic Movement (MoDem) who has been serving as a member of the French National Assembly since the 2017 elections, representing the department of Vienne. 
A former farmer and deputy mayor of Ouzilly-Vignolles, Turquois resigned from his post in 2006 after a disagreement with the local president of the Loudun intermunicipal network, after which he joined the Union for French Democracy, which later became MoDem. 
In March 2019, Turquois became a member of the French Commission on the Energy transition. Since 2020, he has been serving as his parliamentary group's co-rapporteur on the government's pension reform plans. 
This article about a Democratic Movement (France) politicians is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Greb served on Kitchener city council from 1917 to 1921, 1924 to 1927, and 1929 to 1931. He died in 1934 and was buried at Woodland Cemetery in Kitchener. 
"Greb Industries Limited fonds". University of Waterloo Library. Special Collections & Archives. 14 April 2014. Retrieved 14 December 2016. 
The architectural style is that prevalent in Moldavia under Stephen. Representative elements include the large vestibule and the colorfully decorated facades. It is the earliest in a series of distinct town churches built by Stephen. 
This article about a property in Pike County, Missouri on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2009, the site of Zwentendorf power station became Austria's largest solar power station with an investment of 1.2 million Euro, with the addition of 1,000 photovoltaic panels. Zwentendorf was intended to be Austria's first nuclear power plant, but after a vote in 1978 prohibiting nuclear power in Austria, was never completed. In September, 2011, Austria's largest solar power station, 2 MW, was under construction in the Niedere Tauern mountain range. 
Austria has also a large capacity of solar heating at its disposal. With more than 3,500 MWthermal the country ranks second in the EU, only behind much larger Germany. 
This article related to members of the fly family Asilidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The legal implications of marketing claims call for caution or overstated claims can lead to regulatory or civil challenges.  In the United States, the Federal Trade Commission provides some guidance on environmental marketing claims. The commission is expected to do an overall review of this guidance, and the legal standards it contains, in 2011. 
Despite these challenges, green marketing has continued to gain adherents, particularly in light of growing global concern about climate change. This concern has led more companies to advertise their commitment to reduce their climate impacts, and the effect this is having on their products and services. 
In 1989, 67 percent of Americans stated that they were willing to pay 5-10 percent more for ecologically compatible products. By 1991, environmentally conscious individuals were willing to pay between 15-20 percent more for green products. Today, more than one-third of Americans say they would pay a little extra for green products 
An important challenge facing marketers is to identify which consumers are willing to pay more for environmentally friendly products. It is apparent that an enhanced knowledge of the profile of this segment of consumers would be extremely useful. 
During the late 1980s, new instruments such as life-cycle assessment (LCA) were invented which allowed ecological considerations to be introduced into marketing decisions. 
The consumer electronics sector provides room for using green marketing to attract new customers. One example of this is HP's promise to cut its global energy use 20 percent by the year 2010. To accomplish this reduction below 2005 levels, The Hewlett-Packard Company announced plans to deliver energy-efficient products and services  and institute energy-efficient operating practices in its facilities worldwide. 
Now companies are offering more eco-friendly alternatives for their customers. Recycled products for example, are one of the most popular alternatives that can benefit the environment. These benefits include sustainable forestry, clean air, energy efficiency, water conservation, and a healthy office. One example, is the E-commerce business and office supply company Shoplet which offers a web tool that allows you to replace similar items in your shopping cart with greener products. 
The Sin City Deciples Motorcycle Club, also known as Sin City Nation, is a mixed race one-percenter outlaw motorcycle club. As one of the most well-known and oldest black outlaw motorcycle clubs in the United States, they have multiple chapters across the nation and have an additional presence in Canada, Europe, Asia, Australia, and South America. Additionally, the organization has many support clubs in across the U.S. in select states. 
The Sin City Deciples Motorcycle Club was founded in Gary, Indiana in 1966. Only later did the club establish a chapter in Las Vegas, commonly known as "Sin City". Members of the group have described the organization as a "one percenter" club. 
Though mostly composed of Mixed race members, the club affirms that it is, in fact, open to men of all races and ethnicities. 
The Sin City Deciples have chapters in the following American states: Alabama, Ohio, Colorado, Michigan, Illinois, Indiana, Virginia, Tennessee, Nevada, Georgia, Kentucky, Wisconsin, Arizona, Pennsylvania, Missouri, South Carolina, Florida, Washington, California and Utah. 
The club is reportedly allied with the Chosen Few Motorcycle Club and the Crips street gang. Some of the group's support clubs include the Saddle Bastards Motorcycle Club, Chauns Motorcycle Club, and the Sin City Titans. The Sin City Deciples are rivals with the Wheels of Soul Motorcycle Club.[circular reference] 
The revenue of the Sin City Deciples reportedly comes from the sale of illicit drugs and they are regarded as a criminal organization by law enforcement. 
On June 7th of 2011, an unidentified biker is spotted throwing a flammable item through the window of the group's Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania clubhouse before departing from the scene in a Harley Davidson motorcycle. 
A road rage conflict occurs between a car driver and an intoxicated Sin City Deciples member James L. Norman in August 18th of 2014 on Highway 41 in Milwaukee, Wisconsin. After believing that the car had cut him off, Norman sped up to the vehicle's side and fired a gunshot through the front window. He was arrested shortly after the incident and charged with attempted homicide, possession of a firearm by a felon and drunken driving. The victim only sustained minor injuries. 
The Sin City Deciples are the subject of a 2019 documentary on Amazon Prime Video entitled Sin City Deciples. They are also featured on another Amazon Prime Video documentary by the name of Ride Free or Die, also released in 2019. The Los Angeles chapter of Sin City Deciples was featured in the 2006 film Crank. 
World Endurance Championship of Drivers was contested over all fifteen races however only six of the races counted towards the World Endurance Championship of Makes. 
Although various classes of cars contested the championship races, only the overall race winners are listed in the table below. 
The World Endurance Championship of Drivers was open to FIA Group 1, Group 2, Group 3, Group 4, Group 5, Group 6, Group C and GTP cars and to IMSA GTX, IMSA GTP, IMSA AAGT, IMSA GTO, IMSA GTU and IMSA RS cars. 
Drivers Championship points were awarded on a 20-19-18-17-16-15-14-13-12-11-10-9-8-7-6-5-4-3-2-1 basis to the first twenty overall finishers at each round. Bonus points were also awarded as follows: 
Only half points were awarded at the shortened Nurbugring round. All points scored were retained towards the championship totals. 
The World Endurance Championship of Makes was open FIA Group 1, Group 2, Group 3, Group 4 and Group 5 cars and to IMSA GTX cars. 
The overall World Endurance Championship of Makes title was won by Lancia. Although both Lancia and Porsche scored 100 points from their best five class results, Lancia was awarded the title based on its six divisional victories against the five scored by Porsche . 
Together (Swedish: Tillsammans) is a Swedish comedy-drama film, which was released to cinemas in Sweden on 25 August 2000. It is Swedish director Lukas Moodysson's second full-length film.  Set in a Stockholm commune called "Tillsammans" (Swedish for "Together") in 1975, it is a satirical view of socialist values and a bittersweet comedy. 
The character "Birger" had previously appeared in another film from the same director. Sten Ljunggren had also played him in the short film 'Talk' (Bara prata lite) in 1997. 
The film received mostly positive reviews from critics. Rotten Tomatoes gives the film a score of 90% based on reviews from 79 critics, with an average rating of 7.2/10. The website's critical consensus reads "Managing to be both satirical and warm-hearted in its look at the inhabitants of a commune, Together successfully captures the spirit of a time." On Metacritic, the film has a weighted average score of 84 out of 100, based on 29 critics, indicating "universal acclaim". 
The New York Times called Together "A funny, graceful and immensely good-natured work", while Salon described it as "The kind of picture that makes you feel that there are many good reasons to actually like mankind." 
The film grossed $6.4 million in Sweden from 880,000 admissions. It grossed $1.3 million in Norway, $1 million in the United States and Canada and almost $1 million in the United Kingdom, for a worldwide total of $14.6 million. 
Located along a stage coach route between Silver King Valley and the East Fork of the Carson River, Centerville was a commercial hub during the 1850s and 1860s.  Described as a "small village" with stores, a tavern, and a hotel called the Centerville House, Centerville supplied local mines with lumber for flumes, bridges, tunnels, fencing, buildings and heating.  Richardson's sawmill was located at Centerville during the 1860s. 
Tumelo Thandokuhle Mathebula (born 24 October 1992), professionally known as Tweezy, is a South African record producer and rapper from Johannesburg, South Africa. 
Tumelo Mathebula moved to Johannesburg in the Gauteng Province after the passing of his parents at the age of 6. He was introduced to a music making software called FL Studio in grade 10 which he thought was a "music making game", he later discovered that it was in fact a music making software. 
He joined a music group called "Ghetto Prophecy" that consisted of 8 members. The group produced a song called "Oh My"  which ranked number 16 on the top 40 songs of YFM and was played frequently on Metro FM as well as 5FM in 2011. The group unfortunately disbanded because of the lack of funding which is when Tweezy decided to venture into the music industry as a producer. 
Following Hochstetter's departure from New Zealand, the Nelson Provincial Council asked Haast to build on the geological work already completed. In particular, he was to focus on identifying valuable minerals in the ranges between Nelson and the Grey River, to scout out travelling routes to Westland, and to complete a topographical map of the area. 
Haast's topographical and geological survey of south west Nelson took eight months, from January to August 1860. His report to the Nelson Provincial Council was published in early 1861 and of note were his discoveries of coal near the present-day town of Westport. He also found that the coal seams discovered by Thomas Brunner in 1848 were of a higher quality than first thought. He found gold in several tributaries of the Upper Buller, and reported on his botanical and zoological findings. 
In 1870, Haast was appointed the curator of Canterbury Museum. The specimens that he collected on his expeditions of earlier years were a key part of the early holdings of the museum. Following the establishment of the Canterbury University College, he lectured in geology from 1873, and was made professor in 1876. 
His Geology of the Provinces of Canterbury and Westland, N.Z., was published in 1879. He was elected fellow of the Royal Society in 1867, and was given a hereditary knighthood by the Emperor of Austria in 1875. He was awarded the Royal Geographical Society's Patron's Gold Medal in 1884 for his explorations in New Zealand. 
Haast travelled to England in 1886, as New Zealand's commissioner to the Colonial and Indian Exhibition in London. While there, he was made Knight Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George for his services. He had previously been made a Companion of the same order three years previously. 
Haast died on 16 August 1887, following his return to Christchurch. He is buried in the grounds of Holy Trinity Church in Stanmore Road, Christchurch. He was survived by his second wife, Mary Dobson, daughter of the Canterbury Provincial Engineer Edward Dobson, and the couple's five children. 
"Misery" is a song by American band Maroon 5. It was released on June 22, 2010 by A&M Octone Records, as the lead single from their third studio album Hands All Over (2010). 
Levine added: "I did a lot of stuff, a lot of stuff is me! But most of it wasn't very dangerous. Although, by the end of the day, even not being hit by things is such a physical thing that I was really kind of beat up. I was like, 'Man, even thinking I got my ass kicked feels like getting my ass kicked.'" 
Robbie Daw from Idolator called director Joseph Kahn a "visual maestro". MTV Buzzworthy also reviewed the video positively, saying: "Adam Levine and model Anne Vyalitsyna make a love-hate relationship look so sexy in Maroon 5's new video, "Misery". 
The song was nominated in the Best Pop Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal category at the 53rd Grammy Awards. 
"Misery" was featured on theatrical trailers of the film The Dilemma and the television shows Dancing with the Stars, Love Bites and Beat Shazam. It was covered by Glee actor Darren Criss and was included on the soundtrack album Glee: The Music Presents the Warblers. The song appears on the video game Rocksmith. 
In 2018, "Misery" became an internet meme when the lyrics "I am in misery" were paired with a Missouri welcome sign, giving the impression that the lyrics were "I am in Missouri". Since then, the meme has grown in popularity, particularly on TikTok and Twitter. 
* Sales figures based on certification alone.^ Shipments figures based on certification alone. Sales+streaming figures based on certification alone. 
The men's double sculls event was part of the rowing programme at the 1924 Summer Olympics. The competition, the third appearance of the event, was held from 15 to 17 July 1924 on the river Seine. 
Nuseibeh was from an aristocratic Arab family descended from the female chieftain Nusaybah bint Ka'ab, an early convert to Islam who defended Muhammed during the Battle of Uhud in 625. The Neuseibeh family were guardians of the Church of the Holy Sepulchre, whose keys had been entrusted to the Nuseibeh family by Saladin in 1192.[citation needed] 
Nuseibeh died of cancer on 22 November 1986 at his home in Jerusalem at the age of 74. He was buried at the gates of the Noble Sanctuary within the confines of Haram as-Sharif Al-Aqsa Mosque. His funeral was attended by thousands of people. 
This article related to members of the insect family Tachinidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
According to Oregon Geographic Names, the name "Beaver Creek" was first used for a school district in this area in the early 1850s. It was named for the creek that flows through the community and into the Willamette River. A post office operated under various names in the locality until 1922, when the name was changed to Beavercreek, the form still used today. Beavercreek's ZIP code is 97004. 
The community is served by the Oregon City School District, Canby School District, Colton School District, and Molalla River School District. Beavercreek Elementary School is located in the Hamlet. 
Just after 1900, the Miller family built a farm house on the corner of what is now Ridge Road and Lower Highland Road. The home was moved to keep it from being destroyed and is being restored by current Beavercreek residents Rick and Kassandra Young. The Miller House was the childhood home of Ava Helen Miller, who married Linus Pauling, the only person to be awarded two unshared Nobel Prizes (for chemistry in 1954 and for peace in 1962). 
Adam Ballou (born May 29, 1992) is an American soccer player and cerebral palsy football player. Ballou has cerebral palsy as a result of an intrauterine stroke, he was diagnosed at six months old. He attended James Madison University, graduating in 2015. He started playing soccer when he was three years old, played rec, advanced and travel. He also played on his high school varsity team, and was team captain his junior and senior years. 
Ballou has been a consistent member of the United States Paralympic National Team since being invited to train with them in March 2007 as a 14-years-old. He has competed at the CP Football World Championships in 2009, 2011, and 2015. He has also represented the United States at the 2012 Summer Paralympics in London. His best performance with the team was a second-place finish at the 2010 Americas Championship. 
Ballou is a CP7 footballer and a regular fixture on the US National Paralympic Team,  where he plays in the midfield. 
Ballou started playing CP football in 2007 after getting invited to train with the national team in March. At the time, he was a 14-years-old. He came to the attention of national selectors after the head coach of the Virginia Beach Mariners asked his coach if he knew of any players with cerebral palsy and his coach replied with Ballou's name and contact details. Because of the rules for CP football, he was not able to earn his first national team  cap until he was a 16-years-old. 
Ballou spent much time preparing for the 2012 Summer Paralympics. When not with the national team, he trained at the Virginia Beach Sportsplex. Having taken a semester off to prepare for the Games, he spent much time in 2012 training with the national team in Chula Vista, California and was formally chosen by national team head coach Jay Hoffman to be on the London bound national team. 
Again, Ballou was called to participate on the national team after being named to the 14 man squad for the 2015 Parapan American Games in Toronto. There, the United States played  Canada, Venezuela, Argentina and Brazil.  He played in the team's match against Canada. He spent parts of 2015 and 2016 training full-time in preparation for the Rio Games. 
Later that year, Ballou was nominated for the 2015 U.S. Soccer's Young Disabled Player of the Year alongside teammate Kevin Hensley and US national amputee football team players Nicolai Calabria and Noah Grove. He lost out Hensley in getting the honor. 
John C. Bonifaz (born 22, June 1966, in Wilmington, DE) is an Amherst-based attorney and political activist specializing in constitutional law and voting rights.  He is the president and co-founder of Free Speech for People. He is also the founder of the National Voting Rights Institute and a former candidate for Massachusetts Secretary of the Commonwealth.  In 1999, he received a MacArthur Fellowship, popularly known as the "genius award." 
Bonifaz wrote the 2004 book Warrior-King: The Case for Impeaching George W. Bush, which chronicles that case and its meaning for the United States Constitution.  The book argues that the Iraq War was illegal. 
Bonifaz is also the founder of the National Voting Rights Institute (NVRI), where he most recently served as general counsel.  In 2006, NVRI formed a partnership with Demos (US think tank), and as of January 1, 2007, Bonifaz signed on as Senior Legal Fellow with Demos.  Founded in 1994, NVRI serves as a prominent legal and public education center dedicated to protecting the right of all citizens to vote and to participate in the electoral process on an equal and meaningful basis. 
For his work with NVRI, he is a 1999 recipient of a MacArthur Foundation Fellowship, also known as a "genius" award.  In awarding the five-year fellowship, the John D. and Catherine T. MacArthur Foundation stated: 
Bonifaz, a public interest lawyer, uses innovative litigation to reexamine campaign finance reform arguments typically debated on first amendment grounds. Through the National Voting Rights Institute, an organization he founded, Bonifaz recasts the legal arguments to focus on fourteenth amendment protections, challenging the relationship between money and politics.
In 2006, John Bonifaz ran for the Democratic nomination to be Secretary of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts in 2006 against incumbent William F. Galvin.  He declared his candidacy on December 1, 2005, before it was known whether Galvin would run for re-election or for governor.  Galvin won the primary election, which was held on September 19, 2006. 
Bonifaz's campaign focused on election reform, promoting clean elections, same day registration, voting rights for minorities, and opposition to privately owned voting machines with proprietary software. 
Following the Citizens United decision, Bonifaz co-founded Free Speech for People with Jeff Clements. "Free Speech For People is a national non-partisan campaign working to restore democracy to the people and to return corporations to their place as economic rather than political entities," to quote the organization's website. Bonifaz and Free Speech for People advocate for a new constitutional amendment to clarify that the Bill of Rights applies to people, not corporations. 
Bonifaz has also litigated international human rights and environmental law cases, and, with his father Cristobal Bonifaz, has litigated against Chevron Corporation regarding pollution in the Lago Agrio oil field in the Ecuadorian Amazon. (Cristobal Bonifaz is a native of Ecuador.) 
A graduate of Brown University in 1987 and Harvard Law School cum laude in 1992, Bonifaz is married to Lissa Pierce Bonifaz. Lissa holds a doctorate in bilingual education. 
Erupa plumbealis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by George Hampson in 1919. It is found in Colombia. 
After being admitted to the Philippine Bar in 1914, he was appointed as a law clerk for the Philippine Commission. He quickly rose through the ranks and was promoted to the position of Chief Clerk of the Department of the Interior in 1917. 
In 1921, Vargas succeeded Vicente Morente as Director-General of the Philippine Carnival Association which ran the Manila Carnival. He was succeeded by Arsenio Luz the following year. 
In 1936, Vargas was appointed by President Manuel L. Quezon as his Executive Secretary, becoming the first in the country to serve in such a position. 
When the Japanese invaded the country in 1941, Vargas was designated to the Department of National Defense as its secretary. A few weeks later, he was appointed by President Manuel Quezon as mayor of the City of Greater Manila in 1941. His responsibilities included administering the open city upon the arrival of occupational troops of the Imperial Japanese Army on January 2, 1942. 
By 1942, Vargas became chairman of the Japanese-sponsored Philippine Executive Commission. During the collaborationist Second Philippine Republic, he was once asked by the Japanese to assume the Presidency, but he declined. He instead served as the regime's Ambassador to Japan. In that position, he was quoted shortly before Japanese troops were driven from Manila as stating that "we know Japan is destined for sure victory and prosperity for ages to come." 
Vargas served as Chairman of the National Planning Commission from 1946 to 1954 and was a member of the Board of Regents of the University of the Philippines from 1961 to 1965. In 1960, the Republic of the Philippines conferred on him the Legion of Honor with the rank of Commander. 
Vargas involvement with Scouting started in 1935 when he became a member of the executive board of the Philippine Council of the Boy Scouts of America. Together with other Philippine Scouting advocates he became one of the charter members of the Boy Scouts of the Philippines in 1936. 
Upon the death of Manuel Camus in 1949, Vargas was unanimously chosen by the National Executive Board to serve as the BSP's President and Chief Scout of the Boy Scouts of the Philippines. He served the position of National President until 1961. He became a member of the World Scout Committee of the World Organization of the Scout Movement from 1951 to 1957. 
Vargas was awarded the Bronze Wolf in 1959 and received other awards including the Silver Tamaraw (Philippines), Silver Fox (Canada), Silver Ibex (Austria), Silver Wolf (UK), and in 1959 also received the highest distinction of the Scout Association of Japan, the Golden Pheasant Award. He also became the first recipient of the Tanglaw ng Kabataan (Light of the Youth) Award of the BSP in 1961. 
The airport is classified as an airport of entry by Nav Canada and is staffed by the Canada Border Services Agency. CBSA officers at this airport can handle general aviation aircraft only, with no more than 15 passengers. 
Torrington railway station was closed for regular passenger services in 1965 under the Beeching Axe. But due to both the China Clay and the milk train traffic, freight trains and the occasional passenger special used the line until 1982. 
Additional Diesel locomotive "TORRINGTON CAVALIER" now on site and being overhauled. Ruston Hornsby last one built in 1969.Ran on diesel/electric power for the first time this month April 2021. 
The future plans of the railway are to build the 300 yard extension and expand its presence at Torrington railway station, with the removal of overgrown vegetation. This would mean they can operate short brake van rides. After this, the railway plans to extend the line towards Bideford railway station. Work has started on extension. 
On October 18, 2011, Amtrak and CSX announced an agreement for Amtrak to lease, operate and maintain the CSX-owned trackage between Poughkeepsie and Schenectady. Amtrak officially assumed control of the line on December 1, 2012. 
The busiest segment of the Empire Corridor is between New York City and Albany with multiple trains per day. 
This article about a church or other Christian place of worship in North Carolina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Image Institute of Technology & Management (IITM), Cuttack is an authorized Learning Center of Punjab Technical University (PTU) offering UGC Recognized IT & Management Degree programs. The institute is a trust registered Under Indian Trust Act 1882. The basic objective of the trust is "to develop managerial and intellectual skill among the youths the nation by creating institutional networks" and thus "further the overall socio- economic development of the  country."   
Phil Joanou (born November 20, 1961) is an American director of film, music videos, and television programs, known in part for his ongoing relationship to the band U2. 
Joanou also collaborated with Tom Petty on two music videos. The first, "You Don't Know How it Feels" won the MTV award for best rock video and the second, "Walls (circus version)" was a part of the "She's the One" soundtrack.  He also directed videos for Whitney Huston and Mariah Carey ("When You Believe") as well as Bon Jovi ("Keep the Faith"). 
After the release of Rattle and Hum, Joanou went on to direct the Irish gangster drama, State of Grace. The film starred Sean Penn, Gary Oldman, Ed Harris, and Robin Wright.. It was released by Orion Pictures in September 1990, the same week as Martin Scorsese's Goodfellas. The film received positive reviews, but was eclipsed by the Scorsese film. 
In 1990 Joanou directed the American version of Michael Apted's British Up documentary series. The original film, as well as this U.S. version followed a group of seven-year-old children to see how they would evolve over the course of their lives, re-visiting them every seven years. The first installment directed by Joanou, Age 7 in America, was hosted by Meryl Streep and introduced on network television by Oprah Winfrey. It went on to win a Peabody award for best documentary that same year. 
In 1991 Joanou directed the psychological thriller, Final Analysis. The film starred Richard Gere and Kim Basinger. The film was shot by Joanou's frequent collaborator Jordan Cronenweth (his last feature film) and featured a reproduction of the interior of the Pigeon Point Lighthouse by the acclaimed production designer Dean Tavoularis. Released in 1992, the film was well received, but turned out to be only a moderate box-office success. 
The second installment of the American Up series, 14 Up in America, was completed in 1998 when Joanou filmed the same children, now 14-years-old. Unfortunately, due to a conflict with a feature film Joanou was directing (Gridiron Gang), rather than wait until the Sony film was finished, Granda Television (the producer of the documentary project), chose to move forward with a different director for Age 21 in America. This installment was never aired in the US and the project was abandoned. 
In the early 2000's Joanou focused on commercial work, directing commercials for Nike, Coke, Gatorade, Bud Light, Honda, Ford, GM, Lexus, Brand Jordan, Sony, UPS, Microsoft, EA, Mercedes, Disney, Visa, MasterCard and many others. 
In 2005 Joanou began production on Gridiron Gang, based on the award-winning documentary that followed the first season of the inaugural football program at Camp Kilpatrick, a juvenile detention center in Los Angeles. The film starred Dwayne Johnson and opened number one in 2006 in both its theatrical run and its home video release. Joanou also directed Chris Tucker's first stand-up comedy special for Netflix in 2013, which was released in 2015. 
His most recent film entitled, The Veil, took Joanou into the horror/mystery genre for Blumhouse, Universal Pictures and Netflix. The film received mostly negative reviews. 
Moore has been Chief News Anchor and Editor since 1972 at KMBC-TV in Kansas City  except for a three-year absence. 
Moore received a B.A. in English from Truman State University in Kirksville, Missouri in 1967. While in college, he was a reporter and weekend editor for the Kirksville Daily Express newspaper.  After college, he worked for United Press International. He started a master's degree program at the University of Missouri when he decided to pursue a career in television.  He joined KMBC-TV in 1968 as a reporter. 
In January of 1972, after 4 years at KMBC, Moore became the primary news anchor until 1979. He had a brief stint in 1980 as a weekend anchor for WLS-TV, the ABC owned-and-operated station in Chicago. He left WLS in 1982 to become co-anchor at KPIX-TV in San Francisco for 2 years; leaving abruptly, possibly related to his lymphoma, a type of cancer.  He returned to KMBC-TV in August 1983. 
Moore has been cited by the Kansas City Media Reporters organization as Best TV news anchor and one of Kansas City's Top 10 Celebrities by Kansas City magazine. 
Moore has participated extensively in fundraising for charities. He was an auctioneer at several fund-raising events, including the University of Missouri Alumni picnic-auction-gala, Conception Seminary, the Valentine Gala to prevent child abuse, the Central City School Fund auction, St. Teresa's Academy auction and the Ozanam premiere gala. He has also participated in fund raising events for the Diocese of Kansas City. 
Moore as served as master of ceremonies of the American Royal Champion Livestock auction and multiple times at the Threads and Threads Gala benefiting the University of Kansas Cancer Institute, where he was treated for lymphoma, a type of cancer  
He has served on the community boards of numerous charitable organization including the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation,  American Cancer Society, Kansas City Community Gardens, National Lost-Child Network, American Royal, Ozanam Home for Boys, St. Patrick's Day parade committee, Avila College and the Kansas City Press Club. Voted as 'Best news Video Jockey' in town. 
This article about a location in the Oromia Region of Ethiopia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2010 season was Rajnavy's eighth season in the top division of Thai football. This article shows statistics of the club's players in the season, and also lists all matches that the club played in the season. 
Updated 7 January 2010  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Ogle Castle was launched at Cowes in 1821. She made two complete voyages to India sailing under a license from the British East India Company (EIC). She was lost with all aboard on 3 November 1825 while returning to London from her third. 
Ogle Castle first appeared in Lloyd's Register (LR) in 1821. In 1813 the EIC had lost its monopoly on the trade between India and Britain. British ships, Ogle Castle being one, were then free to sail to India or the Indian Ocean under a license from the EIC. 
On 28 October 1824 Ogle Castle, Weynton, master, sailed from Gravesend, bound for Bombay. On 8 November she was at Cowes, and she sailed from there on 27 November. On 14 December she was at Madeira and immediately sailed on for Bombay. On 8 February 1825 she arrived at the Cape and sailed from there on the 11th. She arrived at Bombay on 4 May. 
On 3 November 1825 Ogle Castle, inward bound from Bombay for London, stranded on the Goodwin Sands in a heavy gale and broke up, with the loss of over 100 lives. Captain James Weynton, all officers, crew, and passengers drowned. 
It took some days for the wreck to be identified as the Ogle Castle. A report that a French fishing boat had rescued 17 crew men and taken them to Calais proved to be false. 
For some weeks thereafter numerous bales of cotton, and some of silk, from her cargo, as well as some chests, came ashore at Margate, Dover, Ostend, and the Dutch coast. A part of the ship itself came ashore at Nieuport. 
Although some contemporary press reports stated that when she was lost she was sailing on a one-voyage contract for the EIC, the standard references for the EIC's ships do not confirm this. 
This biographical article about a painter from Scotland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The mausoleum is built of plaster and rubble. At the time of construction, it was entire covered with blue, green and white tiles. Turquoise blue was the dominant amongst the other colors. The building is square in plan and has chamfered angles. A hemispherical dome rests on a drum. There is no mihrab (a niche in a wall indicating the direction in which Muslims pray) inside the building. It also contains semi-octagonal angled alcoves. 
The drum from which the dome rises is cylindrical externally and circular internally. Red stone bricks have been used in the construction of the drum. The sotiff of the dome contains an arabesque design made using blue and red coloured tiles. The brick built dome is complementary to its drum. The dome was covered with turquoise blue tiles. From these, the building gets its name Nila Gumbad which in English translates to "Blue Dome". A kalasa finial crowns the dome. 
The HTC Desire 816 is a mid ranged  Android-based smartphone designed and manufactured by HTC. Announced at the 2014 Mobile World Congress in Barcelona, Spain, it features a 5.5-inch super LCD 2 display with a 1280x720 resolution, with full HD video recording and play-back. 
In March, HTC revamped its sense home to a version 7.  Users can create their own phone theme or can access and  use various themes, wallpapers, sounds.  This works best with HTC Sense 7 and the HTC "zoe" feature fully active. New power saving and extreme power saving options extend battery life or when the users need to ward off from switching off the phone due to low battery level. 
HTC also launched new HTC Desire 816G in September that runs on Android 4.4 KitKat OS and a Mediatek processor. HTC Desire 820 is the successor of desire 816. 
Eleanor (1996) is a children's picture book biography of Eleanor Roosevelt's childhood, written by Barbara Cooney, describing her as a shy girl who goes on to do great things. 
Monte Accellica is located within the Terminio Cervialto Mountain Community, as well as Monti Picentini Regional Park. Part of the southern face of the mountain is included in the Oasi Monte Accellica natural reserve, managed by WWF Italia. 
Burnin' Down the House: Live at the House of Blues is the third live album by Etta James and her twenty-eighth album overall, released in 2002. The album reached a peak position of number one on Billboard's Top Blues Albums chart. 
A few of the cover songs on this album were also featured on some of James' past albums: Leave Your Hat On was on Etta James (1973), Your Good Thing Is About To End was on Stickin' to My Guns (1990), Rock Me Baby was on a previous live album Etta, Red-Hot & Live. 
Sanford is a lunar impact crater that is located in the northern latitudes on the Moon's far side. It lies to the south-southeast of the crater Klute, and just to the west-northwest of Teisserenc. To the southwest lies Joule. 
This is a circular crater formation with a worn outer rim. A pair of small craterlets lies along the eastern rim, and the satellite crater Sanford C is attached to the outer edge along the north-northwest. Attached to the southern exterior is what may be the remains of a larger, unnamed crater that is now considerably eroded. 
By convention these features are identified on lunar maps by placing the letter on the side of the crater midpoint that is closest to Sanford. 
In mathematics, an exponential sum may be a finite Fourier series (i.e. a trigonometric polynomial), or other finite sum formed using the exponential function, usually expressed by means of the function 
it is the same as allowing exponents that are complex numbers. Both forms are certainly useful in applications. A large part of twentieth century analytic number theory was devoted to finding good estimates for these sums, a trend started by basic work of Hermann Weyl in diophantine approximation. 
by the triangle inequality, since each summand has absolute value 1. In applications one would like to do better. That involves proving some cancellation takes place, or in other words that this sum of complex numbers on the unit circle is not of numbers all with the same argument. The best that is reasonable to hope for is an estimate of the form 
which signifies, up to the implied constant in the big O notation, that the sum resembles a random walk in two dimensions. 
Such an estimate can be considered ideal; it is unattainable in many of the major problems, and estimates 
have to be used, where the o(N) function represents only a small saving on the trivial estimate. A typical 'small saving' may be a factor of log(N), for example. Even such a minor-seeming result in the right direction has to be referred all the way back to the structure of the initial sequence xn, to show a degree of randomness. The techniques involved are ingenious and subtle. 
was previously studied by Weyl himself, he developed a method to express the sum as the value     G ( 0 )   {\displaystyle G(0)}  , where 'G' can be defined via a linear differential equation similar to Dyson equation obtained via summation by parts. 
The large sieve method (c.1960), the work of many researchers, is a relatively transparent general principle; but no one method has general application. 
Many types of sums are used in formulating particular problems; applications require usually a reduction to some known type, often by ingenious manipulations. Partial summation can be used to remove coefficients an, in many cases. 
Auxiliary types of sums occur in the theory, for example character sums; going back to Harold Davenport's thesis. The Weil conjectures had major applications to complete sums with domain restricted by polynomial conditions (i.e., along an algebraic variety over a finite field). 
according to Weyl's equidistribution criterion. A basic advance was Weyl's inequality for such sums, for polynomial f. 
There is a general theory of exponent pairs, which formulates estimates. An important case is where f is logarithmic, in relation with the Riemann zeta function.  See also equidistribution theorem. 
This is the ideal degree of cancellation one could hope for without any a priori knowledge of the structure of the sum, since it matches the scaling of a random walk. 
Vietnam competed at the 2010 Summer Youth Olympics, the inaugural Youth Olympic Games, held in Singapore from 14 August to 26 August 2010. 
The Vietnamese team comprised 13 athletes competing in 7 sports: aquatics (swimming), athletics, shooting, badminton, taekwondo, wrestling, weightlifting. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
During the prior season, Sevilla finished sixth in La Liga. Since the winners of the Copa del Rey, Valencia, also qualified for European competition based on league position, the spot awarded to the cup winners (Europa League group stage) was passed to the sixth-placed team. 
Last updated: 21 August 2020Source: ESPNFC.comOnly competitive matches = Number of bookings;  = Number of sending offs after a second yellow card;  = Number of sending offs by a direct red card. 
Jacques Mersereau was a set decorator. He was nominated an Academy Award in the category Best Art Direction for the film Thousands Cheer. 
The Minnesota State Bar Association is a voluntary bar association for the state of Minnesota, including as members lawyers, judges, and other legal practitioners, such as clerks, registrars, and paralegals.  The MSBA is one of the oldest state bar associations in the United States. Membership is not required to practice law in Minnesota. 
Approximately every four years, the MSBA Assembly elects officers from the Hennepin County Bar Association, the Ramsey County Bar Association, the outstate bar associations (collectively), and a single at-large position. The officer is elected as Secretary, then advances to Treasurer, and then President-Elect, and eventually President. 
The directors of the MSBA, under the guidance of the executive director, have the responsibility of carrying out the day-to-day operations of the association. The directors are responsible for supervising staff and setting and communicating goals and standards. 
Pulchrana picturata, also known as the spotted stream frog, is a species of frog in the family Ranidae. It is endemic to Borneo (Brunei, Indonesia, and Malaysia). 
Pulchrana picturata (in the broad sense, including populations from the Malay Peninsula and Sumatra now assigned to Pulchrana sundabarat) is a riparian species that inhabits lowland forests where they can be found along streams or small rivers. Males are usually heard calling from stream banks, within root tangles, rock overhangs or crevices or perched on low vegetation, rocks, logs or broken branches. 
This list of current cities, towns, unincorporated communities, counties, and other recognized places in the U.S. state of Pennsylvania also includes information on the number and names of counties in which the place lies, and its lower and upper zip code bounds, if applicable. 
Perikhanian was born in Moscow on 24 April 1928 to Georg and Arusyak Perikhanian. She attended school in Moscow and pursued further education in the Armenian SSR. From 1945 to 1948, Perikhanian studied Middle Persian (Pahlavi) at Yerevan State University with Rouben Abrahamian. She subsequently moved to Leningrad (Saint Petersburg), and finished her postgraduate at Leningrad State University (Saint Petersburg State University) in 1951. 
In addition to her work on many aspects of ancient and medieval Iran, Perikhanian was also interested in ancient inscriptions of Asia Minor and the Middle East, as well as Middle Iranian languages and Armenian language. She also spent much time researching Armenian philology and etymology, especially in relation to Iranian loanwords in the Armenian language, and contributed to the understanding of Aramaic inscriptions found in Armenia. 
The road has existed as Starr Valley Road since 1962, even before I-80 replaced U.S. Route 40 (US 40) in the area. After I-80 was designated in the area, the bridge over I-80 in Deeth was completed in 1965, and the bridge at the east terminus in 1968. The bridges over the Humboldt and Mary's Rivers were completed in 1983. It was not until 1992, however, until this road was formally designated a state highway by NDOT. Since establishment, the alignment of the route has not changed. 
On the liner notes of Herb Alpert's "Definitive Hits" for the song "Tijuana Taxi" Herb Alpert wrote: "(Tijuana Taxi) was written by Bud Coleman who also played guitar and mandolin on many Tijuana Brass recordings until his untimely death. Bud wrote some great songs for us, but this one had a fabulous visual image of a Tijuana Taxi moving off a road and taking short cuts through the fields of Tijuana, Mexico." 
He died in 1967 from surgical complications. The song "Bud" is a tribute song for Coleman. It was released on Herb Alpert And The Tijuana Brass 1967 album, Herb Alpert's Ninth. Coleman's widow, Eleanor, was given co-writing credits for this song. Julius Wechter's Baja Marimba Band also recorded a tribute song entitled "For Bud" on their 1968 album Do You Know The Way To San Jose. His son, Gregory was an accomplished guitarist and musician. 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football forward, born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pontyclun Football Club is an amateur Welsh football club, founded in 1896 which plays its matches at Ivor Park, Pontyclun. It plays in the Ardal Leagues South West, the third tier of the Welsh football pyramid. 
In its early years, the club played in the Bridgend League and the Cardiff & District League. In 1922, it was then admitted to the Football Association of Wales, one of the few amateur clubs at the time to achieve such status. Within a few years, the FAW adopted Pontyclun's motto 'Gorau chwarae, cyd chwarae' (roughly translated as 'the best players play together') as its own. 
In 1968, the club was admitted to the Welsh Football League (then the premier league in Wales). At the same time, Pontyclun continued to run teams in both the Rhondda and Pontypridd leagues. 
Craig Williams was capped by the Boys Clubs of Wales in 2002 as well as representing the Swansea City and Cardiff City Youth teams. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In the JRA Awards for 2011 Deep Brillante finished third behind Alfredo and Adam's Peak in the poll to determine the champion Japanese two-year-old colt of 2011. 
After his win at Tokyo, Deep Brillante's connections took the unusual decision to send the colt to England and match him against older horses in the King George VI and Queen Elizabeth Stakes at Ascot Racecourse on 21 July. He started a 20/1 outsider and was never in contention, finishing eighth of the ten runners behind the German mare Danedream. 
Deep Brillante's retirement was announced on 26 October. Yahagi commented "It's a terrible shame that the fans won't be able to see him race again. The little more than a year that I spent with this horse has been like a dream and for me he was nothing short of a treasure." 
After being retirement from racing Deep Brillante became a breeding stallion at the Shadai Stallion Station. His first crop of foals was born in 2014. 
By 1930 the population peaked at 148. After World War II ended in 1945 the population steadily declined, with shops and then the school being closed. Today about thirty full-time residents remain. 
He received an education in law in England and Germany, was called to the English Bar at the Middle Temple in 1865, and in 1866 was admitted as an advocate in Cape Town. He soon moved to Grahamstown, where he built up a large and successful practice. 
In 1875, he was named to act as a judge in the Griqualand West Land Court by High Commissioner Sir Henry Barkly. Griqualand West had recently been annexed by Britain and the Land Court was established to rule on questions of land title within the territory. This was controversial work, as the principal diamond fields lay within Griqualand West, and the rulings of the court would naturally influence the access that neighbouring states would have to this resource. 
Like his father Andries had a keen interest in politics, and in the final few years before his premature death he became increasingly involved in government. 
He initially contested the Grahamstown parliamentary seat in 1876, but lost it to Richard Southey.  He was appointed Attorney-General for the government of Prime Minister John Molteno in 1877, to replace Simeon Jacobs who had retired due to ill health. However he tendered his resignation in 1878, in support of Molteno's fight against British interference in the Cape's government.  Later in 1878 he succeeded in being elected MP for Albert (Burgersdorp), and was reappointed judge in 1879. 
The series was created and produced by the husband and wife team of Frank and Anne Hummert, based on the 1923 novel Stella Dallas by Olive Higgins Prouty. The 15-minute drama began on October 25, 1937, as a local show on WEAF in New York City, in the wake of the successful movie version starring Barbara Stanwyck, and it was picked up by the NBC Radio network beginning June 6, 1938, running weekday afternoons. 
The radio play inspired the name of the home furnishing store Stella Dallas in Dallas, Texas.[citation needed] 
Announcers for Stella Dallas were Ford Bond, Frank Gallop, Howard Claney, Jimmy Wallington, Jack Costello, and Roger Krupp. Directors included Ernest Ricca, Richard Leonard, and Norman Sweetser. 
Dracophyllum is a genus in the family Ericaceae published by Labill in Voy. 2: 210. T. 40 (1798), with 61 species and 2 varieties.  
The first two specimens of the genus Dracophyllum were collected by J.R. Forster and his son J. G. A. Forster in March 1773 in Fiordland, New Zealand and described as two different species Epacris longifolia (Dracophyllum longifolium) and Epacris rosmarinifolia (Dracophyllum rosmarinifolium). Now the genus Epacris is used to describe an endemic Australian genus of 40 species other than the one published by the Forsters. 
Diet member and former Minister of State for Financial Services Yuji Yamamoto is an advisor to the firm. 
With a large number of qualified Japanese and foreign lawyers, Atsumi & Sakai can advise on New York and California state law, U.S. federal law, German law, Chinese law, Queensland state law, Australian federal law, English and Wale law, Indian law and Taiwanese law. 
KIUL (1240 AM) is a radio station  broadcasting a News Talk Information format. Licensed to Garden City, Kansas, United States, the station serves southwestern Kansas.  The station is currently owned by Steckline Communications and features programming from ESPN Radio, Fox News Radio, Premiere Radio Networks, and Westwood One. 
Most of KIUL's programming is simulcast on KYUL, 1310 AM, in Scott City, Kansas. Prior to Steckline's acquisition, the station's call sign was KFLA. 
In October 1947, the Federal Communications Commission approved the sale of KIUL by Frank D. Conard to The Telegram Publishing Company for $42,000. 
The individual members of Angel Investigations are called to action. Cordelia, Wesley and Angel meet at a gym to stop some demons attempting a human sacrifice. Meanwhile Lilah visits Lindsey's office where Darla is listening to classical music. She can feel Angel nearby, and Lindsey wants revenge against him. 
Angel returns to Cordelia's apartment and removes the board they had been keeping track of their kills on. Wesley agrees that keeping score was a mistake - it's a job, not a race. Angel goes to visit Faith, now serving a long prison term, and they talk about redemption. 
A vaudeville performer, Taylor made his film debut in 1938 as the cheerful ex-football captain Ed Carmichael in Frank Capra's You Can't Take It with You. He secured the part because the role required an actor who could play the xylophone. During the 1950s and early 1960s, he used his xylophone skills on several television shows, including the syndicated series Ranch Party. 
In 1939 he appeared in the film Taming of the West, where he originated the character of Cannonball, a role he played for the next 10 years in over 50 films. Cannonball was a comedic sidekick to Wild Bill Elliott in 13 features. He played the character in other westerns starring Charles Starrett, Russell Hayden, Tex Ritter and Jimmy Wakely. Taylor later dropped the Cannonball name because he felt it held him back from roles in films with larger budgets. 
He had bit parts in a number of classic motion pictures, including Mr. Smith Goes to Washington (1939), A Star Is Born (1954) and Them! (1954). 
The 1954 film Dragnet had Taylor in an uncredited role, that of gangster Miller Starkie, who is killed in the opening scene. He had a small role in the 1958 Walt Disney film Tonka as a rustler of stray horses for sale. The same year, he performed in No Time for Sergeants as the representative of the draft board who summoned Will Stockdale (Andy Griffith) from his rural home in Georgia to the United States Air Force. 
He portrayed an ill-tempered chuckwagon cook in the 1969 film The Undefeated, starring John Wayne and Rock Hudson, and appeared in Support Your Local Gunfighter (1971) as the drunken Doc Shultz. 
He appeared in Back to the Future Part III (1990) with veteran Western actors Pat Buttram and Harry Carey Jr.. Taylor's last film role was in Maverick (1994), and although he had only a fleeting appearance as an unnamed "Room Clerk", his name appears in the film's opening credits. 
In the 1950s, he guest-starred three times on the syndicated series The Range Rider, starring Jock Mahoney and Dick Jones. He appeared in the 1955 episode "The Outlander" of Cheyenne, and on the syndicated series Death Valley Days playing the Colorado silver miner "Chicken Bill" Lovell. 
Taylor performed on other sitcoms, including Hazel with Shirley Booth. His character, Mitch Brady, was owner of a local cab company and a frequent boyfriend of Hazel's. He was cast in an episode of I Love Lucy, and on The Brian Keith Show, and in a fourth-season episode of The Cosby Show. He was on NBC's series Laredo and The High Chaparral. 
Taylor played Houston Lamb in four episodes of Little House On The Prairie in seasons six and seven (1979 to 1981). He appeared on Hee Haw for six seasons, from 1985 to 1991, where he was mostly seen as a regular in the Lulu's Truck Stop skit featuring Lulu Roman and Gailard Sartain. Taylor was in several episodes of Designing Women as a rustic enamored with the women from Sugarbaker's during a camping expedition. 
Starting in the late 1970s, Taylor appeared in a series of Western-style commercials for Hubba Bubba bubble gum.[citation needed] In the radio versions of the commercials, his character was named "The Geezer".[citation needed] 
In 1994, he appeared in a commercial for Pace Foods, performing as one of four participants in a fair's "Dip-Off" contest, where  two other competitors and he use their "secret ingredient" of Pace Picante Sauce in their dips. When the fourth participant holds up a jar of "Mexican sauce" as a "secret ingredient", Taylor's character proclaims that it was "made in New York City!" 
Taylor died of a heart attack on October 3, 1994, in Los Angeles. He was cremated, and his ashes were scattered near Westlake Village, California.[citation needed] 
De Vlugt is situated on the banks of the Keurbooms River, approximately 55 km north of Knysna. It originated as a construction camp for the 270 convicts who built the Prince Alfred Pass in 1861. Later a small community emerged around the camp. 
You and Your Sister is the debut album by the American band the Vulgar Boatmen, released in 1989. The Vulgar Boatmen, at the time of the album, constituted two bands: one based in Florida and one based in Indiana. 
The album's songs were written by Dale Lawrence and Robert Ray. Ray, based in Florida, and Lawrence, based in Indiana, sent songs through the mail. Aside from a few tracks recorded in Indiana, the majority of the album was made at Ray's Gainesville, Florida, home studio. You and Your Sister was coproduced by Ray and Walter Salas-Humara. 
Colungo is a municipality located in the province of Huesca, Aragon, Spain. According to the 2018 census (INE), the municipality has a population of 114 inhabitants. 
This article about a location in the Province of Huesca is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
8 Star Motorsports LLC is a sports car racing team founded by racing driver Enzo Potolicchio in 2012. The team currently races in the United SportsCar Championship PC class and the Cooper Tires Prototype Lites L1. 
The team also raced in the LMGTE Am class of the 2013 FIA World Endurance Championship. Team principal Enzo Potolicchio and Rui Aguas raced all rounds of the championship supported by various drivers. The Ferrari 458 Italia won its class at the 2013 6 Hours of Spa-Francorchamps and 2013 6 Hours of Shanghai. At the 2013 24 Hours of Le Mans the team finished second in class. The team led several laps and finished tenth. 
For 2014 the team joined the newly formed United SportsCar Championship in the PC class. Sean Rayhall, graduating from the IMSA Lites, joined the team full-time. The team fielded two cars at the 2014 24 Hours of Daytona. The car driven by Enzo Potolicchio, Tom Kimber-Smith and Michael Marsal finished tenth overall, second in class. 
Rayhall and Luis Diaz scored the team's first win in United SportsCar Championship at Virginia International Raceway and repeated one race later at Circuit of The Americas. 8Star finished 2nd in the PC Teams Championship. 
In the IMSA Lites championship 8 Start Motorsports solely competed at Sebring International Raceway. Christian Potolocchio retired both races. 
The organ virtuoso was known in Berlin for his "groundbreaking" concerts. Among his performances were over 550 free weekly concerts, at which he performed, among others, compositions by Josef Rheinberger's In 1909 Irrgang made a concert tour to Sweden. 
23 Hours is a 2009 vampire novel written by David Wellington. It is a sequel to 2008's Vampire Zero. 
Publishers Weekly said "Wellington's deadpan humor enlivens the satirical goth-gore proceedings as Laura battles the half-dead and their evil leader". 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Prior to his appointment at Exeter, Moorhead was the first Chair of Law and Professional Ethics and Vice Dean (Research) in the Faculty of Laws at University College London (UCL). His work focuses on lawyers, their ethics, regulation and professional competence. He is the co-editor of  After Universalism: Re-Engineering Access to Justice.  
Moorhead is also a poet whose work has been featured in periodicals.  His first pamphlet, the Reluctant Vegetarian (Oystercatcher Press) was shortlisted for the Michael Marks Award.  His second, the Word Museum is published by Flarestack Poets. 
Moorhead left UCL to join the University of Exeter as its Head of Law in 2019. He stepped down from the role less than two years later, to be replaced by Professor Sue Prince. The reason for his departure was not stated publicly. 
NC 610 was established in 1930 as a connector route running from US 311/NC 77 to its parent route NC 61, following its present-day routing. By 1940, NC 61 was replaced with NC 62 forming the current eastern terminus of the highway. On September 8, 2011, US 311 was deleted along Main Street and placed along a new freeway concurrency with I-74. This left the western terminus of NC 610 without an official highway designation. 
The Volga class is a class of Russian river passenger ships. It is named after the first ship in the class Volga, which in her turn was named after Volga River. 
Many digital cameras have a display setting and possibly a physical dial whereby the photographer can set the camera to either over or under expose the subject by up to three f-stops (f-numbers) in 1/3 stop intervals. Each number on the scale (1,2,3) represents one f-stop, decreasing the exposure by one f-stop will halve the amount of light reaching the sensor. The dots in between the numbers represent 1/3 of an f-stop. 
Exposure can be adjusted by changing either the lens aperture or the exposure time; which one is changed usually depends on the camera's exposure mode. If the mode is aperture priority, exposure compensation changes the exposure time; if the mode is shutter priority, the aperture is changed. If a flash is being used, some cameras will adjust flash output as well. 
Many modern cameras incorporate metering systems that measure scene contrast as well as average luminance, and employ sophisticated algorithms to infer the appropriate exposure from these data. In scenes with very unusual lighting, however, these metering systems sometimes cannot match the judgment of a skilled photographer, so exposure compensation still may be needed. 
On March 12, 1864, voting took place for members of a new organization, and on April 1, a committee consisting of Waite, Buel, Brainerd, and Packard began preparing a new constitution. By April 6, Buel presented monograms for two new names, Theta Xi and Theta Psi. Theta Xi was chosen because of local fraternity called Theta Psi at Yale. 
Within its first forty years, six chapters were established at Yale, Stevens Institute of Technology, MIT, Columbia University, Cornell University, and Lehigh University. It was not until 1905 that a westward expansion occurred with chapters at Purdue and, a month later, Washington University in St. Louis. The first west coast chapter came in 1910 at UC Berkeley, and in April 1921, the first southern chapter was founded at LSU. 
In 1974, the Beta Alpha chapter at Georgia Tech became a Christian chapter while remaining a full member of Theta Xi and the Georgia Tech IFC. The chapter remains Christian today and is the only Christian chapter of a secular national fraternity in the United States. Their model expanded to the Gamma Phi chapter at Georgia Southern University in 2008, however that chapter has since reverted to the traditional non-religious status.[circular reference] 
The Theta Xi Fraternity Chapter House at Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2013. 
In 2014, Theta Xi celebrated its sesquicentennial. In honor of this occasion, the National Convention was held in Troy, New York to commemorate the founding of Theta Xi. 
William S. Mason, considered to be one of the greatest benefactors and supporters of Theta Xi, was the main supporter of the fraternity's adoption of Benjamin Franklin as its patron saint. 
These charities are a mainstay among all chapters of the fraternity, as well as the numerous other charities supported by individual chapters. On June 20, 1986 Theta Xi was named the Outstanding Volunteer Organization for 1985-86 by the National Multiple Sclerosis Society. Theta Xi takes exceptional pride in its members' involvement in these and other charities. 
Jennifer Capriati Tennis (known as The Tennis Tournament: Grandslam in Europe) is a Sega Genesis video game developed by System Sacom and released in 1992. In 1994 it was released in the classic range by Sega as Grandslam (Classic). The game is named after Jennifer Capriati, one of the world's top-ranked female tennis players at the WTA Tour during the time of the game's release. 
A gamer can create their own player by choosing their race, gender, and tennis wear color. In addition to this, the game can be played by either one or two players. There can be doubles and singles matches, in addition to numerous tournaments. Tournaments take place in various locations around the world, including Florida, London, Paris and Sydney. 
The following human genes encode Kruppel-like factors: KLF1,  KLF2,  KLF3,  KLF4,  KLF5,  KLF6,  KLF7,  KLF8,  KLF9, KLF10, KLF11,  KLF12,  KLF13,  KLF14,  KLF15,  KLF16,  KLF17 
Note that although KLF14 was an alias for Sp6 (Q3SY56), it now refers to a protein (Q8TD94) derived from KLF16 by a retrotransposon event. 
KLFs are divided into three subgroups; Group 1 (KLF 3,8, and 12) are repressors via interaction with the C-terminal Binding Protein 1 and 2 (CtBP1 and CtBP2). Group 2 (KLFs 1,2,4,5,6, and 7) are transcription activators. Group 3 (KLFs 9,10,11,13,12, and 16) have repressor activity via interaction with the common transcriptional co-repressor, Sin3A. KLFs 15 and 17 are distantly related without any defined protein interaction motifs. 
The Sp family members diverged from KLFs since Filozoa. They are typically divided into two groups of Sp1-4 and Sp5-9. One of the signatures is the "Btd box" CxCPxC preceding the KLF-DBD. 
KLF3 has a short motif in the N-terminus (of the form Proline-Isoleucine-Aspartate-Leucine-Serine or PIDLS) that recruits CtBP1 and 2. CtBP in turn recruits histone modifying enzymes. It brings in histone deacetylases, histone demethylases and histone methylases, which are thought to  remove active chromatin marks and lay down repressive marks to eliminate gene expression. 
The understanding of the structure and function of KLFs has informed the design of artificial transcription factors. Artificial zinc fingers can be built to recognize chosen sites in DNA and artificial functional domains can be added to either activate or repress genes containing these sites. 
Coles Together is a non-profit economic development organization for Coles County, Illinois. It was founded in 1988 by a partnership between the public and private sectors to provide full-time economic development support for new and existing industry in Coles County. 
The Chapel of Our Lady of Graces (Maltese: Tal-Grazzja) is a Roman Catholic chapel located in the area known as Tal-Maqluba in Qrendi, Malta. 
This chapel was built in the year 1658 by Angelo Spiteri from Qrendi and dedicated to Our Lady of Victories. However, later the church was rededicated to Our lady of Graces. Spiteri left funds which were to be used for the singing of vespers and the celebration of Mass on the feast day. The church was restored in 2007. 
In biostratigraphy, a subdiscipline of geology, a taxon-range zone is the zone between the highest and the lowest stratigraphic occurrence of a taxon. Taxon-range zones are one of the fundamental biozones used in biostratigraphy and are named after the taxon whose range they describe. 
"The body of strata representing the known range of stratigraphic and geographic occurrence of specimens of a particular taxon. It is the sum of the documented occurrences in all individual sections and localities from which the particular taxon has been identified." 
So a taxon-range zone is not only a vertical interval, but expands laterally. Taxon-range zones are limited at the top by the surface that connects all highest known stratigraphic occurrences of the taxon and are limited at the bottom by the surface that connects all lowest known stratigraphic occurrences of the taxon. 
The local range of a taxon is the zone between the highest and the lowest stratigraphic occurrence of a taxon in a particular locality or area. 
The format of the Cup has not changed for this season what means that, unlike other European cup competitions, all teams (including Tippeligaen ones) entered the Cup in the First Round. In the First and Second Round amateur teams (or at least lower-placed at the time of the draw) were seeded and played the matches at home ground. From the Third Round until the end the draw was random. 
Colleton Preparatory Academy is a pre-kindergarten to 12th grade school in Walterboro, South Carolina. 
The school opened in 1966 as a segregation academy under the name John C. Calhoun Academy, who was a famous proponent of slavery. During its first school year it was housed in Grace Advent Christian Church. The following year, it moved to its own campus where it remains today. It had been one of 111 schools whose tax-exempt status had been contested by the Internal Revenue Service.  In 1990, exemption was granted and the school renamed Colleton. 
The school offers two tracks for high school students: college prep and early college, in coordination with University of South Carolina Salkehatchie. 
Colleton competes in baseball, basketball, football, softball, tennis, volleyball, cheerleading, golf and soccer. 
Gap junction gamma-3, also known as connexin-29 (Cx29) or gap junction epsilon-1 (GJE1), is a protein that in humans is encoded by the GJC3 gene. 
One of several titles published by Evo Media, Queensland Pride is distributed throughout Brisbane and major regional centres in Queensland.[citation needed] The publication covers local, national and international news of interest to the gay and lesbian community, and has a strong focus on community news, arts and entertainment. 
In 2013, Queensland Pride became and remains under investigated by the Office of Fair Trading in Queensland for claiming in media kits that it was distributing 15,740 copies per issue at the end of 2012 when only 4,970 copies were going out, having the effect of misleading advertisers and the GLBTI community that were exposed to Queensland Pride's claims. 
Liquidators for Evolution Publishing Pty Limited claim Dean Bell, Evo Media's Managing Director was a "shadow director" and referred questions of phoenixing to ASIC. 
A tooth-coloured shell that is slightly larger than the tooth preparation is selected and is reduced to the correct dimensions using a bur until it seats fully on the tooth preparation without bedding into the gingiva. Petroleum jelly is smeared over the tooth and acrylic resin is spread over the fitting surface of the crown. The shell is removed once the resin has polymerised and the restoration is trimmed until fit is satisfactory. 
2. Plastic crowns Clear plastic crowns can be selected and trimmed with a scissors without traumatising the gingiva. Small holes can be made on the canine tips, incisal angles and cusps with a probe before filling crowns with acrylic resin to reduce risk of bubbles formation. Once the resin has set, the restoration can be checked for occlusion and margins before being cemented in. 
3. Composite crowns Preformed malleable composite crowns are soft and easily moulded to the tooth in situ. They can be partially cured for two to three seconds in the mouth and removed to be fully cured outside the mouth. Final check for occlusion, fit and margins can be carried out prior to cementing provisional restoration. 
4. Metal-based crowns When a permanent crown needs replacement or sectioning for caries removal, the original crown can be modified and used as a temporary restoration. The crown can be relined with bis-acrylic composite resin and cemented on temporarily. 
Prior to the cementation of the provisional crown, the occlusion should be checked. Any deficiencies in the provisional crown can be amended by the addition of more temporary crown and bridge material, or a light cured composite. 
If a temporary crown becomes de-cemented, it is important that a dentist examine the patient as overeruption of the opposing teeth may prevent accurate fitting of the final crown. If a dentist cannot be seen in a timely manner, the temporary crown may be re-cemented by applying temporary cement to the temporary crown. 
A systemic study found that di-methacrylate-based provisional restorations had better flexural strength and hardness than the mono-methacrylate-based ones, while, within the mono-methacrylate group, poly-methylmethacrylate showed better flexural strength than poly-ethylmethacrylate. 
Oral hygiene tooth brushing and flossing is crucial to prevent gingival inflammation and bleeding. Patients are advised to pull the dental floss out buccally instead of pulling back up through the contact point. This is to avoid accidentally pulling out a provisional restoration. 
1st Regiment Indiana Heavy Artillery was a heavy artillery regiment that served in the Union Army during the American Civil War. It was nicknamed the "Jackass Regiment". Before being converted into an artillery unit in 1863, it served as the 21st Regiment, Indiana Volunteer Infantry. 
The 1st Indiana Heavy Artillery was organized in Indianapolis, Indiana, July 24, 1861, as the 21st Indiana Infantry under the command of Colonel James Winning McMillan.  The regiment was converted to heavy artillery in February 1863. 
The regiment lost a total of 390 men during service; 7 officers and 60 enlisted men killed or mortally wounded, 3 officers and 320 enlisted men died of disease. 
One of the earliest members descended from this family to reach national prominence was Sir Lewis Pollard (c. 1465-1526), Justice of the Common Pleas from 1514 to 1526, of Grilstone, Bishop's Nympton, described by Thomas Fuller (1608-1661) in his Worthies of England as one of several Devonshire men "inundated with a genius to study law". 
The former mansion of the Pollards at Way is now represented by the farmhouse known as Way Barton. Reset into the front wall of the house is a stone sculpture dated about 1300 showing the faces of two ladies wearing wimples and above them the smaller face of a man.  In 1309 Robert Pollard was granted by the Bishop of Exeter  licence to build an oratory at Weye, of which no trace remains in the present house. 
The Devon historian Tristram Risdon (died 1640) (who lived at Winscott in the same parish of St Giles in the Wood) stated Way to have been the residence of the de la Way family during the reign of King John (1199-1216), and to have been granted, during the reign of Edward I (1272-1307), by Walter de la Way, the son of William de la Way, to Walter Pollard, which grant was witnessed by Sir Henry Sully and Sir Thomas Merton. 
The arms of de la Way were later quartered by their descendants the Pollard family and by the Davie family (later Davie Baronets of Creedy, Sandford). The usual explanation of this usage of the de la Way arms is as given for example in the 1771 Baronetage of England, by Kimber and Johnson: 
Orate pro bono statu Johannis Pollard et Emmae uxoris eius qui istam guildam fieri fecerunt (pray for the good position of John Pollard and of Emma his wife who made this guild to come into being)
This evidences their having established a guild in that church. In Prince's opinion it was Horwood not Way which was the earliest devonshire home of the Pollard family. The 3rd son of John Pollard and Emme Doddescombe was Roger Pollard, who founded the Pollard family of Langley, Yarnscombe. 
Hic jacet Alyanora Pollard qui fuit uxor Joh(ann)is Pollard et filia Joh(ann)is Copleston qui obiit xxi die mensis Septembris Anno d(o)m(in)i Mill(ensi)mo CCCCXXX cuius animae propitietur Deus Amen. (Here lies Eleanor / Alianore Pollard who was the wife of John Pollard and daughter of John Copleston who died on the 21st day of the month of September in the One thousandth four hundredth and thirtieth year of Our Lord of whose soul may God look upon with favour Amen.) 
There are two further inscriptions on the same slab made later to commemorate two distant relations: 
Way became later the property of Lewis Wellington, living there when Risdon wrote his Survey of Devon (c. 1630). In a deed of 1611 Lewis Wellington of Great Torrington was described as a "woollen draper". In 1651 Thomas Wellington was mayor of Great Torrington. 
The heiress Grace Wellington (1719-1763) brought the property to the family of her husband Philip Furse (1709-1774) of Dolton. Her son was Rev. Peter Wellington Furse (1755-1832), the owner of Way in 1810. The painter Charles Wellington Furse (1868-1904)  was a member of this family. The Furse family owned the Halsdon Estate in Dolton from the later 17th century and lived there until the house was sold in 1982. 
John Francis Finnigan (born 29 March 1976) is an English football coach and former professional footballer. 
He played as a midfielder in the Football League for Lincoln City and Cheltenham Town after starting his career with Nottingham Forest. He later had spells in Non-League for Kidderminster Harriers, Bishop's Cleeve and Shortwood United. He had a brief spell in charge of Kidderminster in 2009. 
Born in Wakefield, Finnigan began his career with Nottingham Forest however failed to make an appearance at the City Ground and was loaned out to Lincoln City for his first spell with the club in 1998. He made his first league appearance for Lincoln in April 1998 against Macclesfield Town and featured in the Imps promotion to Division Two. 
On his release by Nottingham Forest, Finnigan signed permanently for Lincoln City and for the 2000/01 season he was made team captain. Finnigan missed a large chunk of the 2001/02 season with a neck injury and after four years at Sincil Bank he left the club in March 2002 to join Cheltenham Town. 
In his first season with Cheltenham Town, Finnigan helped Cheltenham to promotion via the play-offs, scoring in the play-off final against Rushden & Diamonds at the Millennium Stadium, and also received the 'Player of the Season' award at Whaddon Road. 
He was made captain at the club and in 2006 he signed a new two-year contract under manager John Ward to keep him at Cheltenham until the summer of 2008. Finnigan then signed a contract extension to keep him at Cheltenham until 2010 alongside striker Steven Gillespie in August 2007. Finnigan suffered an injury which kept him out of action for a year in 2007. 
In the close season of 2009, Finnigan was released by Cheltenham, with the remaining one year on his contract cancelled by mutual consent, quoting 'it was time to move on'. He signed for Conference National side Kidderminster Harriers on a two-year contract. 
Finnigan was appointed as temporary manager of Kidderminster Harriers on 23 December 2009 following the departure of Mark Yates to Cheltenham Town. 
Finnigan is also Sport's Development Officer at Winchcombe School, whilst also the Football Academy Manager at Kidderminster College. He very rarely turns out for local Cheltenham teams such as Winchcombe Town and Village Real. 
 The crash position indicator (CPI) is a radio beacon designed to be ejected from an aircraft when it crashes. This helps ensure it survives the crash and any post-crash fires or sinking, allowing it to broadcast a homing signal to search and rescue aircraft. 
CPI's became a requirement on some military aircraft and were often combined with flight data recorders. Today the beacon functions are normally fulfilled by the emergency locator transmitter system. The term "crash position indicator" no longer refers to the specific device, but any locator beacon.  The CPI is ranked No. 48 in the list of the 50 Greatest Canadian Inventions. 
The CPI was developed by Harry Stevinson, starting work on the concept just before the opening of World War II. After the war he joined the National Research Council's (NRC) National Aeronautical Establishment (NAE), testing glider performance. 
Other rescue beacon systems had already been developed and deployed, but Stevinson felt these were insufficient. If the crash occurred over water, the beacon would sink with the aircraft even if the crew escaped and were on the surface. Over land, the aircraft itself would block the signal if the beacon ended up buried under the fuselage, and the crash and any post-crash fires had the possibility of destroying it. 
There was one contemporary system that offered survivability. It used a small mortar to fire the beacon off the aircraft and then land it under parachute with a shock absorber to lessen impact with the ground. The beacon package included a folding antenna, two pop-out arms intended to orient it upright after landing on the ground, and a floatation bag for water. 
Stevinson liked the idea, but not the implementation. He preferred an aerodynamic release system that would eliminate the mortar, and a ruggedized radio system with an omnidirectional antenna that would eliminate the rest of the complexity. Survivability on both land and water could be achieved using lightweight foams. 
These tests were followed by production-setting releases from aircraft. In this case the CPI was placed inside a cylindrical recess on the outside of the aircraft fuselage, normally near the tail. The upper curved portion of the CPI projected into the wind, providing a constant lift when the aircraft was in motion. This was countered by a spring latch that would automatically release in the case of a sudden deceleration. 
When development was completed in 1959, production did not start immediately. Licenses were passed from company to company before finally settling at Dominion Scientific Instruments (DSI) of Ottawa. They contracted Leigh Instruments of Carleton Place to manufacture the system. 
CPI was soon mandatory on Canadian Air Force aircraft working in the far north. In one instance, an aircraft in the Yukon mountains was found by CPI in a location where visual location would have been impossible. In another, a USAF aircraft crashed into the ocean at night, but its injured crew was rescued after the CPI broadcast was detected. Leigh received a letter of thanks. Even Air Force One was equipped with a CPI, the AN/ASH-20. 
While Stevinson was working on the "tumbling aerofoil beacon", David Warren of the Aeronautical Research Laboratories (ARL), Australia's counterpart to the Canadian NAE, was developing the concept of the cockpit voice recorder under the name "Flight Memory". In 1958 he visited the NRC to discuss the possibility of incorporating the Flight Memory system into the CPI. 
DSI's system would go on to spawn a series of models, some in CPI's and some in ruggedized crash-survivable forms. 
By the 1970s, the CPI with data recorder was now a standard item on many Canadian and US aircraft, and would also be selected for the Panavia Tornado. It was optional on many other aircraft, and fairly common on bush planes. Its success was such that Leigh eventually purchased DSI, and by 1978 yearly sales of modern CPI devices were $6 million. Total sales over the years topped $100 million. Leigh became one of the largest Canadian electronics firms. 
In 1988, Plessey announced they would purchase Leigh for about 42.5 million Pounds. This was most of the money Plessey received from GEC during the creation of GEC Plessey Telecommunications. However, the deal fell through and the company was eventually broken up. 
Although most aircraft carry non-ejectable beacons, ejectable versions are still built for overwater flight, and most of these feature the tumbling-airfoil design. 
Albtal-Verkehrs-Gesellschaft ('Alb Valley Transport Company', AVG) is a company owned by the city of Karlsruhe that operates rail and bus services in the Karlsruhe area, southwest Germany. 
It owns and maintains several railway lines, including the Albtalbahn railway, and leases and maintains other lines. VBK, a sister company, operates Karlsruhe's bus and tram network, and AVG Stadtbahn routes use VBK tracks to access the city centre. Besides AVG and VBK lines, AVG also operates on DB tracks and a short stretch of tram track belonging to the city of Heilbronn. VBK and DB Stadtbahn routes traverse AVG tracks. 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football defender born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to weightlifting in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Omsk State Technical University (OmSTU) in Omsk, Russia, is an educational institution in the Western Siberian Region. Omsk State Technical University (OmSTU) was established in 1942. 
This Russian university, college or other education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
While teaching at ASUTECH, Mobisson went on to work in Nigerian telecommunications industry with NITEL. With the assistance of ASUTECH graduates, NITEL engineers, and former President Ibrahim Babangida's financial support, he constructed a communications system that was capable of connecting every Nigerian via telephones.[citation needed] 
Mobisson continued his work with NITEL until 1995, when he suffered a massive stroke which forced him into retirement.[citation needed]  He lived in Norwood, Massachusetts until he died due to a heart attack on February 18, 2010. 
He is the father of Jidenna, an American hip hop recording artist, and Nneka Mobisson a medical doctor and entrepreneur,  named a Young Global Leader by the World Economic Forum. 
Eden is the sixth album by English soprano Sarah Brightman, released in 1998 under license by Nemo Studios to Angel Records. 
Similar to Brightman's later album La Luna, Eden juxtaposed English popular songs with Italian opera arias. This was a departure from her previous albums which were almost entirely sung in English, such as Fly. Eden retained elements of Timeless, which had strongest classical influences. 
Eden contains one classic rock interpretation, "Dust in the Wind". It was released as a single and experienced a big success in Brazil, because it was featured on the soundtrack of the soap opera Andando nas Nuvens (Walking on the Clouds). The single "Deliver Me" also gained certain mainstream American success because of its inclusion on the soundtrack of the 1999 film Brokedown Palace. 
Subsequent to the release of Eden, Brightman performed her first world tour ever, One Night In Eden Tour, and released the VHS/DVD One Night in Eden. 
The Gorlov helical turbine (GHT) is a water turbine evolved from the Darrieus turbine design by altering it to have helical blades/foils. It was patented in a series of patents from September 19, 1995  to July 3, 2001 and won 2001 ASME Thomas A. Edison. GHT was invented by Alexander M. Gorlov, professor of Northeastern University. 
The physical principles of the GHT work are the same as for its main prototype, the Darrieus turbine, and for the family of similar vertical axis wind turbines which includes also Turby wind turbine, aerotecture turbine, Quietrevolution wind turbine, etc. GHT, Turby and Quietrevolution solved pulsatory torque issues by using the helical twist of the blades. 
The helical turbine (Germany patent DE2948060A1, 1979) was originally invented by Ulrich Stampa (Bremen, Germany), engineer, author and inventor. 
If the direction of the water flow is fixed, then the Gorlov turbine axis could be vertical or horizontal, the only requirement is orthogonality to the flow. 
The GHT is a unidirectional turbine, operating under a lift-based concept (see airfoil), providing rotation in a consistent direction from bidirectional or reversible fluid flows. The GHT works under the same principle as the Darrieus turbine; that is, it relies upon the movement of the foils in order to change the apparent direction of the flow relative to the foils, and thus change the (apparent) "angle of attack" of the foil. 
A GHT is proposed for low-head micro hydro installations, when construction of a dam is undesirable.  The GHT is an example of damless hydro technology.  The technology may potentially offer cost and environmental benefits over dam-based micro-hydro systems. 
Some advantages of damless hydro are that it eliminates the potential for failure of a dam, which improves public safety. It also eliminates the initial cost of dam engineering, construction and maintenance, reduces the environmental and ecological complications, and potentially simplifies the regulatory issues put into law specifically to mitigate the problems with dams. 
In this example the direction of the fluid flow is to the left.   As the turbine rotates, in this case in a clockwise direction, the motion of the foil through the fluid changes the apparent velocity and angle of attack (speed and direction) of the fluid with respect to the frame of reference of the foil.  The combined effect of these two flow components (i.e. the vector sum), yields the net total "Apparent flow velocity" as shown in the next figure. 
(The diagrams "Net Force Vectors" and "Normal Force Vectors" are partially incorrect.  The downwind segments should show the vectors outside the circles.  Otherwise there would be no net sideways loading on the turbine.)  M Koester 2015. 
Helical turbines in water stream generate mechanical power independent on direction of the water flow. Then electric generators assembled upon the common shaft transfer the power into electricity for the commercial use. 
Note: This is not an extensive list; it only covers the first and second rounds, and any other players picked by the franchise that played at least one game in the league. 
Some New York Knicks TV Games never aired on WOR-TV because of broadcast conflict with the New York Rangers (NHL). 
New York Knicks NBA All-Star representatives at the 1973 NBA All-Star Game in Chicago, Illinois at Chicago Stadium. 
Earlier travellers witnessed Beja and Bisharin influences from the Red Sea Hills among the Manasir (INNES 1931:187). Strong similarities of their burial customs with that of the Nubians can still be observed (cf. CAVENDISH 1966, Local beliefs among the Manasir). 
Their material culture is simple and consists mainly of a variety of storage containers and tools (cf. Material Culture of the Manasir). An insight into their culture and perception can be obtained by studying the Diwan of their recent poet Ibrahim 'Ali Salman. 
Worland Municipal Airport (IATA: WRL, ICAO: KWRL, FAA LID: WRL) is in Washakie County, Wyoming, three miles south of Worland, which owns it. It was built in 1953. It has no scheduled airline service; Great Lakes Airlines pulled out on September 30, 2016. 
The airport covers 690 acres (279 ha) at an elevation of 4,252 feet (1,296 m). It has three runways: 16/34 is 7,001 by 100 feet (2,134 x 30 m) asphalt, 10/28 is 2,501 by 60 feet (762 x 18 m) turf and 4/22 is 2,241 by 60 feet (683 x 18 m) turf. 
In the 12 months ending May 31, 2018, the airport had 3,325 aircraft operations, average 9 per day: 70% general aviation and 30% air taxi. 16 aircraft were then based at the airport: 38% single-engine, 13% jet, and 50% helicopter. 
In 2010 Fast Company wrote that John's Phone made it in the top 12 of the Year's Best Ideas in Interface Designs. 
John's Phone is available in 5 editions: snow (grey on white), business (white on black), tree (brown on black), grass (white on green) and sweet (white on pink), which cost $100 in the US, and one "premium" edition, bar (golden), which costs $150. 
Although the phone has been promoted as being "the world's simplest phone" and "the anti-smartphone" by the tech media, it has also been criticized for being rather overpriced for its so-called simplicity, for rough plastic moulding, and for poor ergonomics. This back-to-basics mobile phone was included in the initial collection of the new Museum of Ideas and Inventions (miBa) in Barcelona which opened in March 2011. 
Sam Verrills is an Australian professional rugby league footballer who plays as a hooker for the Sydney Roosters in the NRL. 
In the 2021 NRL season, after coming back from an ACL injury. He then suffered a detached retina keeping him on the sidelines for multiple weeks.  Verrills played a total of 14 games for the Sydney Roosters in the 2021 NRL season including the club's opening finals game against the Gold Coast.  The Sydney Roosters would be eliminated from the second week of the finals losing to Manly 42-6. 
Pope John Paul II beatified her when he visited Canada in 1984 and she has been granted the title of Blessed. One final miracle is required for her to be canonized; one such miracle is under review. 
In 1862 she was sent to the Church of St. Vincent de Paul a parish for French speaking Catholics in Manhattan, where the congregation ran an orphanage. She remained there until 1870, when she joined the Sisters of the Holy Cross, the American branch of her order, located at Notre Dame, Indiana. There she taught French and needlework to the sisters training to become teachers. 
Paradis continued to wear the habit of her order but relinquished it on 2 October 1904 in favor of the one instituted in the new congregation. In 1905 it was Pope Pius X who relieved her of her obligations towards the Holy Cross Congregation. 
Paradis soon became seriously ill with a malignant cancer, and her health slowly declined. On the morning of her death, she received permission to publish the Rule of the new congregation. She died suddenly following dinner and after receiving the last sacraments on 3 May 1912. Her remains were exhumed on 4 October 1935. 
The beatification process commenced in Sherbrooke in 1952 with the commencement of a local process to assemble documentation and testimonies; the process concluded in 1952. The formal introduction of the cause for the Servant of God came on 13 June 1966 under Pope Paul VI. A second process was convoked and spanned for a mere three months in 1968. Both of the local processes were ratified in 1970 and all documents were forwarded to Rome for evaluation. 
Pope John Paul II recognized her life of heroic virtue on 31 January 1981 and proclaimed her to be Venerable. He approved a miracle attributed to her on 17 February 1984 and beatified her on 11 September 1984 in Montreal. 
The second required miracle for her canonization was investigated and the process was ratified in 2006. The Medical Board that advises the Congregation for the Causes of Saints approved the healing as a miracle on 19 June 2008. 
Nontuela is a town (Spanish: pueblo) located in the northwestern part of Futrono commune, southern Chile. The town lies about 10 km northwest of Ranco Lake and only about 3 km west of the Andean foothills. 
Gorytes dorothyae is a species of sand wasp in the family Crabronidae. It is found in North America. 
2000 Emperor's Cup Final was the 80th final of the Emperor's Cup competition. The final was played at National Stadium in Tokyo on January 1, 2001. Kashima Antlers won the championship. 
Cartoon Network is a European pay television channel broadcast in the Czech Republic, Hungary, Moldova, Romania and Slovakia. It launched on 1 October 2008 as a separate feed from the Polish feed, and is owned by AT&T's WarnerMedia under its International division. 
Before the launch of the channel, Hungary, Romania and Moldova received the Polish feed of Cartoon Network on 30 September 2002, broadcasting in Polish, Hungarian, Romanian and English. 
On 4 January 2008, the channel started broadcasting 24 hours a day in Romania. Initially only TV provider Dolce offered the 24h feed. A CEE feed specifically for Romania, Moldova and Hungary was launched, replacing Cartoon Network Poland on 1 October 2008. 
Czech Republic and Slovakia used to receive this feed in English. However, on 20 September 2017, a Czech audio track was added to the channel in the Czech Republic and Slovakia. That same year, on 20 October, Cartoon Network started broadcasting 24 hours a day. 
On 26 February 2018, the channel launched a high-definition feed. Later, on 15 October, Cartoon Network changed its aspect ratio from 4:3 to 16:9.[citation needed] 
Achmad Dimyati Natakusumah (born 17 September 1966) is an Indonesian politician who is a member of the People's Representative Council since 2019, and previously between 2009 and 2018. Natakusumah was also the regent of Pandeglang Regency between 2000 and 2009. 
Throughout his legislative career, he briefly served as the deputy speaker of the People's Consultative Assembly, and had been made a suspect in a bribery case although found not guilty. He was initially part of the United Development Party, but he moved to the Prosperous Justice Party in late 2017. 
Natakusumah had a background in business, and he was the head of West Java's young entrepreneurs' association (HIPMI) between 1995 and 2000. In 2000, he was elected as the regent of Pandeglang, with the support of PDI-P and PPP, the latter of which he was a member of. He was reelected in 2005 for his second term. 
While regent, Natakusumah issued a decision which was to mandate the separation of male and female students at high schools, intended to minimize sexual encounters between the teenagers. He also enforced an alcohol ban and funded some free services and public buildings. 
He later ran as a legislator in the 2009 Indonesian legislative election in Banten's 1st electoral district with the United Development Party (PPP) and won a seat, becoming part of its third commission and also holding the post of deputy chairman of its legislation committee. Later in 2009, he was arrested by the Banten Attorney for alleged bribery he committed in 2006. He was found not guilty by Pandeglang's State Court in 2010. 
In July 2014, Natakusumah was appointed and sworn in as Deputy Speaker for the People's Consultative Assembly, replacing Lukman Hakim Saifuddin who became the Minister of Religious Affairs. 
Natakusumah won reelection in the 2014 election, winning 68,353 votes in Jakarta's 3rd electoral district. During a schism in PPP, he sided with Djan Faridz's faction and was named secretary general there, though he moved parties to the Prosperous Justice Party (PKS) in late 2017. Due to this, PPP replaced him in the council with Abdul Aziz. 
He ran in the 2019 legislative election under PKS from Banten's 1st electoral district, and was elected back into the legislature. 
Natakusumah is married to Irna Narulita, who also served as regent in Pandeglang and a member of the People's Representative Council between 2014 and 2016. Out of the couple's children, three are set to run in the 2019 legislative election, two of which in the same district as Natakusumah while running from different parties (one from the Nasdem Party and one from the Democratic Party). 
Telephone services are provided by KCOM and in 2013 a superfast fibre optic broadband service was made available. 
Kalluvathukkal is a village in the Kollam district of the Indian state of Kerala. NH 47 passes through the village. Kalluvathukkal panchayat has its own school for classes from the 5th to 10th standard. A small stadium is located next to the school. The nearest town is Chathannoor. 
According to the 2011 Census of India, Kalluvathukkal's population is 21,555 people, including 10,065 males and 11,490 females. 
The nearest airport is Trivandrum International Airport, approximately 44 kilometers south on  National Highway 66. 
The 1910 Minnesota gubernatorial election took place on November 8, 1910. Republican Party of Minnesota candidate Adolph Olson Eberhart defeated Democratic Party of Minnesota challenger James Gray. 
In the second half of the 20th century, the university was recognized for its research with the designations sea-grant university and space-grant university. The school was further honored in 1997 with the establishment of the George Bush Presidential Library on the western edge of the campus. 
Despite its name, the college taught no classes in agriculture, instead concentrating on classical studies, languages, literature, and applied mathematics. After four years, students could attain degrees in scientific agriculture, civil and mining engineering, and language and literature. Local farmers complained that the college was abusing its mission, and, in November 1879, the president and faculty were replaced and given a mandated curriculum in agriculture and engineering. 
During these early years, student life was molded by the Corps of Cadets. The Corps was divided into a battalion of three companies, and rivalry among the companies was strong, giving birth to the Aggie spirit and future traditions. No bonfires, yell practices, or athletics teams existed as yet, and social clubs and fraternities were discouraged. 
The two Texas schools quickly began to battle over the limited funds that the state legislature made available for higher education. In 1887, the Texas Agricultural Experiment Station was established at Texas A.M.C., enabling the college to gain more funding. Many residents of the state saw little need for two colleges in Texas, and some wanted to close the agricultural and mechanical school. 
Texas A.M.C. president Lawrence Sullivan Ross, known affectionately to students as "Sully", is credited for saving the school from closure and transforming it into a respected military institution. Ross, the immediate past governor of Texas, had been a well-respected Confederate Brigadier General and enjoyed a good reputation among state residents. 
Under Ross's seven and one-half year tenure, many enduring Aggie traditions formed. These traditions include the first Aggie Ring, the first yearbook, and the formation of the Aggie Band. Ross's tenure also saw the college's first intercollegiate football game, played against the University of Texas. 
During this time, women were also given a more official standing. The Texas Legislature in 1911 refused to give A&M permission to hold a summer semester unless women were also permitted to attend. For the next several decades during the summers cadets were not required to be in uniform and women could attend class and participate in intramural activities. 
Texas A&M Hillel, the oldest Hillel organization in the United States, was founded in 1920. The organization occurred three years before the national Hillel Foundation was organized at the University of Illinois. 
Texas A&M expanded its degree offerings in the late 1930s and awarded its first Ph.D. in 1940. Other programs at the college likewise began offering doctoral degrees throughout the next few decades. 
Enrollment soared as many former soldiers used the G.I. Bill to further their education. Unprepared for the growth, between 1949 and 1953 Texas A&M used the former Bryan Air Force Base as an extension of the campus. An estimated 5,500 men lived, studied, ate, showered, and attended classes at the base, which became known as the Annex (and later as Riverside Campus). 
With Rudder's strong encouragement, in 1963, the A&M Board of Directors officially reversed their stance on admitting women. The wives and daughters of faculty, staff and students as well as female staff members were finally allowed to officially participate in undergraduate programs, although they were not permitted to join the Corps of Cadets. 
When Rudder died in 1970, after 11 years as president of the school, Texas A&M University had grown to more than 14,000 students from all 50 states and 75 nations. The school had become coeducational and had even begun construction of an all-female dormitory. The curriculum had been broadened, with upgraded academic and faculty standards, and the school had initiated a multimillion-dollar building program. 
Texas A&M's would continue its growth spurt after Rudder's death. On September 17, 1971, Texas A&M University was one of the first four institutions to be designated a sea-grant college in recognition of oceanographic development and research. A third designation was added on August 31, 1989, when Texas A&M was named a space-grant college. The university remains one of few institutions nationwide to hold designations as a land-, sea-, and space-grant college. 
The case set a national precedent by removing legal restrictions on gay rights groups on campuses.  The subsequent recognition of the group provided a university precedent for allowing social organizations.  In 1977, the university had also denied recognition to Sigma Phi Epsilon, a national social fraternity, because its presence on campus might result in "a social caste system". 
To coincide with the opening of the George Bush Presidential Library, Texas A&M established the George Bush School of Government and Public Service. The school, which offers a master's degree in Public Service and Administration (MPSA) and one in policy and international affairs (MPIA) as well as two research degrees, officially launched in 1997. It became a separate school within the university in 1999. 
On November 25, 1999, the date that Bonfire would have burned, Aggies instead held a vigil and remembrance ceremony on site. Over 40,000 people, including former President George H.W. Bush and his wife Barbara and then-Texas governor George W. Bush and his wife Laura, lit candles and observed up to two hours of silence at the site of the Bonfire collapse. 
A commission put together by Texas A&M University discovered that a number of factors led to the Bonfire collapse, including "excessive internal stresses" on the logs and "inadequate containment strength", where the wiring used to tie the logs together was not strong enough. The wiring broke after logs from upper tiers were "wedged" into lower tiers. 
With strong support from Rice University and the University of Texas at Austin, the Association of American Universities inducted Texas A&M in May 2001, based on the depth of the university's research and academic programs. Furthermore, in 2004, the honors organization Phi Beta Kappa opened its 265th chapter at Texas A&M. 
On December 18, 2006, former Texas A&M University president Robert M. Gates was sworn in as the 22nd U.S. Secretary of Defense. Gates's successor, Elsa Murano, on January 3, 2008, became both the university's first female and first Hispanic president. 
As of 2012, the university had an enrollment of more than 50,000, making the school the largest university in Texas. By 2020, this number swelled even further to over 71,000 students enrolled making it the largest public university in the nation. 
In 2013, Texas A&M Health Science Center was formally merged into the university. While the bulk of the health science center is located on main campus the health science center maintains campuses in Dallas, Houston, Round Rock and Temple. Of note is the Texas A&M University College of Dentistry. This campus, formerly the Baylor University School of Dentistry, was added to the health science center in 1996. 
Also in 2013, the university purchased the Texas Wesleyan University School of Law and renamed it the Texas A&M School of Law.  This campus is located in Fort Worth, Texas. 
In 1962, Texas A&M was granted control of Bryan Air Force Base. This campus, formerly named Texas A&M Riverside Campus, was an extension of the main campus. This campus was transferred away from the Texas A&M proper to the Texas A&M University System in September 2015. 
In 1914, Texas A&M became a charter member of the Southwest Conference until its dissolution in 1996. Texas A&M subsequently joined the Big Eight with The University of Texas at Austin, Baylor, and Texas Tech to form the Big 12 Conference.  Texas A&M left the Big 12 Conference for the Southeastern Conference on July 1, 2012.  This ended Texas A&M's scheduled NCAA athletic competitions with its Texas Southwest Conference rivals. 
As of the end of the 2012 athletics season, Texas A&M has won 17 national titles in all of its varsity sports. The school has two Heisman Trophy winners: John David Crow in 1957 and the 2012 winner, Johnny Manziel. 
Hungpung also called as Hundung is a village located south  in Ukhrul district, Manipur state, India. The village falls under Ukhrul sub division.  HAO (Animism) religion was strictly practiced in the kingdom of "KHAYAIWUNG" i,e Kingdom of Hungpung Haokok. 
The MLA from Ukhrul constituency from 2012 to 2017 was Samuel Risom who hails from Hungpung village. 
In astrophysics, a bow shock occurs when the magnetosphere of an astrophysical object interacts with the nearby flowing ambient plasma such as the solar wind.  For Earth and other magnetized planets, it is the boundary at which the speed of the stellar wind abruptly drops as a result of its approach to the magnetopause. For stars, this boundary is typically the edge of the astrosphere, where the stellar wind meets the interstellar medium. 
Bow shocks form at comets as a result of the interaction between the solar wind and the cometary ionosphere. Far away from the Sun, a comet is an icy boulder without an atmosphere. As it approaches the Sun, the heat of the sunlight causes gas to be released from the cometary nucleus, creating an atmosphere called a coma. The coma is partially ionized by the sunlight, and when the solar wind passes through this ion coma, the bow shock appears. 
However, data obtained in 2012 from NASA's Interstellar Boundary Explorer (IBEX) indicates the lack of any solar bow shock. Along with corroborating results from the Voyager spacecraft, these findings have motivated some theoretical refinements; current thinking is that formation of a bow shock is prevented, at least in the galactic region through which the Sun is passing, by a combination of the strength of the local interstellar magnetic-field and of the relative velocity of the heliosphere. 
Bow shocks are also a common feature in Herbig Haro objects, in which a much stronger collimated outflow of gas and dust from the star interacts with the interstellar medium, producing bright bow shocks that are visible at optical wavelengths. 
The following images show further evidence of bow shock existence from dense gases and plasma in the Orion Nebula. 
A similar effect, known as the magnetic draping effect, occurs when a super-Alfvenic plasma flow impacts an unmagnetized object such as what happens when the solar wind reaches the ionosphere of Venus: the flow deflects around the object draping the magnetic field along the wake flow. 
This biographical article related to a Russian boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The first game at Momentum Bank Ballpark was played in 2002. It was named the "Best New Park of 2002" by BaseballParks.com. Momentum Bank Ballpark was originally known as First American Bank Ballpark, but the name was changed in 2005 after Citibank acquired First American Bank of Bryan, Texas. In 2014, the ballpark was again renamed to Security Bank Ballpark. It became Momentum Bank Ballpark in 2020. The ballpark replaced the old Christensen Stadium, the former home of the RockHounds. 
The species probably does not belong in Xenomigia, but has not been placed in another genus yet. The species is only known from the female type and is impossible to place in an existing Dioptinae genus. 
Nelly Island is the largest and easternmost of the Frazier Islands, lying in Vincennes Bay off Wilkes Land, East Antarctica. 
The Frazier Islands were delineated from aerial photographs taken by US Navy's Operation Highjump in February 1947. Nelly Island was visited on 21 January 1956 by a party of the Australian National Antarctic Research Expeditions (ANARE) who established an astronomical control station there. It was so named by ANARE because of the giant petrels, or nellies, nesting there. 
The island forms part of the Frazier Islands Antarctic Specially Protected Area (ASPA) No.160 because it supports one of only four known breeding colonies of southern giant petrels on continental Antarctica. 
Mohamed et al. v. Jeppesen Dataplan, Inc., is a case brought by the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) on behalf of five victims of extraordinary renditions against Jeppesen Dataplan, Inc., which had provided services that the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) used to perform renditions. 
On November 16, 2006, Amnesty International staged a demonstration in front of the company's International Trip and Flight Planning Office in San Jose, California to protest their involvement in the rendition program. In December 2006 representatives of the South Bay Mobilization for Peace and Justice group asked the San Jose City Council to remove a Jeppesen banner from a city skating rink. The group also holds a weekly vigil at the company's offices. 
On May 16, 2011, the Supreme Court declined to review the decision of the Ninth Circuit to dismiss the case. 
Gunvor Ulstein (born June 11, 1969) is a Norwegian businesswoman. She has been CEO of Ulstein Group since 2003, and is managing director of the subsidiary Ulstein Shipping. 
Vasant Prabhu acted in a few films under National Studios banner around 1939 as a child artiste, under the name Master Vasant. In the film Comrades (1939), he was one of the voices in the chorus and on the screen for the song 'wo chamak chamak kar taare' under the music direction of Anil Biswas. 
Prabhu's biography in Marathi has been written by Madhu Potdar and published by Manjul Prakashan under the name "Manasicha Chitrakaar To", which is also a song he composed. In October 2008, Soham Pratishthan and Anubodh organized a show "Swarprabhu - Vasant Prabhu" in his memory at Vile Parle, Mumbai. 
Bigfork Township is a township in Itasca County, Minnesota, United States. The population was 321 at the 2010 census. 
There were 124 households, out of which 29.8% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 67.7% were married couples living together, 8.1% had a female householder with no husband present, and 21.0% were non-families. 17.7% of all households were made up of individuals, and 9.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.51 and the average family size was 2.83. 
In the township the population was spread out, with 24.4% under the age of 18, 6.4% from 18 to 24, 19.3% from 25 to 44, 28.9% from 45 to 64, and 20.9% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 45 years. For every 100 females, there were 98.1 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 97.5 males. 
The median income for a household in the township was $38,125, and the median income for a family was $41,750. Males had a median income of $27,813 versus $27,500 for females. The per capita income for the township was $24,359.  About 1.8% of families and 3.0% of the population were below the poverty line, including none of those under age 18 and 8.1% of those age 65 or over. 
Nick Afanasiev (born July 29, 1989) is a Russian-born American actor, known for having the longest tongue in recorded history. Afanasiev's tongue is nine centimeters (3.54 inches) long, and is considered the longest tongue in America. 
Afanasiev has appeared in independent films, television pilots, an episode of Animal Planet's Killer Outbreaks, and commercials for CCM Hockey Gear, Cornetto Ice Cream, and Mopar. In 2011, he starred in the Travis Fort film 2012: Ice Age. His tongue has been showcased on numerous television shows around the world. He performs tricks such as licking his elbow, licking his eye, text messaging with his tongue, and licking ice cream from the tip of his nose. 
Afanasiev was born in Moscow, Russia, and moved to the United States at the age of seven. In 2008, a video featuring Afanasiev's tongue became an internet sensation. In response to the popularity of that video, Afanasiev was cast for an episode of the Nickelodeon show iCarly.[citation needed] In addition to iCarly, Afanasiev has appeared on television shows around the world, including The Tyra Banks Show, Tonight Show with Jay Leno, and TruTV's Smoking Gun Presents. 
By the time the group was founded, Merlo had been active in radical activities for years; he fought with the People's Revolutionary Army (ERP) in the 1970s. This organization was responsible for kidnappings and bombings in the 1970s; later went on to collaborate with the Sandinistas to assassinate former Nicaraguan dictator Anastasio Somoza Debayle on September 17, 1980, who was living in exile in Paraguay. The group was created in 1985 and ceased activities four years later. 
After six years in exile Merlo was arrested by the Argentine government in Mexico in 1995 and sentenced to life in prison. Pardoned in May 2003 by Eduardo Duhalde, then-president, he quietly returned to civilian life, and died in 2006 of cardiac arrest. 
The Elbe-class replenishment ships are also known tenders of the German Navy. In German, this type of ship is called Versorgungsschiffe which can be translated as "supply ship" though the official translation in English is "replenishment ship".  
Rhein was launched in March 1993 in Bremen-Vegesack, Germany. She was commissioned on 1 September 1993. 
On 20 June 2018, Rhein left her home port of Kiel. The ship, which is part of the support squadron, will be the flagship of the Standing NATO Mine Countermeasures Group 2 (SNMCMG2) and the Black Sea for the next six months. 
Opening Ceremony  is a fashion brand founded in 2002  by fashion designers Carol Lim and Humberto Leon. The brand designs and creates its own products and also  retails other emerging fashion labels. Opening Ceremony is known for exotic runway shows and advocating global issues. During the COVID-19 pandemic the company announced it would close all its physical stores due to bankruptcy. 
Carol Lim was inspired in Hong Kong and to open her own fashion line Opening Ceremony in New York in September 2002. The Tokyo store, located in Shibuya, was ranked by American magazine Complex as the 4th best store in the world in 2013. 
On January 13, 2020, the company was acquired by New Guards Group, a cartel that owns Off-White and other well-known streetwear brands. On January 14, Lim and Leon announced that the company's retail stores would be closing at some point in the year. 
In 2015, Opening Ceremony held its Ready-to-wear Spring 2016 fashion show in a live garden to showcase their upcoming assortment of outfits. Instead of models walking down the runway as usual, they purposely collapsed to the ground and rose up into a contemporary dance choreographed by Justin Peck, resident choreographer for the New York City Ballet. 
With an overarching theme of ballet, architecture and exotic travel away from home, the collection included Asian Bonsai tree embroidery, African textiles, khaki cargo pants and dresses, and Moorish arches inspired structural silhouettes. 
Ready-to-wear collections, as the name suggests, encompass clothes that are immediately ready to be sold in a store. Unlike bespoke clothing, these clothes are produced in standard sizes that fit most people and require little to no alterations. 
Fall collections are showcased during February and March internationally. They persist of clothes that are suitable for the Autumn and Winter seasons- coats, knits, etc. 
Drawing from all the latest trends, the designers presented a range of crafty knitwear, sporty graphics, prairie dresses and carpenter pants infused with enlarged and repeated prints of Mickey. 
Leon and Lim merged their own experience on vacations, to imitate a fantastical journey for their Spring 2019 clothing. A repetition of flowy summer frocks and funky floral prints, toned down with all-black outfits are observed. 
Spring collections are showcased in September and consist of clothes like dresses, skirts and shorts. 
For their 2019 February fashion look-book, the co-founders recognised their Asian heritage and culture, by recruiting Asian-American pioneers as their muses. 
Leon and Lim, both of Asian descent, were inspired by their own and others' journeys of succeeding in an environment where Asians are a minority. The look-book features different Asian pioneers from a range of industries, like the music and culinary industry. Musician and composer Ryuichi Sakamoto, chef Angela Dimayuga, and designer Anna Sui were of the few featured. 
 The Opening Ceremony designers aimed to spread a positive message of inclusivity in the fashion industry and recognition to all the Asian creatives working to solidify their own identity in a space where they are not fully represented.
In 2010, the brand collaborated with Maison Margiela, a French luxury fashion house. This collaboration was Maison Margiela's first co-branded project in its history. The product outcome was a white Bic pen with the classic Maison Margiela labelling and a plume. The two brands decided to further collaborate in 2011 and designed a whole womenswear line for Margiela's MM6 label. 
An unexpected collaboration was in 2018 with Crosby studios, a Moscow-based design studio. In lieu of New York Design week, Opening Ceremony and the design studio merged contemporary with playful aesthetics to create a collection of tables, chairs and other small furniture pieces in a monochromatic royal purple colour. 
In 2011, Lim became the creative director of the brand Kenzo, owned by the multinational corporation, LVMH. 
After collaborations with multiple brands, the two designers wanted to work further with individual brands, as they thought they could "affect the bigger business." Everyone turned them down except brand Kenzo. 
The designers prepared and presented a pitch in a short amount of time. Their pitch focused on specific alternations of the brand if the two had authoritative power. From the Kenzo experience, aesthetics, interior design of stores to marketing strategies, the duo's attention to detail and long-term vision gave them their new position as the creative directors of Kenzo. 
In 2019, Leon and Lim were removed from their positions as co-creative directors at Kenzo. Their last show was on June 23 for Kenzo's 2020 Spring collection. 
Opening Ceremony was one of the first retail shops to carry Havaianas and Topshop products. They introduced both, now globally known, brands into the US market. Designer brand, Alexander Wang, has also been selling his products through Opening Ceremony since 2007, along with famous Japanese brand Comme Des Garcons, Proenza Schouler and Rodarte. 
The cofounders believed that a person willing to buy expensive or designer garments would also be willing to buy cheap t-shirts, socks and random art pieces. 
Through curating their retail stores with multiple brands, Opening Ceremony formed relationships with many designers and put their name out into the industry, Opening Ceremony has been able to advertise their practice and products from loud statements about politics, cultures and people. 
A list of famous celebrities have attended Opening Ceremony's shows and have been spotted wearing Opening Ceremony's attire. 
American actor Jonah Hill wrote the one-act play Lost Cotton for Opening Ceremony's Spring 2015 Collection. In 2017, Spike Jonze wrote and directed "Changers", a dance performance that starred Lakeith Stanfield and Mia Wasikowska at La MaMa Experimental Theatre Club. 
In 2016, Drake wore the bright orange hoodie and sweatpants from the Opening Ceremony x Esprit collection. 
Troye Sivan and Nicki Minaj along with other LGBTQIA+ models were in attendance at the brand's Spring 2019 drag inspired fashion show. 
He was educated at Eton and Jesus College, Cambridge (BA 1975, and PhD 1986) and the University of Rome, La Sapienza (Diploma di Perfezionamento, 1981). 
In 2003, he introduced on site teaching of international relations which includes regular field trips to European institutional sites like Brussels, Geneva and Vienna, as well as to conflict resolution sites like the Basque Country, Northern Ireland, Montenegro and Kosovo, and annual Ghana trip. 
Walston published regular articles in Wanted in Rome from 1989 until his death; he also wrote a regular column for Italy Daily (Italian supplement the IHT) from 1999 to 2002, for The Guardian and The Independent.  His blog was Italian Politics with Walston. 
Walston was one of the first academics who wrote about forgotten fascist Italy's role in ethnic cleansing and internments of civil population in Italian concentration camps, such as under Mario Roatta's watch in the Province of Ljubljana, that are in Italian media subjected to the repression of historical memory, and to historical revisionism especially in relation to the post-war foibe massacres. 
His brother, Jacob Gurland, rabbi of Poltava, is the author of Kebod ha-Bayit, on the rabbinical school of Wilna, 1858. 
Arrow in the Air is a 1957 British TV play based on the Cyprus Emergency, although Cyprus was fictionalised as "Solaro". It starred Nicholas Amer. 
In 1984 she was a member of the Chinese handball team which won the bronze medal. She played all five matches and scored twenty goals. 
Four years later she was part of the Chinese team which finished sixth. She played all five matches and scored three goals. 
This biographical article relating to People's Republic of China team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Local government elections took place in London, and some other parts of the United Kingdom on Thursday 8 May 1986. 
All London borough council seats were up for election.  The previous Borough elections in London were in 1982. The Labour Party won the most votes and seats in London for the first time since 1974. The party won the most seats in London in 7 out of the next 8 elections. 
Franck Moutsinga (born 12 August 1985) is a German international rugby union player, playing for the Berliner RC in the Rugby-Bundesliga and the German national rugby union team. 
Moutsinga started playing rugby for the Berliner Rugby Club when he was five years old, in 1990. He is currently playing for the Berliner Rugby Club, together with Gerrit van Look and Colin Grzanna, another two players of the German national team. Before playing in the German 1st XV and German Sevens Side, Moutsinga played two Under 19 World Championships in Italy (2002) and France (2003). 
Playing for Berlin for the most part of his career, Moutsinga spent the 2005/06 season with the Racing Club Strasbourg in France (2nd Amateur League) before returning to Berlin again. 
Desmia girtealis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Schaus in 1920. It is found in Peru. 
Beacon College Ltd., doing business as Beacon College, is a cram school in Hong Kong. It was founded in 1989 by June Leung, Christine Ng and Richard Eng in Yuen Long. The school provides secondary tutorial classes for students sitting for the Hong Kong Diploma of Secondary Education, day-time secondary courses, pre-education courses and life-learning courses. 
The company is reported to be the largest private supplementary secondary school education services provider in Hong Kong. The BExcellent Group is the listed parent company of Beacon College. It was created through a corporate restructuring of the Beacon Group on June 30, 2018. 
Beacon College was founded in 1989, and was then expanded to different regions in Hong Kong. In 2015, the college applied for their IPO but was rejected in 2016. 
In November 2017, Beacon applied for their IPO again under the name of BExcellent Group Holdings Ltd. In June 2018, it became a listed company, marking the company the second of its kind to go public, after Modern Education. 
In 2015, Lam Yat-yan (also known as YY Lam), Beacon's Chinese Language tutor, received an open letter from opponent company Modern Education, inviting him to join the company after his contract with Beacon College ends. Modern stated that they will offer an annual income of HK$85 million, a four-year contract and additional financial assistance. However, Lam rejected the offer, saying that he had "maintained a good partnership with Beacon College". 
In 2016,  Liberal Studies tutor Oscar Ma was reported to have been involved in a sexual relationship with a student. A student who had applied for his lesson posted multiple screenshots and videos of their intimate conversations. Later on, Beacon suspended Ma. 
In 2017, English Language tutor Patrick Chan Chi-yung (more commonly known as P Chan) was sued by his former employer Modern Education, where he had taught at for 16 years before he entered Beacon College. The lawsuit includes claims for an alleged breach of contract, a third party copyright infringement, and other financial costs, asking for a total of HK$36.3 million. 
"One Piece at a Time" is a country novelty song written by Wayne Kemp and recorded by Johnny Cash and the Tennessee Three in 1976. It was the last song performed by Cash to reach No. 1 on the Billboard Hot Country Singles chart and the last of Cash's songs to reach the Billboard Hot 100, on which it peaked at No. 29. 
The narrator leaves his home in Kentucky in 1949 to pursue work at General Motors in Detroit, Michigan, installing wheels on Cadillacs, watching each one roll by day after day on the assembly line, knowing that he will never be able to afford one of his own. 
Beginning almost immediately, the narrator and a co-worker decide to "steal" a Cadillac by way of using their assembly line jobs to obtain the parts via salami slicing. He takes the small parts home hidden in his unusually large lunch box; larger parts are smuggled out in his co-worker's motorhome. 
The song ends with a CB radio conversation between the narrator and a truck driver inquiring about the "psychobilly Cadillac", in which the singer replies, "you might say I went right up to the factory and picked it up; it's cheaper that way", then when asked what model it is describes it as model years 1949 up to 1970 
He remained in central Arizona, where he worked in mining again for several years and ran a livery stable in Prescott.  Much of his mining work was as engineer of the mill at the Big Bug mine. In 1868, Monihon sold the livery business, the Plaza Feed and Livery Stable, to Gideon Brooke and Jacob Linn. 
In 1870, he was a signatory to the formation of the Salt River Valley Town Association, the first government of the area that became Phoenix. On January 17, 1871, he planted the first Cottonwood tree in the town. 
He partnered with Captain Hancock in 1871 to erect the first Maricopa County Courthouse which they rented to the county as the seat of the county government. The city's first public school was located there and the first District Court for Maricopa County held its initial session in the building which also acted as the civic center of the city. When the county moved out in 1875, the building was used as a Justice of the Peace office for many years. 
In the first section, King Vajiravudh states that "according to royal tradition, Siamese Kings have the sole power and prerogative to designate any descendant of the royal family as heir to the throne". Explaining why this new law was needed, King Vajiravudh wrote: 
According to King Vajiravudh, it was his father's intention to bring Thai royal successions into closer line with those of other nations. The important principles established by the law concern the king's right to name or remove an heir apparent, the procedures to be used if the king has not named an heir apparent, and also a description of the suitable characteristics for an heir to the throne. 
The reigning king has absolute power to name any royal male as heir apparent, and upon being announced publicly, the "position of such heir is secure and indisputable": 
The king also has absolute power to remove an heir apparent from the position. If he does so, "his entire lineage is removed from any claim to the throne": 
While Section 9 ranks those eligible for kingship, the law's next set of clause entitled, "On those who must be excluded from the line of succession", describes what might disqualify a potential heir to the throne. 
"Whoever is to ascend to the throne should be one from the masses fully respect and can be contentedly taken as their protector. Therefore any member of the royalty whom the multitude holds as loathsome, such person should forswear the path to succession in order to remove the worry from the king and the people from the realm."
Other points in the law provide guidance for when the new king is a minor under 20 years of age (a member of the royalty is to be named as regent and the two most senior privy councillors are to act as advisers). Procedures were also put in place for future kings to amend the law. They are advised to keep in mind that the law was written to strengthen the dynasty, and that amendments required approval from two-thirds of the Privy Council. 
The law based on the principle of male primogeniture, with first in line being the eldest son of the previous monarch and second in line being the next-oldest son, and so on.  The law expressly ruled against women ascending the throne (this clause was abrogated in the 1997 Constitution). 
This line of succession was followed when King Vajiravudh died on 26 November 1925, with Prince Prajadhipok succeeding as King Rama VII. Neither King Vajiravudh nor his successor had sons. The latter was childless while the former's only offspring was a daughter, who was born two days before his death and was excluded from the line of succession under Section 13 of the Palace Law. 
The 1997 constitution of Thailand, like most preceding Thai constitutions, continued to rely on the Palace Law with regards to succession.  However, the 2006 Interim Constitution does not contain any articles regarding succession, and instead, left it to "constitutional practice." Sections 22 and 23 of the 2007 Constitution dealing with succession again relied on the Palace Law. 
Recent constitutions of Thailand have made the amendment of the Palace Law of Succession the sole prerogative of the reigning King. According to Gothom Arya, former Election Commissioner, this allows the reigning king, if he so chooses, to appoint his son or any of his daughters to the Throne. 
The Palace Law of Succession, the Constitutions of Thailand, and the appointment of Prince Vajiralongkorn as successor in 1972 left nothing uncertain about the succession - upon the death of King Rama IX, the Cabinet was legally bound to inform the president of the National Assembly, which was in turn legally bound to invite Crown Prince Vajiralongkorn to become king. 
On the evening of 13 October 2016, Prime Minister Prayut Chan-o-cha announced "Dear Thai people, His Majesty the King Bhumibol Adulyadej, the Ninth of His Dynasty, has passed away. Long live His Majesty the King of the New Reign."  Parliament was scheduled for a meeting at 9 pm, and some news outlets assumed that this meant that Crown Prince Vajiralongkorn would be proclaimed King. 
"Right now we have no king," said Peerasak Porjit, vice president of the National Legislative Assembly on 14 October.  "So, all of the royal duties of a king must be done through the regent."  He confirmed that General Prem Tinsulanonda, President of the Privy council, was regent indefinitely, in accordance with the Constitution.  Some succession law experts have expressed puzzlement at the lack of succession. 
2.The proposal of the name of a Princess to the throne, there has been an amendment to the constitution since 1974. Therefore, the lineage of the King Bhumibol Adulyadej is counted in accordance with the constitution amended in his reign. 
After avenging the death of his brother, Chen Shen (Bruce Li) returns home from Shanghai. He tells his mother (who went blind from crying over her son's death) that he will no longer fight. Japanese occupiers who are aware of Chen's history terrorize his family by, among other things, vandalizing his mother's store and beating up his brother. Later, they frame Chen for a murder. After the Japanese boss arrives in town and causes a ruckus, Chen breaks out of jail for a final confrontation. 
This article related to a Hong Kong film of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A traditional Chinese motif, the fight between the fenghuang, or Chinese phoenix, and the dragon, is seen in an Anatolian carpet at the Pergamon Museum, Berlin. Radiocarbon dating confirmed that the "Dragon and Phoenix" carpet was woven in the mid 15th century, during the early Ottoman Empire. It is knotted with symmetric knots. The Chinese motif was probably introduced into Islamic art by the Mongols, or artists working for them, during the thirteenth century. 
The Phoenix and Dragon carpet was first described in 1881 by Julius Lessing, and Wilhelm von Bode in 1895. Since then the Dragon and Phoenix carpet has been referred to in many books on Oriental carpets. 
A similar fragment was discovered in Fustat, with dragon and phoenix depicted in combat on a yellow field. The animals in this fragment are depicted in red, and outlined in blue. The minor border shows a variant of the "kufic" borders known from other Seljuq period carpets. 
The illustrated rugs are generally drawn by the early Renaissance painters in a simplified manner, compared to the original carpet designs. The artists may sometimes have painted the animals out of their imagination, but the general appearance of the painted rugs still resembles the originals. 
A general compositional analysis of the animal-style rugs from Renaissance paintings was first developed by Kurt Erdmann. The field of animal carpets is usually divided into rectangular compartments, large or small. Each compartment contains an octagon, which in turn contains animal figures of four types: 
One of the first Oriental carpets in a European painting, attributed to the legendary Friar Bartolomeo, Annunciation, 13th Century, the Church of Santissima Annunziata, Florence. 
The Pergamon Museum's "Phoenix and Dragon" finds its painted counterparts in Domenico di Bartolo's "The Marriage of the Foundlings" (1440) shows a very similar rug, as well as Alesso Baldovinetti's "Tale of Saint Vincenzo Ferrerio", and Jacopo Bellini's "Annunciation". 
Domenico di Bartolo's The Marriage of the Foundlings features a large carpet with a Chinese-inspired phoenix-and-dragon pattern, 1440 
Mathematical chemistry is the area of research engaged in novel applications of mathematics to chemistry; it concerns itself principally with the mathematical modeling of chemical phenomena. Mathematical chemistry has also sometimes been called computer chemistry, but should not be confused with computational chemistry. 
Major areas of research in mathematical chemistry include chemical graph theory, which deals with topology such as the mathematical study of isomerism and the development of topological descriptors or indices which find application in quantitative structure-property relationships; and chemical aspects of group theory, which finds applications in stereochemistry and quantum chemistry. 
The mosque was built in 1347 on the orders of the emir ("prince") Shams ad-Din Aqsunqur during the reign of the Mamluk sultan, al-Muzaffar Hajji. Aqsunqur was the son-in-law of former sultan an-Nasir Muhammad and one of the more prominent emirs of the latter's court. Aqsunqur's influence in the affairs of the sultanate grew during the reign of an-Nasir's successors following his death in 1340. 
Ibrahim Agha built his mausoleum, which was also decorated with marble tiles, in the southern hall. It was constructed using the typical Mamluk architectural style and included a mihrab ("prayer niche") resembling the mausoleums of Mamluk emirs also located in the mosque complex. In line with Ottoman tradition at the time, the Aqsunqur Mosque was officially renamed after its restorer as the "Ibrahim Agha Mosque." The latter name was not used frequently. 
The Aga Khan Trust for Culture (AKTC) in conjunction with the World Monuments Fund began a restoration project of the mosque in 2009. The Mosque opened to the public in May 2015 after the completion of a six-year renovation project. The mosque was inaugurated in presence of Antiquities Minister Mamdouh el-Damaty, the Aga Khan, the Chairman of the Aga Khan Development Network, and Cairo governor Galal Saeed. 
Renovation work focused structural stability, conservation of the interior and roof repair. Today, the Aqsunqur Mosque is a major destination for tourists visiting Egypt. 
Kujuk's mausoleum is situated at the portal's northern side and has two facades facing the street. Of the two alternative entrances, one opens into the southern arcade while the other opens between the northern and western arcades. Unlike other tombs in Cairo, Kujuk's mausoleum, which predates the mosque, is not aligned according to the qibla ("orientation with Mecca") and instead is aligned with the street. This structure is the principal feature unique to other major mosques in Egypt. 
Above the prayer hall sits a brick one-bay dome carried on four brick squinches. A large brick dome supported by brick squinches is also situated atop the mausoleum of Kujuk. However, the latter has a pendentive below each squinch. When the mosque was originally built this technique of using plain squinches was considered classical. Two stone domes are located over the mausoleum of Tankizbugha and another stone dome is built above the tomb of Umm as-Sultan al-Sha'ban. 
When it appeared Eguiguren was winning, Benavides ordered the count to be suspended on the basis that members of the banned APRA had voted for him. At the point it was stopped on 21 October, with 70 of the 119 provinces having completed the count, Eguiguren had 74,485 votes, or 37% of the total. 
Calfactant, also known as Infasurf, is an intratracheal suspension derived from the natural surfactant in calf lungs. It is used in premature infants with lung surfactant deficiency that causes infant respiratory distress syndrome (IRDS). 
Lung surfactant is essential for effective ventilation as it modifies alveolar surface tension. IRDS is caused by a lung surfactant deficiency. Calfactant serves as a substitute for the natural surfactant. 
This drug article relating to the respiratory system is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Millepora alcicornis feeds on plankton. The tentacles of the dactylzooids are normally extended all the time. If an object is waved about above the coral, it will cause the tentacles to retract and then the coral can be handled without experiencing the painful stings caused by the cnidocytes. 
A number of species of shrimp and fish take refuge among the branches of Millepora alcicornis, seemingly immune to the venom. Hawkfish in particular often perch on top of the fire coral, perhaps protected by their skinless pectoral fins. Perhaps unsurprisingly, Millepora alcicornis has few predators. The fireworm (Hermodice carunculata) sometimes grazes on it, but prefers other corals. Certain nudibranchs in the genus Phyllidia eat it as do filefish in the family Monacanthidae. 
Millepora alcicornis has no commercial uses but is sometimes kept in reef aquaria. It requires high water movement and bright light to flourish and its health can be judged by its colour, a yellow hue showing health whereas a darker brown colour can indicate too little light. It can be difficult to control because it grows fast and spreads over other objects in the tank. 
In 1999, Colin Roberts sent Ian Stewart a package containing a letter and two sphericon models. In response, Stewart wrote an article "Cone with a Twist" in his Mathematical Recreations column of Scientific American. This sparked quite a bit of interest in the shape, and has been used by Tony Phillips to develop theories about mazes. Robert's name for the shape, the sphericon, was taken by Hirsch as the name for his company, Sphericon Ltd. 
 The 1983 Lifesaving World Championships were held between 17 and 21 April 1983, on the island of Oahu in Hawaii, United States of America. Twenty-two ocean and beach events were contested at several beach venues, including: North Beach; Makapuu Beach; Waikiki; and Bellows Beach. 
Antispila cornifoliella is a moth of the family Heliozelidae. It is found in North America, including Alberta, Maryland, Ohio, Ontario, Pennsylvania and Quebec. 
The larvae feed on Cornus species. They mine the leaves of their host plant, typically in September. 
In the larva, the head and shield are dark brown. Most of the rest of its body is white. For adults, the body is mostly dark brown, with purplish brown hind wings. 
The Rubber Stamp Film is a 1983 7 minute 16mm short animated film by Joanna Priestley, using rubber stamped images and drawings on paper. The film was directed, produced, and animated by Priestley with sound designed and produced by R. Dennis Wiancko. 
In 1977, Joanna Priestley created a novelty rubber stamp company and sold stamps through the mail and at the Portland Saturday Market. In 1979 she purchased index cards at her local grocery store in Sisters, Oregon and began experimenting with animating rubber stamped images. For two years, all of the stamps that she used were part of her own collection. In 1981 she found two rubber stamp collectors in Portland, Oregon, who let her borrow stamps from their large collections to use in the film. 
The Rubber Stamp Film was released in 1983 and the world premiere was at the Telluride Film Festival in Colorado, USA. The film was re-released on DVD in 2006 by Microcinema International. and it was screened in April 2009 a retrospective of Priestley's works in April 2009 at REDCAT in Los Angeles, CA and on October 18, 2019 at a retrospective at the Sweaty Eyeballs Animation Invitational in Baltimore, MD. 
Hideya Tanaka joined J1 League club Albirex Niigata in 2005. In 2006, he moved to S.League club Albirex Niigata Singapore. In 2007, he backed to Albirex Niigata. He moved to Kataller Toyama in 2008 and Kamatamare Sanuki in 2009. 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football defender born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Oliver Fernandez (Orizaba, 7 December 1972) is a former professional tennis player from Mexico. He was captain of Mexico's Davis Cup side. Today he is a successful businessman. 
Fernandez had a good year on the juniors circuit in 1990, finishing the season as the number three junior in the world. He was runner-up to Andrei Medvedev in the Orange Bowl and made the semi-finals of the boys' singles event at the 1990 Australian Open. The man who beat him in the semi-final, Dirk Dier, had been his doubles partner when he made the 1989 US Open boys' doubles quarter-finals. 
Her works have been used in the artwork of various record covers, including a number of albums by Stan Getz. Stan Getz: 
The Utah Golden Spikers was an American soccer club based in Salt Lake City, Utah that was a member of the American Soccer League. The team became the Utah Pioneers, a new franchise with new owners, during the latter stages of their only season, after the Golden Spikers were ousted from the league for nonpayment of their financial obligations. 
Eleven unpublished chapters were found in 2001, a kind of prequel to the stories in the book. These were organized with the help of Fiep Westendorp (Schmidt had died already), and were then published as Pluk Redt de Dieren (Pluk Saves the Animals). That book was published in 2004 and sold 150,000 copies, making it the best-selling Dutch children's book of the year. 
Brace Henry Arquiza (born December 12, 2000) is a Filipino actor, model, dancer and singer from Cavite City, Philippines. Currently, he is a talent of ABS-CBN and well known for his role as Toffer in the primetime series Bagito. In addition to acting, he got the Grand Champion of the Asap Supahdance Off 2011. He was also known as the member of the boyband Gimme 5. 
He along with his friends, Joaquin Reyes, John Emmanuel Lizondra Bermundo, Grae Fernandez and Nash Aguas, founded the boyband Gimme 5. 
He made his appearances in several drama series like Wansapanataym: Magic Shoes and Maalaala Mo Kaya: Notebook: Part 2. 
The son of Sir Philip Crampton, 1st Baronet, a Dublin doctor and scientist, one of the founders of the Pitt Street Institution in Dublin, Crampton was educated at Eton and at Trinity College, Dublin,  and became a career diplomat. 
His later postings included serving as British Minister Plenipotentiary and Envoy Extraordinary at Hanover, from 2 March 1857 until early in 1858, then returned to St Petersburg as Minister Plenipotentiary to the Russian Empire from 31 March 1858 to 1860. He was finally posted as Minister to Madrid, where he served from 11 December 1860. He resigned from his post in Spain with effect from 1 July 1869, when he retired with a pension, after more than forty years' diplomatic service. 
Crampton succeeded his father as 2nd Baronet on 10 June 1858. He died on 7 December 1886 at Bushy Park, Enniskerry, County Wicklow, aged 81. 
The Translational Centre for Regenerative Medicine (TRM) is a central scientific institution of the University of Leipzig. It focusses on the development of diagnostic and therapeutic concepts in the field of regenerative medicine and their implementation into a clinical setting. 
The TRM Leipzig was established in October 2006 with funds from the Federal Ministry of Education and Research, the Free State of Saxony and the University of Leipzig. It is part of the Life Sciences Network Leipzig and one of the initiators of the Regenerative Medicine Initiative Germany (RMIG). 
The acting director of TRM Leipzig is Professor Frank Emmrich. The scientific work of TRM Leipzig is guided by two boards. The Executive Board provides the strategic direction of research at the TRM. Expertise and scientific support is given by the Internal Advisory Board which includes experts of science, senior scientists, researchers and entrepreneurs. TRM Leipzig promotes application-oriented and interdisciplinary research projects in four areas: 
The TRM Leipzig selects and funds investigator-initiated translational awards that supports young researchers pursuing their own therapy-oriented concepts and extending their innovation potential. Awards can be requested by individual researchers, scientific groups or tandem research teams consisting of clinicians and researchers. Applications for the awards can be submitted anytime. 
Cecilioides eulima is a species of  very small air-breathing land snail, a terrestrial pulmonate gastropod mollusk in the family Ferussaciidae. 
This article about a Norwegian politician born between 1800 and 1809 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The game takes place on board a starship in a cyberpunk depiction of 2114. The player assumes the role of a soldier trying to stem the outbreak of a genetic infection that has devastated the ship. Like System Shock, gameplay consists of first-person combat and exploration. It also incorporates role-playing system elements, in which the player can develop skills and traits, such as hacking and psionic abilities. 
A demo for the game, featuring a tutorial and a third of the first mission, was released on August 2, 1999. Nine days later, System Shock 2 was shipped to retailers. An enhancement patch was released a month later and added significant features, such as co-operative multiplayer and control over weapon degradation and enemy respawn rates. A port was planned for the Dreamcast but was canceled. 
The intellectual property (IP) rights of System Shock 2 were caught for years in complications between Electronic Arts and Meadowbrook Insurance Group (the parent company of Star Insurance Company), the entity that acquired the assets of Looking Glass Studios on their closure, though according to a lawyer for Star Insurance, they themselves have since acquired the lingering intellectual property rights from EA. 
Since then, Night Dive Studios also acquired the rights to System Shock, releasing an enhanced version of the game in September 2015. Kick has reported they have acquired full rights to the series since then. 
Buck DeFore reviewed the PC version of the game for Next Generation, rating it four stars out of five, and stated that "Bluntly put, System Shock 2 is a welcome visit to the lost arts of the good old days, and an immersive experience as long as you don't mind some of the cobwebs that come along with it." 
System Shock 2 won PC Gamer US's 1999 "Best Roleplaying Game" and "Special Achievement in Sound" awards, and was a runner-up in the magazine's overall "Game of the Year" category. The editors of Computer Gaming World nominated it for their "Role-Playing Game of the Year" prize, which ultimately went to Planescape: Torment. 
Alongside development of the Enhanced Edition will be a virtual reality (VR) version, though this will release at a later time as the Enhanced Edition. The VR version will use gameplay features that were introduced with Half-Life: Alyx, and will be cross-play compatible in its multiplayer mode with PC users that are not using VR modes. 
This biographical article relating to Canadian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Far East University is located in Gamgok-myeon, Eumseong County, North Chungcheong province, South Korea. It was founded in 1998 by Dr. Taek-hee Lyu. The school flower is the chrysanthemum. 
Far East University opened its doors on March 5, 1998. Its first graduating class numbered only 164 students but since then, it has grown rapidly, and by 2009 enrollment had topped 5000. 
The undergraduate courses of Far East University are divided among eight colleges and seven independent departments: 
This article about a South Korean institution of tertiary education is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A portion of this freeway (from I-440 to I-540) was formerly designated I-495 from 2013 to 2017. I-495 signs were removed, and mileage markers and exit numbers were changed to reflect the redesignation in May 2019. 
I-87 will extend from its current terminus at Rolesville Road to an undetermined location in Norfolk, Virginia. Current plans have the interstate running east along US 64 to Williamston. This section of US 64 is built as a freeway, but will need to be upgraded to Interstate highway standards. In Williamston, the interstate is planned to leave US 64 and begin following an alignment along present-day US 17. 
Some of these upgrades are part of the DOT 10-year plan released in 2017, with upgrading of highways around Elizabeth City given a start date of 2023. 
As of July 24, 2019, Virginia does not have a timetable to complete their section of Interstate 87. US 17 is a four-lane expressway between the North Carolina state line and Norfolk. State Route 168 is a four-lane expressway for approximately 1.8 miles between the state line and Battlefield Boulevard. North of Battlefield Boulevard, SR 168 is a four lane toll limited access freeway known as the Chesapeake Expressway. 
I-87 in North Carolina will eventually have one spur route, I-587, that overlays US 264 to Greenville, North Carolina. 
Marathi Keertan Or " Kirtan " is an art of spiritual teaching through story-telling.  It is typically performed by one or two main performers, called Keertankar, accompanied by Harmonium, Castanets/chiplya/Kartal/Khartal, Manjeera/Taal/Jhaanj/cymbals, Tambori, Mridang/Pakhwaj  and Tabla musicians.  It involves singing, acting, dancing, and story-telling, However it is unlike any other performing art as it is basically pure glorification of god and godly acts. 
Based on the format and subjects, Keertan / Kirtan has been classified into several types, described in the sections below. 
In Indian mythology the story of Bhakta Prahlad is famous for the uninterrupted devotion of a small child towards the almighty God, despite the obstacles created by his own father demon Hiranyakashipu. In the same "Avatar katha" child Prahlad the heavenly prince defines 9 types of "Bhakti" devotion. The relevant shloka  says, 
Keertan is also called Hari Keertan, Katha or Harikatha, Sankirtan, Nam sankeertan, etc. Keertan carries a tradition as old as times of age old muni Narada the best devotee of lord Vishnu. Naradiya keertan follows a format that is named after Narada the sacred son of Brahmadev or lord Brahma . 
or "Naradiya Kirtan" an age old form of devotion,admire of gods and godly acts,glorification of the almighty,and also a tool used by the performers to keep people updated on the world out of their towns and also to educate the masses about good values of life and very purpose of human life,through a medium of "ONE MAN SHOW" consisting of prose and musical performance given at the temples and other holy places. 
There are no hard and fast written rules, and different dress codes are prevalent in different geographic and social environments. However, by convention and as an age old practice and tradition, men wear 
The performer has accomplishment of musical instruments like harmonium, drums and string instruments of various types mostly "Zanz","chipali", "Tal" or "Chimata".Performer needs to study a lot of things in literature, music dance, humor and acting. He has to be a good orator and able debating artist. Usually the subjects are full of devotion, sacrifice, kindness, bravery, values of life, extinguishing ills of life, personal development of each individual physically and spiritually. 
A lot of reading, practice of debating, musical training, sound memory and all round knowledge only can make a good performer in Keertan.  But after all, the main cause and purpose of Keertan is "glorification of god and godly acts" 
The main institute for training is "Keertan Kul", with office situated at Sangli and the "Shankaracharya of Karaveer Peeth " as Chair person.  There are some institutes offering the training in Keertan apart from individual schools and coaching classes in small towns all over India. 
These are working as independent autonomous bodies.  Different institutes offer education in different languages as suitable for the students and audiences around e.g. Institutes in Maharashtra prefer Marathi medium while those in Karnataka go for Kannada, Hindi is medium in U P and M.P,and Punjabi in Punjab and so on. Some have started training in various mediums including Hindi and English too along with the local language. 
This form was named after Samarth Ramdas.  Here the format is like Naradiya Keertan, only difference is it is based on poetry by Samarth Ramdas, and mostly the stories selected are from "Ramayana". In between chanting is also dedicated to lord Ram, glorifying his deeds and bravery. In his world known book "Dasbodh", Samarth Ramdas has explained in detail how a keertan should be performed effectively. 
Varkari Keertan was pioneered by Sant Namdev around 900 years back in Maharashtra.  It is usually based on poetry of 7 famous saints of Maharashtra namely, Saint Nivruttinath, Sant Dnyaneshwar, Sopandev, Muktabai, saint Eknath, Saint Namdev, and Saint Tukaram maharaj.  Sometimes other sayings of saints are chosen. 
The show goes for 2 or 3 hours as time permits and is not divided into parts like "Naradiya Keertan".  This form was effectively performed for years by personalities like "Hari Bhakti Parayan" (sincere devotee of god) Sonopant (mama) Dandekar, Dhunda maharaj Deglurkar, Babamaharaj Satarkar, Dekhanebuwa, and many others in modern times. An institute at Alandi near Pune offers training in this form of Keertan. 
This format is just like Naradiya Keertan. It was most evolved form that is performed by two persons together. The philosophy is presented from all angles, sometimes contradicting each other. The performance is more interesting as it goes in question-Answer form, sometimes creating a dialogue with audiences also. Finally both the performers come to a conclusion that gives some spiritual lesson for the listeners. 
Raphoe North is located in the east of County Donegal, to the east of the River Swilly and the west of the River Foyle; both the River Finn and the Burn Dale flow through the barony. 
Safe Sex is a 1999 Greek comedy film written and directed by Michalis Reppas and Thanasis Papathanasiou.  When the film was released in Greece, it was considered a blockbuster. 
The film features an ensemble cast of Greek actors portraying various characters, each living his own story in modern Greece. Almost everyone of the protagonists is interrelated to each other, and all live their own parallel stories which often converge at several points. Several professional actors appear briefly or in non-speaking cameo roles. 
As a result, there is no central plot or prominent protagonist who may be singled out. The major theme of the movie is sex and each character's approach to it, portrayed in a comedic way. 
Caledon Museum, in the town of Caledon, Western Cape, South Africa, is a social history museum displaying and collecting around the themes The Victorian Period in Caledon and The History of People Living in Caledon.  It gets financial support from the province of Western Cape. 
The residential house at 11 Constitution Street, was purchased by the museum in 1991 and was restored by the curator Tizzie Mangiagalli to be used as a house museum. 
The then director of museums, Mr Brian Wilmot opened the museum on Friday 2 December 1994.  The house depicts the late Victorian period 1870-1900.  In restoring the house all the inside woodwork, windows, ceilings and doors were wood grained, some of the floors had to be replaced, and the walls of all the rooms except the kitchen, pantry and the exhibition room were wallpapered.  The wallpapers were researched typical of that time, samples of wallpapers were found in a house in Mill Street. 
In 1996 the museum took over management of the Caledon Town Hall.  This impressive building, located in Plein Street, was completed in 1906 and is a Provincial Heritage Site.  The museum ran a very successful shop, and used part of the building to display the Caledon Family Photographs which it was in the process of collecting.  In 2007 the municipality took back management of the hall, and the museum was entirely located in its premises in Constitution Street. 
At the same time that, the Constitution Street house was purchased, the museum also purchased the Masonic Lodge at 16 Constitution Street.  The Lodge, which had been vacant for a time, was renovated to serve as store rooms and offices for the museum.   The Lodge is also used to display various items of furniture and currently houses the Caledon Family Photographs.  The museum has no ties whatsoever to the Freemasons, but the decorative ceiling, original to the Lodge can still be viewed. 
The house at 11 Krige Street depicts the Victorian Period in Caledon, in the form of a house museum.  The rooms are decorated with period furniture, house-hold objects and ornaments.  A bedroom, sitting room, study, dining room and kitchen are on display.  The objects on display have been donated to the museum or purchased for display purposes.   
First EIC voyage (1796): Cecilia was under the command of Captain E. H. Palmer and at Calcutta on 18 February 1796. She was at Saugor on 5 March, St Augustine's Bay on 20 June, the Cape of Good Hope on 31 August, and St Helena on 17 September, and Crookhaven on 26 November. She arrived at Long Reach on 16 December. 
The government engaged Cecilia as a transport to support General Sir David Baird's expedition to the Red Sea, which in turn had the objective of supporting General Sir Ralph Abercrombie at the battle of Alexandria. 
The New Oriental Register... for 1802 gives her owner as Lambert, Ross, & Co., and her master as Captain Thomas Thomas. 
Second EIC voyage (1803): Captain Thomas Thomas left Calcutta on 28 November 1802 and passed Saugor on 28 January 1803, bound for England. Cecilia reached St Helena on 15 April and arrived at Deptford on 9 June. 
Cecilia sailed on 5 December 1803 for Bengal, under the command of Captain Carrol. On 9 January 1804 she was wrecked at Madeira in a gale, and her third and fourth officers drowned.  She dragged her anchors and became wedged between two rocks. When her main mast over on the landward side passengers and crew used it as a bridge. During the following night the sea completely destroyed her. 
The Roman Catholic Archdiocese of Tuguegarao is an ecclesiastical territory or diocese of the Catholic Church in the Philippines. Tuguegarao is a river delta city that became center of the archdiocese in the Province of Cagayan, on the island of Luzon. Its seat is located at the Saint Peter's Metropolitan Cathedral. 
Originally it was carved out from the Archdiocese of Nueva Segovia which was then located at the old city of Nueva Segovia now Lal-Lo, Cagayan transferred to Vigan, Ilocos Sur. The Diocese of Tuguegarao was erected on April 10, 1910, for the provinces of Batanes, Cagayan, Isabela and Nueva Vizcaya. On September 21, 1974 Pope Paul VI elevated the Diocese of Tuguegarao into an archdiocese. 
The office of the Archdiocese of Tuguegarao is currently located at The Archbishop's Palace, Rizal Street, Centro 10, Tuguegarao City, Cagayan, Philippines. 
The World Leadership Awards have been prepared by the World Leadership Forum of England, UK (reportedly dissolved as of 2012), and have been presented to city leaders who have shown exceptional imagination, foresight or resilience in a number of key fields - especially cities that have reversed trends, shaken off traditional images, and acted as an example and inspiration to others. 
The Awards were instituted in 2005 and awarded in 2006 and 2007. Press releases from some winners have indicated that in 2006, around 400 cities worldwide, were invited to compete in 15 categories of urban quality and improvement. 
Note that the Awards (or others of the same name)) have since been awarded in 2012, after the apparent 2009 collapse of the sponsoring World Leadership Forum organization. 
The winners of the 2006 World Leadership Awards have been announced at the Royal Courts of Justice in London. 
The Vedat Tek House (Turkish: Vedat Tek Evi) is a museum and former residence of renowned Turkish architect Vedat Tek in Istanbul, Turkey. The house was built between 1913-14 by Vedat Tek for his family and himself and is a notable example of Turkish neoclassical architecture. 
Built in the Turkish Neoclassical style, the house is one of several of Tek's well known examples in this architectural movement. Turquoise tiles, arches following Islamic geometry and extrusions typical of classical Ottoman houses are the main design elements of the building.  
The house itself consists of three floors, but due to the slanted plot on which it was built, a fourth floor on ground level exists. This level is used as a restaurant. 
Rear Admiral John Robert Hamilton Clink, CBE (born 18 February 1964) is a former Royal Navy officer who retired from the Royal Navy in 2018. 
Clink was born on 18 February 1964. He was educated at Cheltenham Grammar School, then an all-boys state grammar school. He studied international security and strategy at King's College London, graduating with a Master of Arts (MA) degree in 2012. 
Clink was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in 2002 and Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) in the 2017 Birthday Honours. 
Albert Bastiaan (Ab) Harrewijn (Giessen-Nieuwkerk, 22 November 1954 - Utrecht, 13 May 2002) was a Dutch GreenLeft politician. 
Harrewijn was a preacher who was a member of the Communist Party of the Netherlands (CPN). He was strongly committed to helping people in the lowest ranks of society: the homeless, social security claimants and addicts. He was active in the CPN at the municipal and provincial level. 
Bear was a wooden-hulled, stern-wheel steamship that served as a snagboat for the United States Army Corps of Engineers.  
The route was constructed in the 1960s, and consisted sections of Lung Cheung Road and Ching Cheung Road. It was built as a five lane dual carriageway to connect the factories in Kwun Tong with the Container Terminals, bypassing the built-up areas in Kowloon. The route was previously known as Route 4 and has been renamed in 2004. Following the opening of the Tseung Kwan O Tunnel in 1990, Route 7 was extended to Tseung Kwan O. 
Route 7 begins at Wan Po Road in Tseung Kwan O and travels west to Kwun Tong via the Tseung Kwan O Tunnel. It follows Sau Mau Ping Road and meets Route 2 at Kwun Tong Bypass, then branches off into Kwun Tong Road. The road becomes a viaduct until it descends onto the ground level and joining Prince Edward Road East. The viaduct continues as Route 5 along the shore. 
Rancho Leonero (est. 1986) is a Mexican vacation resort located on the East Cape of Baja California Sur, approximately 60 miles Northeast of Cabo San Lucas. 
John Ireland took part in efforts to protect Pulmo reef from commercial net fishing starting in the mid 1990s. The Mexican government established an 11-mile-long marine reserve off Cabo Pulmo, a national park, to protect it from commercial fishing. Ireland and fellow resort owner Bobby Van Wormer pay the monthly salary of the federal fish and game officer who patrols the marine reserve, now a destination for snorkelers and scuba divers. 
Ahmet Zeki Soydemir (1883; Salonica (Thessaloniki) - Sep 4, 1954; Istanbul) was an officer of the Ottoman Army and a general of the Turkish Army. 
Robert D. Haas (born 1942) is the Chairman Emeritus of Levi Strauss & Co., son of Walter A. Haas Jr., and the great-great-grandnephew of the company's founder, Levi Strauss. 
Born and raised in San Francisco, Robert (Bob) Haas received a Bachelor of Arts from the University of California, Berkeley in 1964, where he was Phi Beta Kappa, and a Master of Business Administration (MBA) from Harvard Graduate School of Business in 1968, where he was named a Baker Scholar. 
Haas served in the Peace Corps in the Ivory Coast from 1964 to 1966. He was a White House Fellow from 1968 to 1969. After business school, Haas worked as an Associate at McKinsey & Company from 1969 to 1972. 
Haas joined Levi Strauss & Co. in 1973 and served in a variety of roles. He was elected to the Board of Directors in 1979 and as President and Chief Executive Officer in 1984. He served in that position until stepping down in 1999. He became Chairman of the Board in 1989 and retired from the Board in 2014. 
Sales and profitability grew during the period of Haas's leadership, thanks largely to the expansion of Levi's branded apparel internationally and the creation and rapid growth of the Dockers brand of casual apparel. Under his leadership, Levi Strauss & Company carried on the company's engagement in corporate social responsibility: it became the first company to define and enforce workplace and safety standards for employees. 
In 1985, Haas returned the company to private ownership. At the time it was announced, the Levi's LBO was the largest in U.S. business history. 
In 1992, Levi Strauss became the first Fortune 500 company to extend health-care benefits to the unmarried partners of its employees, starting the acceptance of this practice by other leading companies. In that same year the company published the first ever corporate standards governing the treatment of employees in contractor factories around the world. Since then, these guidelines have been largely adopted by the apparel and footwear industries. 
Active in support of his alma mater, he endowed the Haas Scholars Program at UC Berkeley, which funds financial aid eligible, academically talented undergraduates to engage in a sustained research, field-study or creative project in the summer before and during their senior year at Berkeley. Each year, twenty Haas Scholars are selected from all disciplines and departments across the University on the basis of the merit and originality of their project proposals. 
In 1998, President Bill Clinton honored Haas with the first annual Ron Brown Leadership Award in recognition of the company's anti-racism initiative called "Project Change". 
On June 21, 1889, Russell was ordained to the priesthood by Cardinal James Gibbons. His first assignment was as pastor of St. James Church in Hyattsville. In addition to his pastoral duties, he studied at the Catholic University of America in Washington, D.C., where he earned a Licentiate of Sacred Theology. He remained at St. James until 1894, when he became private secretary to Cardinal Gibbons and curate at the Cathedral of the Assumption. 
Karosa B 732 is an urban bus produced by bus manufacturer Karosa from the Czech Republic, in the years 1983 to 1997. It was succeeded by Karosa B 932 in 1997. 
A number of Karosa B732 in Pyongyang were converted to trolleybuses. At least 14 were built, but only 8 trolleybuses remain in service. 
The Mexican Army left behind a number of artillery pieces, Arista's writing desk and silver service, the colors of Mexico's lauded Tampico Battalion, and other baggage. Among the several captured Mexican artillery pieces were two 8-pounder bronze guns, two 6-pounder bronze guns, and four 4-pounder bronze guns. 
The Resaca De La Palma Battlefield is in the city limits of present-day Brownsville, Texas, but is part of the Palo Alto Battlefield National Historical Park. 
The Battle of Resaca de la Palma inspired the name of Resaca, Georgia, a community that later became the site of the Battle of Resaca. 
The Panzer 2000 was a Swiss tank planned to replace the Panzer 68, produced by Eidgenoessische Konstruktionswerkstaette. It was intended for use by the Swiss Armed Forces. 
The Panzer 2000 was intended to replace and eliminate the Panzer 68's shortcomings. However, the volatile history of its predecessor was an obstacle to the Panzer 2000's production. The Swiss doubted that Switzerland would be able to produce a well-functioning tank without expensive rework, and political parties used this argument; given the more modern technology, per-unit costs were to be much higher than the Panzer 68.  
These high development costs, along with a lack of export orders, ultimately prevented production of the Panzer 2000. Instead, the German Leopard 2 was procured and introduced under the name Panzer 87. This procurement was quicker and cheaper than the Panzer 2000 program because of the Leopard's already high scale of production.  
In addition to the basic version as a main battle tank for the Swiss Army, the Panzer 2000 would have been converted into variants such as recovery tanks, combat engineering vehicle, driver trainers and the armoured vehicle-launched bridge. Also intended for export were variants as self-propelled artillery, anti-aircraft tanks, and ammunition tugs. 
An HIV vaccine could be either a preventive vaccine or a therapeutic vaccine, which means it will either protect individuals from being infected with HIV or treat HIV-infected individuals. It could either induce an immune response against HIV (active vaccination approach) or consist of preformed antibodies against HIV (passive vaccination approach). 
Many trials have shown no efficacy, but one HIV vaccine regimen, RV 144,  has been shown to prevent HIV in some individuals in Thailand. 
The urgency of the search for a vaccine against HIV stems from the AIDS-related death toll of over 35 million people since 1981. In 2002, AIDS became the primary cause of death due to an infectious agent in Africa. 
The epitopes of the viral envelope are more variable than those of many other viruses. Furthermore, the functionally important epitopes of the gp120 protein are masked by glycosylation, trimerisation and receptor-induced conformational changes making it difficult to block with neutralizing antibodies. 
The difficulties in stimulating a reliable antibody response has led to the attempts to develop a vaccine that stimulates a response by cytotoxic T-lymphocytes. 
Another response to the challenge has been to create a single peptide that contains the least variable components of all the known HIV strains. 
There are some differences between SIV and HIV that may introduce challenges in the use of an animal model. The animal model can be extremely useful but at times controversial. 
There is a new animal model strongly resembling that of HIV in humans. Generalized immune activation as a direct result of activated CD4+ T cell killing - performed in mice allows new ways of testing HIV behaviour. 
NIAID-funded SIV research has shown that challenging monkeys with a cytomegalovirus (CMV)-based SIV vaccine results in containment of virus. Typically, virus replication and dissemination occurs within days after infection, whereas vaccine-induced T cell activation and recruitment to sites of viral replication take weeks. Researchers hypothesized that vaccines designed to maintain activated effector memory T cells might impair viral replication at its earliest stage.[citation needed] 
Other strategies that have progressed to phase I trials in uninfected persons include peptides, lipopeptides, DNA, an attenuated Salmonella vector, p24, etc. Specifically, candidate vaccines that induce one or more of the following are being sought: 
In 2011, researchers in National Biotech Centre in Madrid unveiled data from the Phase I clinical trial of their new vaccine, MVA-B.  The vaccine induced an immunological response in 92% of the healthy subjects. 
Biosantech developed a therapeutic vaccine called Tat Oyi, which targets the tat protein of HIV. It was tested in France in a double-blind Phase I/II trial with 48 HIV-positive patients who had reached viral suppression on Highly Active Antiretroviral Therapy and then stopped antiretrovirals after getting the intradermal Tat Oyi vaccine. 
There have been no passive preventive HIV vaccines to reach Phase III yet, but some active preventive HIV vaccine candidates have entered Phase III. 
A July 2012 report of the HIV Vaccines & Microbicides Resource Tracking Working Group estimates that $845 million was invested in HIV vaccine research in 2011. 
Economic issues with developing an AIDS vaccine include the need for advance purchase commitment (or advance market commitments) because after an AIDS vaccine has been developed, governments and NGOs may be able to bid the price down to marginal cost. 
Theoretically, any possible HIV vaccine must inhibit or stop the HIV virion replication cycle. The targets of a vaccine could be the following stages of the HIV virion cycle: 
There have been reports that HIV patients coinfected with GB virus C (GBV-C), also called hepatitis G virus, can survive longer than those without GBV-C, but the patients may be different in other ways. GBV-C is potentially useful in the future development of an HIV vaccine. 
The 1972 St. Louis Cardinals season was the team's 53rd year with the National Football League and thirteenth in St. Louis. On September 2, Bill Bidwill purchased the stock of his brother Charles "Stormy" Bidwill to become sole owner of the Cardinals. The adopted sons of Charles and Violet Bidwill, the two had co-owned the team since their mother's death in January 1962. 
It was Bayern's second consecutive victory in the competition, although they failed to retain their Bundesliga title, finishing in 10th place. Riots by the Leeds fans during the match led to UEFA banning the club from European competition for four years, although this was reduced to two years on appeal. 
The appearance of an English club in the final for only the second time would ultimately precede a period of dominance by Football League clubs Liverpool (1977, 1978, 1981 and 1984), Nottingham Forest (1979 and 1980) and Aston Villa (1982) of European football. However, the violence and the lengthy ban handed down to Leeds would foreshadow the tragic events in the European Cup final 10 years later. 
This article on a Yamanashi Prefecture institute of higher education or related topic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chile competed at the 2014 Winter Olympics in Sochi, Russia, from 7 to 23 February 2014. Chile's team consisted of six athletes in three sports, doubling the number of athletes from four years ago. 
According to the final quota allocation released on 20 January 2014, Chile had three athletes in qualification position. The team consisted of: 
According to the final quota allocation released on 20 January 2014, Chile had one athlete in qualification position. This marked the first time Chile competed in the sport at the Winter Olympics. 
According to the final quota allocation released on 20 January 2014, Chile had one athlete in qualification position. Chile has also received a reallocation quota in women's ski cross. Dominique Ohaco finished the women's slopestyle competition in 13th, one position out of qualifying for the final. This marked the first time Chile competed in the sport at the Winter Olympics. 
The Acme of Control is a card trick in which the magician shows two cards, inserts them into the deck, allows the spectator to shuffle the deck, takes the deck back, and is then able to produce the two cards in any way he pleases, such as from his pocket. 
Pink Lake (historically known as Lake Lochiel) is a small, circular, salty pink lake on the Western Highway just north of Dimboola in Australia. Granville Stapylton, part of the explorer Thomas Mitchell's 1836 expedition into western Victoria, reconnoitered Pink Lake on 20 July 1836. 
The lake received its name from its distinctive pink colour. The brightness of the hue varies according to the level of rainfall. Until recently it was assumed that red algae created the pink hue; however, recent research reported by Australian Geographic describes the colour as result of a pigment produced by the Salinibacter ruber bacteria. A rest-stop overlooks the lake's basin. 
Salt has been harvested from the lake since the 1860s and on average 20 tonnes a year are harvested by the Mount Zero Olive company working in conjunction with the Barengi Gadjin Land Council. Commercial harvesting stopped in the 1970s but was resumed after negotiations between the Victorian State government, the Barengi Gadjin Land Council and the Mount Zero Olive Company in 2009. 
Riedholz is a municipality in the district of Lebern in the canton of Solothurn in Switzerland.  In 2011 Niederwil merged into Riedholz. 
Riedholz is first mentioned in 1367 as im Rietholz.  Niederwil is first mentioned in 1292 as Lomolzwile. 
The municipality is located in the Lebern district, between a moraine and the Aare river.  It consists of the village of Riedholz and Niederwil as well as scattered hamlets and individual settlements, including Attisholz which has had a thermal bath since the 15th Century. 
Most of the population (as of 2000[update]) speaks German (1,427 or 95.8%), with Italian being second most common (12 or 0.8%) and Albanian being third (11 or 0.7%).  There are 7 people who speak French and 2 people who speak Romansh. 
As of 2000[update], there were 585 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 762 married individuals, 80 widows or widowers and 62 individuals who are divorced. 
In the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SVP which received 27.14% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (26.67%), the SP (18.99%) and the CVP (14.8%).  In the federal election, a total of 665 votes were cast, and the voter turnout was 52.9%. 
In 2000[update], there were 492 workers who commuted into the municipality and 624 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 1.3 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.  Of the working population, 14% used public transportation to get to work, and 61.1% used a private car. 
In Riedholz about 657 or (44.1%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 231 or (15.5%) have completed additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 231 who completed tertiary schooling, 74.5% were Swiss men, 16.0% were Swiss women, 6.5% were non-Swiss men and 3.0% were non-Swiss women. 
As of 2000[update], there were 14 students in Riedholz who came from another municipality, while 114 residents attended schools outside the municipality. 
Port Davis is a locality in the Australian state of South Australia on the east coast of Spencer Gulf about 18 kilometres (11 miles) to the west of the city of Port Pirie and about 197 kilometres (122 miles) north of the state capital of Adelaide. 
Port Davis occupies land on the west and north side of a promontory known as Jarrold Point which itself forms part of the southern side of Germein Bay.  The locality includes the mouth of the Broughton River which is also known as Port Davis Creek. 
Port Davis is located within the federal Division of Grey, the state electoral district of Frome and  the local government area of the Port Pirie Regional Council. 
Lakehead University is a public research university with campuses in Thunder Bay and Orillia, Ontario, Canada. Lakehead University, shortened to 'Lakehead U', or 'LU', is non-denominational and provincially supported. It has undergraduate programs, graduate programs, the Bora Laskin Faculty of Law, the only internationally accredited (AACSB) business school in northern Ontario, and is home to the western campus of the Northern Ontario School of Medicine. 
Lakehead College of Arts, Science and Technology was established by an Act of the Ontario Legislature, proclaimed on August 1, 1957. Years later, the original Lakehead College of Arts, Science and Technology Act was amended to grant the college authority to establish new faculties, and confer degrees in arts and sciences. 
The Lakehead University Act was given royal assent on June 22, 1965, and came into force on July 1, 1965. The Lakehead College of Arts, Science and Technology, thereafter known as "Lakehead University," was continued under this new charter. The first degrees were conferred on May 5, 1965. The first university chancellor was Senator Norman McLeod Paterson. 
The original college site comprised about 32 hectares of land in south-west Port Arthur, Ontario. From 1962 to 1965, an additional 87 hectares of adjoining land was purchased in anticipation of future expansion. The first building was opened in 1957. 
A new law school was established; the faculty accepted its first students in 2013. The program is housed in the former Port Arthur Collegiate Institute.  In 2014 it was named the Bora Laskin Faculty of Law, after the fourteenth Chief Justice of Canada. 
Lakehead University's physical plant now consists of 39 buildings and 116 hectares of property including 40 hectares of landscaped and maintained grounds. 
Lakehead University opened a campus at Heritage Place in Downtown Orillia in 2006; during the first semester there were about 100 students. 
Accommodations at Lakehead are divided into three living styles: residence halls, apartments and townhouses. The Thunder Bay residence currently has a total of 1,196 beds and three cafeteria/dining halls. Students can choose from meal options that range from kitchenette, full-kitchen and complete meal plan depending on the residence styles. 
The men's residence for 52 students was opened in fall of 1962, and has grown to include a residence village consisting of 10 new buildings. The village is situated on the banks of the McIntyre River within  five-minute walking distance of all university buildings and athletic facilities. 
From 1989 to 1992, a complex of townhouses, including some handicap accessible units, was added to the residence facility. 
A 271-bed residence in Orillia opened its doors in late Fall 2012. The Orillia residence has two meal plan options for students, as well as one cafeteria, owned by Madison County. 
The university supports a research station near Thunder Bay to test newly developed crop varieties. The station had been in operation for a number of years, and was officially taken over by the university in 2018. 
The university has nine faculties: Business Administration, Education, Engineering, Natural Resources Management, Faculty of Health and Behavioral Sciences, Science and Environmental Studies, Social Sciences and Humanities, Medicine, and Graduate Studies. The Faculty of Law welcomed its first students in September 2013. 
Based on full-time undergraduate enrolment, the Social Sciences & Humanities is the largest faculty at Lakehead, with about 30% of the students, followed by Health and Behavioral Sciences, Science & Environmental Studies, Engineering, Education, and Business Administration. Two small faculties are Natural Resources Management and Medicine, each with less than 2% of the student enrolment. 
Apart from these awards, Lakehead University provides entrance scholarships to high school students with marks above 80%, paid out during four years of undergraduate. Lakehead also offers free tuition to students with a 95% average or higher. 
Lakehead University Student Union, or LUSU, serves as a governing body for student-run clubs. Students can participate in various club activities, ranging from student government to multi-cultural and athletics. LUSU is also responsible for publishing The Argus, the student newspaper, as well as running The Study Coffeehouse and The Outpost Pub, sites that often serve as gathering places for campus community activities and as performance venues. 
An item bank is a term for a repository of test items that belong to a testing program, as well as all information pertaining to those items.  In most applications of testing and assessment, the items are of multiple choice format, but any format can be used.  Items are pulled from the bank and assigned to test forms for publication either as a paper-and-pencil test or some form of e-assessment. 
An item bank will not only include the text of each item, but also extensive information regarding test development and psychometric characteristics of the items.  Examples of such information include: 
Some item banks also have test administration functionalities, such as being able to deliver e-assessment or process "bubble" answer sheets. 
This article about a location in ancient Macedonia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Presque rien (meaning Almost Nothing, which is also the UK release title; the U.S. title is Come Undone) is a 2000 French-Belgian romantic drama film directed by Sebastien Lifshitz, set in Brittany, depicting a stormy holiday romance between two 18-year-olds and what remains of that relationship eighteen months later. 
Upper-middle class Mathieu, is spending his summer vacation on the French coast before beginning studies in the autumn to become an architect. His mother is deeply depressed because of the death of his baby brother from cancer, and is cared for by her sister, while Mathieu and his moody younger sister cannot get along. 
A parallel plotline focuses on Mathieu eighteen months later, as he recovers from the shock of their separation. After Mathieu has tried to commit suicide, he chooses to go back to the small seaside town to learn how to deal with what happened. 
Rather than having a clear, chronologically ordered narrative, the movie switches between the summer and the winter plotlines, depicting the differences in Mathieu's life at both points, as well as establishing the contrast between one and the other visually. 
The soundtrack uses songs by Irish singer and songwriter Perry Blake (from his album Still Life) to convey Mathieu's melancholic, depressive mood. 
The other important development was the extremely complex and sophisticated art of secular song which flourished in Avignon at the very end of the 14th century, ars subtilior. Ars subtilior immediately followed ars nova, and as the Latin definition suggests, this style was subtler than the earlier works. Ars subtilior was also even more complex, making it difficult to sing and most popular among music specialists. 
The move of the center of musical activity from Paris to Burgundy defines the beginning of the musical Renaissance in France.  The political instability under weak kings and continued dismemberment and acquisition of territory by the English during the Hundred Years' War all contributed to moving musicians east. 
Composers who worked at the courts of the Dukes of Burgundy are known collectively as the Burgundian School; some of the principal names associated with this school are Guillaume Dufay, Gilles Binchois, Hayne van Ghizeghem and Antoine Busnois.  They wrote vernacular secular music in a clear, simple, melodic style, principally rondeaux, but also Latin sacred music, such as motets and cantus firmus masses. 
In the late Renaissance and early Baroque period, approximately from 1570 to 1650 and peaking from 1610 and 1635, a type of popular secular vocal music called air de cour spread throughout France.  Though airs de cour originally used only one voice with lute accompaniment, they grew to incorporate four to five voices by the end of the 16th century.  Halfway through the 17th century, they switched back again to a single voice. 
Aconitum noveboracense, also known as northern blue monkshood or northern wild monkshood, is a flowering plant belonging to the buttercup family (Ranunculaceae).  Members of its genus (Aconitum) are also known as wolfsbane. 
The United States Fish and Wildlife Service government lists it as a threatened species. It grows in rare portions of New York State and in portions of the Driftless Area. 
Northern monkshood is a perennial and reproduces from both seed and small tubers. The flowers bloom between June and September and are pollinated when bumblebees pry open the blossom to collect nectar and pollen. 
Under stress conditions (e.g. water deficit) oxalate released from calcium oxalate crystals is converted to CO2 by an oxalate oxidase enzyme and the produced CO2 can support the Calvin cycle reactions. Reactive hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), the byproduct of oxalate oxidase reaction, can be neutralized by catalase. 
Alarm photosynthesis represents an unknown photosynthetic variation to be added to the already known C4 and CAM pathways. However, alarm photosynthesis, in contrast to these pathways, operates as a biochemical pump that collects carbon from the organ interior (or from the soil) and not from the atmosphere.  
The boys come across a farm. They see the farmer's wife bring the farmer lunch out in the field, and the younger boy follows the wife back into the house to ask for food. He struggles with thoughts of murder and rape, the film repeatedly showing both possibilities, but ultimately just silently takes the few slices of bread she offers and leaves. 
At the time of its U.S. release in March 1968, New York Times critic Renata Adler wrote that the film is "all quite depressing and real," but "it doesn't really work." She asserted that when misery is transplanted intact to the screen, "one loses interest. It looks unreal." 
The film was announced in March 2017 with Amala Paul in the lead role. The title and the first look of the film was revealed on the International Women's Day of 2018 by Kajal Agarwal. During filming in August 2018, Amala Paul suffered a serious ligament tear while performing an action sequence and resumed shooting after recovery. 
This article relating to Indian films in the Tamil language is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joe Glick was born in the Williamsburg area of Brooklyn, on February 22, 1903 and began training as a boxer in his teens. He worked as a tailor prior to his boxing career. 
After the zenith of his early career as a Junior Lightweight in January 1929, Tex Ricard, manager for Jack Dempsey, still rated Glick third among top Lightweights in America. 
In January and March 1929, Glick faced the exceptional Jimmy McLarnin, a former Lightweight champion, but lost to him in both bouts. Glick's first bout with McLarnin in Madison Square Garden on January 11, garnered large attendance, and though Glick lost the ten round bout by unanimous decision, McLarnin's nose was broken in the bout. His second bout with McLarnin in the Garden on March 1, attended by nearly 19,000, ended when Glick was knocked out in the second round. 
Glick also appeared briefly in the 1933 Paramount Productions's, Tillie and Gus, an adventure film about the purchase of a ferry boat, the Fairy Queen. 
Another rough slice-of-life movie in which Glick appeared was the black and white 1934 Paramount Productions's film, LimeHouse Blues. Not atypical of the movies in which ex-boxers found roles, the film depicted rough street life.  It was set in London's LimeHouse Causeway, a riverfront slum, and the main character, Harry Young ran a smuggling business out of his club. 
In 1938, Glick played an extra in MGM's The Crowd Roars. In this successful boxing movie with Robert Taylor as the lead, Glick briefly appeared in a background gymnasium scene with boxers Larry Williams, Maxie Rosenbloom, Jimmy McLarnin, Abie Bain, Frankie Grandetta, Jack Roper, Tommy Herman, Larry Williams, and Abe "The Newsboy" Hollandersky. 
This article related to members of the insect sub-family Tephritinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Sussex County, New Jersey state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Leonildo Soares made his international debut on 4 June 2016, when he played entirely in a loss Africa Cup of Nations qualifier against Cape Verde. 
"The Indefatigable Frog" is a science fiction short story by American writer Philip K. Dick, first published in the July 1953 edition of Fantastic Story Magazine, and later in The Collected Stories of Philip K. Dick. It has since been republished several times, including in Beyond Lies the Wub in 1988. 
The story centers around two college professors, Hardy and Grote, who argue about one of Zeno's Paradoxes, called The dichotomy paradox, where a frog wants to get up from a well, but each jump is half of the previous one.  That way, Hardy argues, the frog will never exit the well, while Grote argues the opposite: that the frog will eventually escape from the well. 
This article about a science fiction short story (or stories) published in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Akbar Salim Anarkali is a 1979 Indian Telugu-language historical romance film produced & directed by N. T. Rama Rao under his Ramakrishna Cine Studios banner. It stars N. T. Rama Rao, Nandamuri Balakrishna, Deepa, with music composed by C. Ramchandra. The film is remake of the Bollywood epic Mughal E Azam. 
Music composed by C. Ramchandra. Lyrics was written by C. Narayana Reddy. Music released on EMI COLUMBIA Audio Company. 
While the term pope (Latin: Papa, 'Father') is used in several churches to denote their high spiritual leaders, in English usage, this title generally refers to the supreme head of the Catholic Church and of the Holy See.  The title itself has been used officially by the head of the Church since the tenure of Pope Siricius. 
Since the Lateran Treaty of 1929, the pope's temporal title has been Sovereign of the Vatican City State. 
Benefit Cosmetics LLC is a manufacturer of cosmetics founded and headquartered in San Francisco, California selling at over 2,000 counters in more than 30 countries. It is a subsidiary of LVMH. 
Twin sisters and founders Jean and Jane Ford were born in Indiana. After they attended Indiana University, the two later appeared in commercials for Calgon bath products before moving to San Francisco. 
In 1989, the product catalog was developed. The Fords then focused on department store distribution, and soon after the original Face Place was renamed Benefit Cosmetics in 1990. In 1991 Benefit opened up in its first U.S. department store in Henri Bendel in New York City. With significant success in the U.S., Benefit went international in 1997 with their expansion into Harrods in London. Soon after, the Benefit Cosmetics product website was launched. 
LVMH acquired Benefit Cosmetics on September 14, 1999. In 2001, Benefit launched their first bath and boudoir line, Bathina. Benefit opened its first "Brow Bar" (a boutique specializing in brow shaping) in 2003, at Macy's Union Square, San Francisco.[unreliable source?] 
In 2008, Jean's daughters Maggie and Annie joined the company, focusing on the Home Shopping Network business of the company as well as store openings worldwide. 
Benefit cosmetics have counters in many different retail stores such as Debenhams, Sephora, Boots pharmacy and Arnotts. 
Since Benefit's opening, the company has branched out their products to skin care, eyes/face/lip cosmetics, fragrances, and accessories. 
On April 21, 2012, Benefit Cosmetics won a Guinness World Record for accomplishing the most eyebrow waxes performed in 8 hours by a team, completing 382 eyebrow waxes. 
Benefit Cosmetic's "Hoola Matte Bronzer" was named the best beauty product by Nylon in 2014. The "Hoola Matte Bronzer" has been given much recognition, including being on the list of Top 10 Best Bronzers of 2018 and named the most sold bronzer in Britain by Vogue. The "Hoola Matte Bronzer" was also announced to be the #1 best-selling bronzer in the United States. 
A beauty blog called Temptalia named Benefit's "They're Real" mascara as the Reader's Choice winner for Best High End Mascara from 2013 to 2015. As well as receiving the Reader's Choice Award of Best Mascara in department stores by Allure in 2014. 
Eric Wade Heitmann (born February 24, 1980) is a former center. He was drafted by the 49ers in the 7th round (239th overall) of the 2002 NFL Draft. 
Heitmann graduated from Stanford University where he was voted first team All-American following the 2001 season. He played guard for his entire tenure as a Cardinal, and he was a three time All-Pac-10 selection.  Heitmann became the first Stanford offensive lineman voted All-American since Bob Whitfield in 1992. 
In 2002, Heitmann was the first rookie to start a game on the 49ers offensive line since 1987, when Harris Barton started at right tackle. He finished the 2002 season starting 12 games, including two playoff contests. He switched to center in the absence of regular center Jeremy Newberry. After an injury-plagued 2003 season, he started all 16 games in 2004. 
Prior to the 2005 season, he worked to get stronger and more powerful under the tutelage of renowned strength coach Johnny Parker. His work paid off early in minicamps, and the 49ers signed him to a 4-year extension in June 2005. He started in all 16 games including 10 at right guard and six at center during the 2005 season. 
In 2007, Heitmann proved that he successfully recovered from his injury, as he once again started all 16 games at center. 
Heitmann graduated from Stanford with a degree in public policy. He and his wife, Emily, live in Texas with their two daughters. Eric is a gifted musician who plays concert piano, as well as composes his own music. His most recent original compositions can be found at ericheitmann.com. 
As the inverse of a Hermitian matrix, the precision matrix of real-valued random variables, if it exists, is positive definite and symmetrical. 
Another reason the precision matrix may be useful is that if two dimensions i and j of a multivariate normal are conditionally independent, then the ij and ji elements of the precision matrix are 0. This means that precision matrices tend to be sparse when many of the dimensions are conditionally independent, which can lead to computational efficiencies when working with them. It also means that precision matrices are closely related to the idea of partial correlation. 
Wild Choir was an American country music band. It consisted of Gail Davies (lead vocals), Larry Chaney (guitar), Pete Pendras (guitar), Denny Dadmun-Bixby (bass guitar), and Bob Mummert (drums). 
Wild Choir's singles received major criticism from country music radio. Many stations found the recordings to be too closely associated with rock music, believing it would not respond well with listeners. Although they did not achieve major chart success, Wild Choir has been cited as the forerunner of today's Americana movement and has influenced other country bands, including Highway 101 and Foster & Lloyd. 
The Cockman Family is a bluegrass/Southern gospel band from Sherrills Ford, North Carolina, United States. 
Billy Cockman won the 2013 National Banjo Championship in Winfield, KS, after taking third place in 2012. He also won the 2010 South Carolina Banjo Championship at Renofest in Hartsville, SC. and the 2009 North Carolina Banjo Champtionship at The Carolina in the Fall Festival in Wilkesboro, 
The Butterpats, a second-generation youth group featuring John Jr's daughters, were awarded the 2011 WMA Harmony Yodeling Duo of the Year and the 2011 WMA Youth Harmony award at the Western Music Association Showcase and Awards Show in Albuquerque, NM. 
The Cockman Family has developed a distinct bluegrass gospel style that has gained audiences throughout the Southeast. Their arrangements of old gospel songs have been very popular.  Their tight harmonies and original songs have been applauded for their unique sounds. 
The Cockman Family is made up of a sister, four brothers, and their father: John Cockman Sr. on guitar, Caroline Cockman Fisher on lead vocals, John Cockman Jr. on fiddle and bass vocals, Billy Cockman on banjo and tenor vocals, David Cockman on bass and baritone vocals, and Ben Cockman on mandolin and baritone vocals. 
The Cockman Family has recorded multiple records.  Eleven of their songs have been released as singles to bluegrass and gospel radio stations.  Their newest album, Dedicated, was released in 2011 and features original songs as well as favorite hymns. 
The Vorkuta Uprising was a major uprising of forced labor camp inmates at the Vorkuta Gulag in Vorkuta, Russian SFSR, USSR from 19 July (or 22 July) to 1 August 1953, shortly after the arrest of Lavrentiy Beria. The uprising was violently stopped by the camp administration after two weeks of bloodless standoff. 
After submission of the mob, many "saboteurs" were arrested and placed in maximum security cells, but without further punitive executions. Conditions were marginally improved (especially for "political" inmates). 
A similar fictional uprising at Vorkuta, albeit ten years later, was depicted in the story mode of the 2010 video game Call of Duty: Black Ops. 
In response to the finish in 1981, for the 1982 Tour de France, French minister of sports Edwige Avice objected to the amount of advertising in the race, and suggested the Tour to return to the national team format. The Tour organisation needed the money brought in by the sponsors, and no changes were made to the team structure. 
Hinault, who had won the Tour in 1978, 1979 and 1981, and left the 1980 Tour in leading position, was the clear favourite for the victory. In those other years, Hinault had won several races before the Tour, but in 1982 he had only won one major race, the 1982 Giro d'Italia. Hinault tried to be the fourth cyclist, after Fausto Coppi, Jacques Anquetil and Eddy Merckx, to win the Giro-Tour double. 
The following is a list of professional and amateur theatres and theatre companies in Budapest, Hungary. They are organised alphabetically in name order. 
Jean Bastien-Thiry, found guilty of organizing an assassination attempt against French president Charles de Gaulle on 22 August 1962, was executed at the Fort d'Ivry on 11 March 1963. Bastien-Thiry's was the last execution by firing squad in France. 
Kenneth Alan Taylor (born 1937) is a British pantomime writer and actor. He is best known for having played the pantomime dame for thirty years in his own productions at Nottingham Playhouse. 
His awards include the Manchester Evening News best supporting actor for Price and a Nottingham University honorary doctor of letters in 2011.  In January 2019, Nottingham City Transport named one of their buses after him to mark his 35th Nottingham Playhouse Pantomime. 
Taylor is married to Judith Barker. They have two children; award-winning make-up designer Jessica Taylor and Award-winning lighting designer Jason Taylor. 
Although rhabdoid variants of LCLC are sometimes referred to as "rhabdoid carcinomas", this particular term should be reserved for examples of "pure" rhabdoid neoplasms (i.e. those that do not contain cells containing other histological variants) 
More than 99% of primary lung cancers are carcinoma, which are tumors composed of cells that originate from embryonic ectoderm or endoderm, or that feature epithelial characteristics or differentiation. Eight major groups of lung carcinomas are recognized in WHO-2004: 
It seems likely that mutations and post-translational modifications affecting cytokeratin 8, cytokeratin 18, and vimentin protofilaments are intimately involved in the genesis of the characteristic inclusions and, therefore, of the rhabdoid phenotype. The particulars of this process are poorly understood, but depend in part on the origin of the tumor and stochastic genomic phenomena. 
Rhabdoid cells often express protein products suggestive of aggressive, dedifferentiated cells, including neuroendocrine tumor-related products and granulocyte-macrophage colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF). Vimentin, an intermediate filament protein usually associated with non-carcinomatous tumors (i.e. sarcoma), is ubiquitous in rhabdoid cells. Co-expression of cytokeratins and vimentin are associated with cells undergoing epithelial-mesenchymal transition (EMT). 
While undifferentiated large-cell lung carcinoma is the most common parent lung tumor from which a rhabdoid phenotype evolves, malignant cells with a rhabdoid phenotype are known to occur in many different histological variants of lung cancer, including adenocarcinoma, sarcomatoid carcinoma, squamous cell carcinoma, combined large cell neuroencrine carcinoma, and mucinous bronchioloalveolar carcinoma  and combined small cell lung carcinoma. 
It has been reported recently that LCLC-RP can metastasize locally within the airways ("aerogeneous spread"), an uncommon mechanism of extension wherein tumor cells migrate along the lung walls and septa, but do not destroy air sacs. Previously, this type of metastatic behavior had not been seen in this particular tumor, being traditionally associated almost exclusively with the "pneumonic" form of pulmonary bronchioloalveolar carcinoma.[citation needed] 
While occasional scattered rhabdoid cell formation occurs with considerable frequency in lung carcinomas, this is not considered to be of clinical significance. According to current classification criteria, a tumor can only be diagnosed as LCLC-RP when an undifferentiated large-cell lung carcinoma contains a rhabdoid cell component that makes up at least 10% of the tumor mass. 
The differential diagnosis of LCLC-RP includes secondary metastatic lesions, malignant melanoma of the lung with rhabdoid phenotype, mucinous adenocarcinomas (particularly those featuring signet-ring cells), rhabdomyosarcoma, epitheloid angiosarcoma, pleural mesothelioma, and plasmacytoma. 
On radiological imaging, most cases of LCLC-RP are single "coin lesions" or discrete masses, but cases presenting as multiple nodules throughout the lung have also been noted. Cases with inhomogeneous-appearing consolidation on CT have been reported, as well as aerogenous, lepidic-type spread. Some large, centrally located LCLC-RP have been noted to show signs of gross necrosis and cavitation on imaging studies, as well as being associated with the presence of large bullae. 
Vimentin, an intermediate filament protein usually found in sarcoma, is ubiquitously (nearly 100%) expressed diffusely throughout the cytoplasm of the rhabdoid cells, and is often intermingled with CK's in their whorled inclusions. Some studied have reported that neuroendocrine-related markers (i.e. neuron-specific enolase (NSE), neural cell adhesion molecule (NCAM), chromogranin A (CgA), synaptophysin), are also quite frequently expressed in a significant proportion of rhabdoid cells. 
A recent study reported a case wherein 2 courses of adjuvant therapy with cisplatin and paclitaxel, followed by oral gefitinib, were used after complete resection. The patient had had no recurrence 34 months later. 
There are case reports of rhabdoid carcinomas recurring after unusually long periods, which is unusual for a fast-growing, aggressive tumor type. One report described a very early stage patient whose tumor recurred 6 years after initial treatment. Although rapidly progressive, fulminant courses seem to be the rule in this entity, long-term survival has also been noted, even post-metastectomy in late stage, distant metastatic disease. 
Similar to nearly all variants of lung carcinoma, large cell lung carcinoma with rhabdoid phenotype appears to be highly related to tobacco smoking. It also appears to be significantly more common in males than in females. 
Although Colby and colleagues were the first to report a primary lung cancer with a rhabdoid phenotype in a paper published in 1995, cells with these characteristic features had been previously noted in 1978, when they were noted to occur in a rare and extremely aggressive form of kidney cancer that appears almost exclusively in young children called "Wilms tumor". 
LCLC-RP were first recognized as a distinct entity under the 3rd (published in 1999) revision of the World Health Organization (WHO) lung tumor histological typing scheme. Its placement in the classification schema went unchanged during the 2004 revision. 
Barnes said "This tour has meant a lot to me. It's really the climax of nearly a decade spent confronting my demons and using words and music to come to terms with them. At all of these shows I can feel the audience picking me up and putting me on their shoulders, so I wanted to release one of the shows from this memorable tour to say thanks to everyone who was there, and to let everyone else know what they missed." 
Nationality words link to articles with information on the nation's poetry or literature (for instance, Irish or France). 
The Fisher Flyer was a single seat tricycle landing gear biplane ultralight aircraft first flown by Michael Fisher in July 1980. It was the first aircraft designed by Fisher and became the first of more than 3500 Fisher aircraft flying by 2007. 
The aircraft was a conventional single seat ultralight based on the wings taken from the Easy Riser hang glider. The fuselage and tail were of original design. The airframe structure was of aluminum tube, covered with aircraft fabric. The landing gear was of a fixed tricycle configuration. 
Millidgeville is situated on the northern edge of the city, on Brothers Cove off the Kennebecasis River at the point where that westerly flowing river meets the southerly flowing Saint John River. 
The tower of the Royal Kennebeccasis Yacht Club (RKYC) has been a beacon to boaters since its construction at the turn of the 20th century. The Club was founded in 1898. In 1899, The Club published her Constitution, by-laws, sailing regulations, yacht routine, list of members, list of yachts, and signal code 
Millidgeville took its name from Thomas Millidge who operated a shipyard on the peninsula now known as "The Moorings of Millidgeville" subdivision. During Millidge's time, there were over thirty large oceangoing wooden ships built at his "Kennebecasis Shipyard." Eric Lawson authored two books on the Millidge yard's ships; "When They Sailed The World - EGERIA & The Millidge Family Ships" and "The EGERIA - An Example of mid-nineteenth century New Brunswick Ship Construction." 
Today, Millidgeville is home to the University of New Brunswick (UNBSJ) Saint John campus in Tucker Park, as well as the Saint John Regional Hospital, the city's largest employer and the province's largest hospital. Amenities include the RKYC, Rockwood Park, Canada's second largest urban park with a public golf course, the Charles Gorman Arena, tennis courts and several sports fields. 
Born in Jerusalem in 1952, Noked studied law at the Hebrew University of Jerusalem. She became a legal advisor to the Kibbutz Movement in 1986, a job she held until 1992. Between 1996 and 2002 she served as director of the movement's legal department. She has also been a member of the Jewish National Fund's directorate, the Agricultural Association's secretariat, the National Council for Environmental Quality and the board of the Israel Lands Authority. 
She retained her seat in the 2009 elections after winning thirteenth place on the Labor list. Orit Noked served as Deputy Minister of Industry, Trade, and Labor from April 2009 until January 2011. In January 2011 she was one of five MKs to leave the party to establish Independence, and was appointed Minister of Agriculture and Rural Development. She lost her seat in 2013 when the party chose not to contest the elections. 
Edson Rizzo (born 22 November 1957) is a Brazilian handball player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1992 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Brazilian handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ammoplanina is a subtribe of aphid wasps in the family Crabronidae, subfamily Pemphredoninae. There are about 10 genera and at least 130 described species in Ammoplanina. In some phylogenetic analyses, this group is the sister lineage to the bees, and accorded family rank as Ammoplanidae so as to keep families monophyletic. 
The Society for Historians of the Early American Republic (SHEAR) is an organization that was established in 1977 to study the history of the United States in the period between 1775 and 1861. 
The Society holds annual conferences, awards prizes and fellowships, and publishes the Journal of the Early Republic. 
Nishioka was released by Kagoshima United at the end of the 2019 season. He later retired and was appointed as head coach of Kagoshima United's U-15 academy team. 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football midfielder born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chiappori studied at various Parisian universities, receiving degrees in mathematics, statistics, and economics. He graduated with a Ph.D. in economics from the University Paris I in 1981. 
He has served various journals in an editorial capacity, such as the Review of Economics of the Household, the Journal of Political Economy and the Journal of the European Economic Association. 
He was elected fellow of the Econometric Society and the European Economic Association in 1995 and 2004, respectively. In 2015 he was made fellow of the Society for the Advancement of Economic Theory. 
With the prospect of becoming encircled, the Eleventh Army ordered a withdrawal on 4 January. Units were also low on munitions and rations. Withdrawing forces fended off attack by nine armies and over 20 Chinese divisions. Further complicating matters, this was done while protecting rear service units and wounded. Some Japanese units, like the 200 man detachment from the 9th Independent Mixed Brigade were almost completely destroyed (only one survivor). 
The offensive resulted in failure for the Japanese, as Chinese forces were able to lure them into a trap and encircle them. After suffering heavy casualties, Japanese forces were forced to carry out a general retreat. 
This biographical article relating to Indian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The population was a mix of Mexican and European immigrants. Some of the miners are known to have come from Stafford, England 
Brodhead was a mining town built and owned by a company formed by three brothers: Henry C. Brodhead (President) who was married to the author Eva Wilder Brodhead, Albert G. Brodhead (Vice President), and Robert S. Brodhead (Secretary and General Manager) and operated between the late 1890s and the mid 1960s. The Brodhead brothers had previously operated a mine in Gonzales Canyon between 1896 and 1899. Initially the town was built as a company town 
The 1911 Gazetter Publishing Company Business Directory listing for Brodhead, Las Animas Co. describes the town as: 
The 1929 edition of the American Mining & Metallurgical Manual lists the Temple Fuel Company operating in the canyon  as: 
There are a number of deaths known at the mines, which, in common with all mining then and now was a dangerous occupation, including: 
Dean Craven (born 17 February 1979) is a footballer who played as a midfielder for Shrewsbury Town in the Football League. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a midfielder born in the 1970s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Downing Street Years is a memoir by Margaret Thatcher, former Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, covering her premiership of 1979 to 1990. It was accompanied by a four-part BBC television series of the same name. 
Thatcher had eighteen months to write the book covering her premiership. She hired a previous director of the Conservative Research Department, Robin Harris, to do most of the writing, the Oxford academic Christopher Collins to do the research and O'Sullivan to help polish the drafts. Just like with her speeches, Thatcher would "edit, criticise and exhaustively rewrite the drafts" until she was happy. 
Some sources believe that Thatcher wrote at least part of the book at the Manor House Hotel, in Castle Combe, in the Full Glass bar. 
Thatcher was interviewed with David Frost on Breakfast with Frost about her memoirs, and she promoted her book with radio and television interviews, book signings, a question and answer session at the Barbican chaired by Jeffrey Archer and a four-part BBC television series. 
Geoffrey Howe reviewed the book in the Financial Times, Nigel Lawson in the Evening Standard, Douglas Hurd in The Spectator, Norman Tebbit in the Daily Mail and Bernard Ingham in the Daily Express. 
Kelly Mantle (born July 9, 1976), is an American actor, singer/songwriter, comedian, musician, drag queen, and reality television personality. Mantle appeared as a contestant on the sixth season of the reality TV show RuPaul's Drag Race. 
Mantle's uncle was professional baseball player Mickey Mantle, who played for the New York Yankees. Mantle graduated with a BFA in Theatre from the University of Oklahoma. 
After college, Mantle went to Chicago to begin a career as an actor. She acted in plays such as The Convention and Royal Flush. Lone Star/Laundry & Bourbon was the first production by OKRA Theatre, a theater company started by Mantle and her friend Tracy Parks, who directed the play. 
In 1998, Mantle starred in the Chicago production of Charles Busch's play Vampire Lesbians of Sodom. After two years of living in Chicago, she moved to Los Angeles. She later auditioned for the Los Angeles production of Vampire Lesbians of Sodom, where she was scouted and signed by a talent agent. 
In Los Angeles, Mantle became a member of the band Sex with Lurch, which was formed by singer Robbie Quinne and guitarist Bernard Yin. As part of the group, Mantle used the stage name "Brandy Warhol". The group disbanded in December 2002. Mantle later joined Quinne's follow-up band, the Barbarellatones. 
Currently, Mantle is a member of the band the Rollz Royces with Tammie Brown and Michael Catti. Mantle and Catti have appeared in Tammie Brown's Christmas show Holiday Sparkle at Fubar in West Hollywood. 
In 2014 Mantle starred in Confessions of a Womanizer with Gary Busey. The film was released in 2016. Mantle, who is genderfluid, made history when the film's producers sought both supporting actor and supporting actress consideration for her performance and The Academy granted the request. 
In December 2013, Logo announced that Mantle was among fourteen drag queens who would be competing on the sixth season of RuPaul's Drag Race. She was eliminated in the first episode, lip-synching to Express Yourself against Vivacious. 
Joaquin C. "Kin" Arriola, born on December 25, 1925, is an attorney and a former Democratic Party of Guam politician in Guam. Arriola served as a senator in the Guam Legislature from 1955 to 1959 and as a senator in and Speaker of the Guam Legislature from 1967 to 1971, ran for Governor of Guam in 1974, and was the husband of former senator in the Guam Legislature Elizabeth P. Arriola. 
Arriola graduated cum laude with a Bachelor of Arts at the College of St. Thomas in 1950. He earned his Juris Doctor at the University of Minnesota in 1953. He was admitted to the Bar for Minnesota in 1953.[citation needed] 
Arriola was elected to the Guam Legislature in 1954 and served for two consecutive terms. Arriola was admitted to the Guam Bar in 1957. He served as legal counsel for the 5th, 6th, and 7th Guam Legislatures from 1959 until 1965. Arriola served as a Selective Service Government Appeal Agent from 1959 until 1971.[citation needed] 
In 1970, Arriola teamed up with Vicente Bamba in the Democratic Party of Guam Gubernatorial Primary. In the primary, Arriola-Bamba faced the teams of Ricardo J. Bordallo and Richard F. Taitano and former appointed governor Manuel F. Leon Guerrero and Antonio C. Yamashita. The Bordallo-Taitano team faced the Republican team of Camacho-Moylan in the 1970 Guam Gubernatorial General Election. 
In 1974, Arriola teamed up with Ted S. Nelson in the Democratic Party of Guam Gubernatorial Primary. In the primary, Arriola-Nelson placed 4th against the teams of Ricardo J. Bordallo and Rudolph G. Sablan, Pedro C. Sanchez and Esteban U. Torres, and Manuel F.L. Guerrero and David D.L. Flores, with 1,254 votes. 
A constitutional referendum was held in Switzerland on 19 April 1874. The new constitution was approved by 63.2% of voters and a majority of cantons. It gave more responsibilities and powers to the federal government. 
In order to pass, any amendments to the constitution needed a double majority; a majority of the popular vote and majority of the cantons. The decision of each canton was based on the vote in that canton. Full cantons counted as one vote, whilst half cantons counted as half. 
He was a delegate to the 12th National People's Congress and is a delegate to the 13th National People's Congress. He is a representative of the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China. 
Mitchell was born on May 24, 1947, in Modesto, California. Mitchell's father was William Mitchell and her mother was Doris Mitchell.  
Mitchell was a National Merit Scholar at Stanford University, where her work included an independent study project on Brillouin scattering in bromine.  In 1969, Mitchell graduated with a Bachelor of Science degree in physics from Stanford University with distinction and Phi Beta Kappa. She followed in the footsteps of her grandmother, Eulalia Richardson Mitchell, who also earned Stanford physics degrees in 1910 and 1912. 
During the mid-1990s Mitchell moved from the Watson Research Center to a different IBM group in Vermont and then (after a short leave as a visiting professor at the University of Illinois) to IBM's Printing Systems Division in Colorado. In 2007 IBM sold their Printing Systems Division to Ricoh, and Mitchell went with them to the resulting joint venture, InfoPrint Solutions. She retired in 2009, and died on December 2, 2015. 
Kalku or Calcu, in Mapuche mythology, is a sorcerer or witch who works with black magic and negative powers or forces.  The essentially benevolent shamans are more often referred to as machi, to avoid confusion with the malevolent kalku. Its origins are in Mapuche tradition. 
The word kalku is a borrowing from Puquina language Its adoption by Mapuches fits into a pattern of parallels in the Mapuche and Central Andean cosmology (Inca religion) dating back to the times of Tiwanaku Empire when Puquina was an important language. 
The kalku is a semi-mythical character that has the power of working with wekufe "spirits or wicked creatures". An example of a wekufe is the Nguruvilu. The kalku also have as servants other beings such as the Anchimayen, or the Chonchon (which is the magical manifestation of the more powerful kalku). 
A mapuche kalku is usually an inherited role, although it could be a machi that is interested in lucrative ends or a "less powerful", frustrated machi who ignores the laws of the admapu (the rules of the Mapuches). 
Kalku is the main antagonist of 2020 Annecy nominated Chilean-Brazilian featured animated film Nahuel and the Magic Book created by Carburadores and German Acuna . 
This article relating to a myth or legend from South America is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alia's Birth is a 2021 independent drama film by Sam Abbas starring Poorna Jagannathan, Nikohl Boosheri, Maya Kazan, and Samuel H. Levine. 
In April 2019, it was announced Poorna Jagannathan, Nikohl Boosheri, were cast for Alia's Birth, with Sam Abbas directing the film. Tatiana Bears, Nicole Townsend and Abbas were producing, with Sig De Miguel and Stephen Vincent co-producing. Shortly after the rest of the cast was released. 
In May 2020, The Hollywood Reporter released a first-look of the feature with major information. The film was shortlisted for the 2020 Cannes Film festival before the festival was cancelled because of the COVID-19 pandemic. Abbas made it clear that the film was for theatrical viewings only. It would never have a life outside of theatres; no DVD/Blu-ray/VOD release. The film premiered on 26 August 2021. 
The Guardian was the first to review saying "the sudden onrush of biological imperative gives this footage a gripping undeniability and focus that this loosely collaged account of a foundering Brooklyn relationship has been searching for". 
The kuraka was an aristocrat who frequently, but not always, descended from the previous generation. Kuraka means 'superior' or 'principal', and his authority was granted by the Inca. Each ayllu actually had four kurakas: upper and lower (hanan and hurin), and each of these had an assistant. However, of the four, one kuraka was still superior to the rest. 
One of the functions of the kurakas was to choose a bride for adult males, aged 25 and over, who could not choose, or had not chosen, a wife. The kurakas could also decide, in the event two men wanted to marry the same woman, which man would be allowed to marry. The kurakas also dealt with minor crimes, but had to refer major crimes to the provincial capital. Among other duties, the kurakas settled disputes, allocated agricultural lands, organized community events, and officiated ceremonies. 
Cody Balogh (born February 14, 1986) is a former American football offensive lineman. He was signed by the Bears as an undrafted free agent in 2008. He played college football at Montana. 
Cody was first-team all-conference at Steilacoom High School, in Steilacoom, Washington, on both offense and defense in both his junior and senior years, respectively. He was named a first-team all-state by the Tacoma News Tribune and participated in the Washington All-Star Game as a senior. He also was a two-year starter in basketball and played on a team that was ranked No. 2 in the state his senior year. 
Balogh was undrafted in the 2008 NFL Draft. In May 2008, Balogh tried out for the Chicago Bears in their annual rookie minicamp following the draft. After the rookie minicamp, Balogh was signed as an undrafted free agent. His arrival on the scene was considered a "nice surprise" by the Chicago Sun-Times. 
After spending his rookie season on the practice squad, Balogh was re-signed to a future contract on December 29, 2008. Cody was waived on the September 5 cutdown to the 53 man regular season roster. 
Cody is the son of Steven and Patricia Balogh. In college, he majored in health and human performance. 
Hollis Scarborough  is an American psychologist and literacy expert who is a senior scientist at Haskins Laboratories in New Haven, Connecticut. She has been a leading researcher in the area of reading acquisition since 1981, and has been involved with efforts to improve US national policy on the teaching of reading. 
Sodium nitrite/sodium thiosulfate, sold under the brand name Nithiodote, is a fixed-dose combination medication used as an antidote for cyanide poisoning. It contains sodium thiosulfate and sodium nitrite. It is given by intravenous infusion into a vein. 
Giovanni Migliorini (born February 21, 1931 in Milan) was a retired Italian professional football player. He died in 1980. 
This biographical article related to association football in Italy, about a forward born in the 1930s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hylobius pinicola, the couper collar weevil, is a species of pine weevil in the family of beetles known as Curculionidae. It is found in North America. 
Hattarvik was founded in 900. The stone church was built in 1899. Some old stone houses are currently being restored. These houses are said to relate to the Flokksmenn. These were three strong men who wanted to seize power in the Faroe Islands in the 15th century. 
Whiteman Air Force Base is a United States Air Force base located just south of Knob Noster, Missouri, United States. The base is the current home of the B-2 Spirit bomber. It is named for 2nd Lt George Whiteman, who was killed during the attack on Pearl Harbor. 
After the end of World War II, operations at the airfield declined, and many of the buildings were abandoned. In December 1947, the base was put on inactive status. 
In August 1951, the base was renamed again, to Sedalia Air Force Base, as it was now part of the United States' newest military service branch, the US Air Force. 
In October 1952, the base was turned over to the 340th Bombardment Wing. Improvements were made to the 1942 runway, as well as other base facilities, and Strategic Air Command (SAC) scheduled the base to receive squadrons flying the B-47 Stratojet and the KC-97 Stratofreighter. The first B-47 landed at the base in March 1954. 
On 3 December 1955, the base was renamed Whiteman Air Force Base in honor of 2nd Lieutenant George A. Whiteman, an Army Air Corps pilot who was killed during the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor while attempting to take off from Bellows Field. Whiteman was born in Longwood, Missouri, and graduated from Smith-Cotton High School in Sedalia, less than 20 miles from the base that would bear his name. 
In 1963, Whiteman AFB transitioned from being a bomber base to a missile base. SAC activated the 351st Strategic Missile Wing at Whiteman on 1 February. On 1 September, having retired its B-47 and KC-97 aircraft, the remnants of the 340th Bombardment Wing were transferred to Bergstrom AFB, Texas where it assumed control of the B-52 Stratofortress and KC-135 Stratotanker assets of the inactivating 4130th Strategic Wing. 
The transition of Whiteman AFB from a bomber base to missile base required massive military construction (MILCON) projects. 867,000 cubic yards of earth and rock were excavated to make room for underground launch facilities and 15 launch control centers. 168,000 yards of concrete, 25,355 tons of reinforcing steel, and 15,120 tons of structural steel were used in the effort, and a vast underground intersite cable network was installed.[citation needed] 
The 351st employed the LGM-30 Minuteman weapons system, an ICBM capable of hitting targets up to 4300 miles away. In the mid-1960s, the Minuteman I missiles were swapped out in favor of the Minuteman II, an ICBM with increased range and an improved guidance system.[citation needed] 
In the 1980s, Whiteman AFB became the first missile base to field an all-female Minuteman missile crew, as well as the first male and female Minuteman crew. 
On 30 November 1988, SAC announced that the 509th Bomb Wing would divest its FB-111 and KC-135 aircraft, relocate from its then-home station of Pease AFB, New Hampshire which was being realigned as an Air National Guard base pursuant to BRAC, and become the nation's first operational B-2 bomber unit. On 17 December 1993, Whiteman AFB's first B-2 touched down on the installation's runway. 21 B-2s would eventually be produced, 20 of which are still operational. All 20 are based at Whiteman AFB. 
On 1 Apr 1994, the 442nd Fighter Wing of the Air Force Reserve Command relocated to Whiteman AFB with their A-10 Thunderbolt II aircraft to become a tenant command at Whiteman AFB following the BRAC-directed closure of their former home station, Richards-Gebaur AFB, Missouri. 
Units marked GSU are Geographically Separate Units, which although based at Whiteman, are subordinate to a parent unit based at another location. 
In addition to a successful career in archaeology, Aguigah has also held high political offices in the Government of Togo. 
In 2012, Aguigah became director of the Independent National Electoral Commission (CENI) in Benin. Her time at CENI was not without controversy: she announced that elections could be ready in May 2013, ahead of the government's expected date of October, which caused opposition from the government. She had previously been an RTP candidate in the 2007 legislative elections. She has been outspoken about the need for internal and external investment on the archaeological heritage of Togo. 
Wells-Jankovic syndrome is a rare neurologic disorder characterized by spastic paraparesis presents in late childhood along with hearing loss. 
In 1986 Wells and Jankovic reported the condition in 6 males. There have been no new cases in the literature since 1986. 
The stadium comprises the Main Stand of 8000 seats, with grass banking on the remaining three sides. The Back Stand opposite the Main Stand can accommodate 12000, with the remaining ends 4000 each. 
Shimizu S-Pulse used the ground extensively in the 1990s, largely sharing home stadium duties with Nihondaira Stadium at the dawn of the J.League in 1992. S-Pulse called Kusanagi home while Nihondaira was being expanded in 1994, and its pitch re-laid in 2003. However, Shimizu have not used the stadium for competitive games since 2003. 
The forest inn, Deisterpforte, was built in 1876 by the Ratskeller publican, Christian Bauer, on the edge of Springe as a daytrippers' destination; it is still in operation. 
The Tougouri Department is a department or commune of Namentenga Province in northern Burkina Faso. Its capital is the town of Tougouri. 
The song "Step Out of Hell" from the Helloween album Chameleon is written by Roland Grapow about Schwichtenberg's problems with drug abuse. 
After Helloween, Schwichtenberg's father had died in February 1995, and he slid further and further into his schizophrenic episodes, culminating in his suicide on 8 March 1995 by jumping in front of an S-train in his native hometown Hamburg. He was 29 years old. 
Schwichtenberg's replacement in the band was Uli Kusch. Helloween dedicated the album The Time of the Oath to him. His friend Kai Hansen had dedicated the song "Afterlife" from Gamma Ray's Land of the Free to him. Michael Kiske also made a tribute to Schwichtenberg with the track "Always" from his first solo album Instant Clarity. 
This biographical article relating to volleyball in Slovakia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After a long time as an activist and director of the Partito Comunista Italiano (PCI) and of the Democratici di Sinistra (DS), he became a deputy in the Italian Chamber of Deputies in 1996, and was re-elected to that role in 2001 and 2006. 
In the XIV Legislatura he became the DS's capogruppo on the Commission on Institutional Affairs of the Chamber and a member of the Bicameral Anti-mafia Commission.  On 4 May 2006 he was elected vice-president of the Chamber of Deputies. 
Following the 4th Congress of the DS, which sanctioned the birth of the Partito Democratico, Leoni left the DS and joined the Sinistra Democratica. 
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
The jaws ratio is a measure used in finance to demonstrate the extent to which a trading entity's income growth rate exceeds its expenses growth rate, measured as a percentage. 
Strictly speaking, it is not a true ratio in that the calculation is not expressed as one number divided by another, and is calculated as follows: 
The jaws ratio is significant in that a larger positive value demonstrates that a trading entity is effectively generating more income over time than it is generating expenses, thereby potentially increasing its profitability, and profitability growth rate. 
The ratio may also be a negative percentage, which should be a cause for concern for the owners/management of a trading entity as this will over time result in eroded profitability. 
Jaroslav Otruba was born in Olomouc, Morava, then part of the Austro-Hungarian Empire. He was the son of a cabinetmaker. His life spanned several turbulent periods of Czech Republic's history:  World War I before the dissolution of the Austro-Hungarian Empire in 1918; under Nazi occupation from 1939 until the end of World War II in 1945; and under the rule of the communist Soviet Republic from 1948 to 1989. 
Jaroslav Otruba's most prolific work, particularly in architecture, was produced during the latter part of the 20th century. He contributed to the urban design and planning of Prague and the rest of Czech Republic. He is best known for his contributions to the creation, design, and development of the Prague Metro system. 
Jaroslav Otruba was both an architect and urban planner. One of his more visited contributions are the colorful aluminum tiles found in Line A of the Prague Metro. The artistic style of the tiles draws on the op-art movement of the 1960s and it is considered a Prague tourist attraction. 
During the closure of Czech universities Jaroslav Otruba joined the studio-office of F. Stalmach and J. Svoboda as an architect. 
In August 1945, the University of Architecture and Civil Engineering hired Jaroslav Otruba as an assistant professor, participating in a vast study of surgical hospital departments for his dissertation. During this period, he helped create the Department of Medical Architecture at the University. In 1953, he received his Doctorate in Architecture. From 1956 to 1959 he completed a second dissertation on maternity wards. 
Otruba designed a thermal colonnade in Karlovy Vary in 1961, as part of a larger urban design for the spa town. The colonnade was never completed. 
In 1979 Jaroslav Otruba was transferred to Metroproject, a new department tasked with building the massive Prague public transportation system. As lead architect and designer, he oversaw the creation of the A and C lines of the Prague Metro. Jaroslav Otruba is the designer of the distinctive aluminum tiles that can be found throughout the Metro A line. 
In the 1990s he experimented with abstract painting, concentrating on lines and colors, movement of lines and circles, sometimes interpreting a city within a dramatic storm. In 2000 he started to paint different cities and small towns from old maps. In 2001 an illness prevented him from continuing his passion for painting. 
Jaroslav Otruba did not pursue exhibition or compensation for his paintings. He had one art exhibition at Most Hospital in 1983. His paintings are held in private collections in Europe, the United States, and Australia. After his death in 2007, his wife sold one of his paintings in an art auction at Prague Gallery Kodl in 2009 
This article incorporates text from the United States National Library of Medicine, which is in the public domain. 
The Palazzo Dondini Ghiselli  is a Neoclassical-style palace located on Via Barberia #23, corner with Via Mario Finzi, in central Bologna, region of Emilia-Romagna, Italy. 
The palace was designed by Alfonso Torreggiani; with a facade completed in 1753. In 1773, the grand entry staircase was built by Giangiacomo Dotti, with statues by Antonio Schiassi and a fresco of the Aurora by Pietro Fabri. The elevated garden behind the Via Barberia facade, and overlooking the Piazza Malpighi was once a stable built in 1612 by Pietro Fiorini. 
All's Fair is an American television sitcom from Norman Lear that aired one season  on CBS from 1976 to 1977. The series co-starred Richard Crenna as a conservative political columnist and Bernadette Peters as a liberal photographer, and their romantic mismatch because of age and political opinions. The program also featured  Michael Keaton in an early role as Lanny Wolf.  Peters was nominated for a Golden Globe Award for her role. 
In Washington, D.C., an older (49) conservative columnist Richard C. Barrington (Richard Crenna) and a young (23) liberal photographer Charlotte (Charley) Drake (Bernadette Peters) become romantically involved.  The complications of their politics and the age difference provide the story lines. They are "separated by politics, generation gap, manners and living styles". 
Barrington is a gourmet cook who lives in a luxurious Washington townhouse, and Drake is a vegetarian. Barrington has a girl friend, a literary agent (Salome Jens), when he first meets Drake. The style of the show is "almost constant hysteria, the rapid pacing set to the sounds of argumentative shouting." 
The reviewer for Knight News Wire wrote that the show "looks like the best new comedy series of the year...The show looks sound in both writing and acting ... the characters spend a lot of time shouting. Lear seems to have decided ... that high-decibel dialogue is necessary to hold the attention of a large audience." 
The critic for The New York Times wrote that "The casting is first-rate and the finger-snapping pace of the show leaves just about everything looking easy and undemanding. 
The reviewer for Copley News Service wrote that he did not believe in the relationship (between Crenna and Peters). However, he wrote that "it works. It works because Crenna is an expert farceur and Peters is, well, cute and full of the old ginger. It works because the dialogue has crackle and wit. ...  Peters has spunk and spirit and a bawdy and snappishly delightful wit ... a well-paced, intelligently conceived and altogether trenchant comedy and I don't see how it can miss." 
Rhyothemis fuliginosa, also known as the butterfly dragonfly or the butterfly flutterer, is a species of dragonfly of the family Libellulidae found throughout East Asia, in the countries of Japan, China, Taiwan, and the Korean Peninsula. 
Flights occur between the months of June and September. They are most active from early summer to the mid-autumn season. 
Rhyothemis fuliginosa is a short and stout dragonfly with a body length of 32-41 millimeters in length. The wings are 30-40 mm across and patterned with a deep blue iridescent shade. Depending on the viewing angle, the dragonfly's wings can vary in color due to their light scattering properties, with some appearing golden in the light. The wing patterns are thought to be a determinant between members of the same species to avoid mating with the incorrect partner. 
Males have spots on the tips of their hindwings, a feature that allows differentiation between male and female individuals. Southern Japanese specimens of R. fuliginosa feature spotted forewings and entirely pigmented hindwings. 
Rhyothemis fuliginosa is found throughout East Asia, being known to have been spotted in China, Japan, Taiwan, and the Korean Peninsula. It has been known to extend its range further south into Vietnam as well. 
In Japan the dragonfly is found throughout the main island of Honshu from as far north as Aomori Prefecture and can be found further south into the island of Kyushu's Kagoshima Prefecture. Overall, R. fuliginosa is found throughout the islands of Honshu, Shikoku, and Kyushu. There have been reports of sightings further north into Hokkaido as well. Its range further extends onto the offshore islands off the Japanese mainland, such as Tanegashima. 
In Mainland China, R. fuliginosa is found in: Guangdong, Hebei, Henan, Hunan, Jiangsu, Jiangxi, Shaanxi, Shandong, Shichuan, and Zhejiang provinces. There are unconfirmed sightings in Hainan province as well. 
It is a rare vagrant in Taiwan, with the first sighting of R. fuliginosa being recorded in 2007. Four other members of the genus Rhyothemis are found throughout the island in its absence, Rhyothemis regia, Rhyothemis severini, Rhyothemis triangularis, and Rhyothemis variegata. 
Mating is short, and egg laying occurs almost immediately following mating. Eggs are deposited by the female on the surface of freshwater bodies. R. fuliginosa overwinters as a larva, feeding on small insects. 
It has been previously known to exhibit swarming behavior, however as a result of habitat depletion and pollution with insecticide use, there has been significant population decline within Japan. Increasing urbanization has resulted visible population decline, with the butterfly flutterer becoming less and less abundant within metropolitan areas. 
 Dhanpat Rai Nahar (1919 - 2009) was an Indian politician and trade unionist. He was the joint secretary of the All India Agricultural Workers Union 1982-1992 and vice president of the organisation 1992-2003. He was a member of the Punjab State Committee of the Communist Party of India (Marxist) until 2004. 
Nahar hailed from a Hindu(kshtriya) family from Jalandhar District, Punjab. During his school years, he fought against caste-based meal segregation and men/women inequalities in society.During the Second World War he was sent to Singapore, and became a 2nd Lieutenant in the British Army. He came to join the Indian National Army. Nahar was arrested during the Manipur campaign of the INA. He was jailed until 1948. 
After his release from prison, Nahar joined the Communist Party of India. He became a leader of the rural workers movement. He was the founding general secretary of Bharatiya Khet Mazdoor Union in Punjab. When the CPI was divided in 1964, he sided with the CPI(M). He became president of the Punjab unit of the AIAWU (the rural workers front of CPI(M)). 
Jean Matter Mandler (born 1929) is Distinguished Research Professor of Cognitive Science at the University of California, San Diego and Visiting Professor at University College London. 
Mandler is a Fellow of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences and of the Society of Experimental Psychologists. She has been active on the editorial board of several developmental journals. 
In addition to his role in the Sunjata epic, Mande Bori is also a hero of hunters, and a legend claims he was born after his mother made a pact with a hunter spirit. 
Mande Bori had at least one son, Faga Leye, who was the father of Mansa Musa. Under the Arabic form of his name Abu Bakr, Mande Bori is briefly mentioned by the 14th-century Arab historian Ibn Khaldun as Musa's ancestor. 
Grey is best known as a cash-game player, but he also has several notable poker tournament wins to his name. 
He has won two bracelets at the World Series of Poker, the first in 1999 and the second in 2005.  In addition, Grey made the final table of the 2003 $10,000 No Limit Texas hold 'em Main Event, where he finished eighth, receiving $160,000. Eventual winner Chris Moneymaker eliminated Grey. 
Grey appeared in the second seasons of both the Poker Superstars Invitational Tournament and High Stakes Poker, and came second to Daniel Negreanu on Poker After Dark. 
As of 2009, his total live tournament winnings exceed $1,500,000. His 15 cashes at the WSOP account for $913,691 of those winnings. 
Das Spielzeug von Paris (English title Red Heels) is an Austrian silent film released in 1925 and directed by Michael Curtiz. It was the first film to feature French actress Lili Damita in the leading role. 
Based on the novel Red Heels by Margery Lawrence, Das Spielzeug von Paris was filmed largely in Paris by the Austrian company Sascha-Film with the help of finance from the German FPS and the British Stoll film companies. 
The film was well received by the film magazines of the time, although sometimes the storyline was criticised for being kitsch. Artur Berger's sets in particular were highly praised by film reviewers. The film was universally regarded as a success. Sascha-Film made two more films with the same team. Samuel Goldwyn invited Lili Damita to Hollywood after watching this film. 
Some copies of the film still exist, the most complete having Spanish intertitles. An advertising trailer also exists. 
The original score of the film is considered lost. In 2009, Austrian musician Florian C. Reithner composed and recorded a new score in which he plays the original "Welte - Kinoorgel" (a cinema organ by German organ manufacturer "Welte") at "Filmmuseum Potsdam", Germany. The new music was first brought to audience in a broadcast by French television channel "France 3" in Winter 2009. 
He was born Abraham Finkelstein in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, but grew up mainly in Utica, New York. He became a professional singer as a youngster.  
Around 1908, he toured with Guy Brother's Minstrel Show, and helped form a vaudeville act "Weston, Fields and Carroll". 
His first hit as a songwriter was "On the Mississippi" (1912), which he wrote the music for with Harry Carroll and Ballard MacDonald supplied the lyrics. In 1914 he wrote the lyrics to "Aba Daba Honeymoon", which was revived for the 1950 M.G.M. film Two Weeks With Love and thus got a renewed popularity which brought Fields large royalty incomes during his last two years. 
Among Field's most prolific partnerships was the one with band leader and pianist Fred Hall, with whom Fields made plenty of records and co-wrote several songs, often with comic titles like "The Shoes We Have Left Are All Right", "You're My Little Rhapsody in Blue", and "I Can't Sleep in the Movies Anymore". Hall and Fields also broadcast together as Rex Cole's Mountaineers. 
He suffered a stroke early in 1953 and was killed in a fire at Littlefield Nursing Home in Largo, Florida a little later the same year. 
It operates as train number 22863 from Howrah Junction to Yesvantpur Junction and as train number 22864 in the reverse direction, serving the states of West Bengal, Odisha, Andhra Pradesh, Tamil Nadu & Karnataka. 
As is customary with most train services in India, coach composition may be amended at the discretion of Indian Railways depending on demand. 
As the route is electrified, a Santragachi Junction-based WAP-4 powers the train up to its destination. 
Encore: Live in Concert is a live double-LP by Argent which was released in December 1974, on Epic Records PEG 33079. The performance includes the Rod Argent penned Zombies hit "Time of the Season" (1968) and the Russ Ballard penned "I Don't Believe In Miracles" which was a UK #31 hit for Colin Blunstone in 1972. Blunstone had previously been the vocalist in the Zombies with Rod Argent. 
The Reconquest of Constantinople (1261) was the recapture of the city of Constantinople by the forces of the Empire of Nicaea, leading to the re-establishment of the Byzantine Empire under the Palaiologos dynasty, after an interval of 57 years where the city had been the capital of the Latin Empire installed by the Fourth Crusade in 1204. 
The recapture of Constantinople signalled the restoration of the Byzantine Empire, and on 15 August, the day of the Dormition of the Theotokos, Emperor Michael VIII entered the city in triumph and was crowned at the Hagia Sophia. The rights of the legitimate emperor, John IV Laskaris, for whom Palaiologos had been ostensibly ruling as a guardian, were brushed aside, and the young man was blinded and imprisoned. 
Matsieng is a Setswana traditional music trio formed in 2005 in Gaborone, Botswana. They burst into the scene with their 2005 festive season album, Semakaleng. Known for their explicit lyrics, the trio has toured Botswana, Malaysia and South Africa. 
Their latest album, Setswana Sa Borre, has topped charts locally and enjoys airplay in the neighbouring South Africa, driven by their most explicit song, Tinto song. Two of the boys are natives of Gabane and one is from Kanye. 
He was the son of Captain William Bunbury McClintock-Bunbury and Pauline Caroline Diana Mary Stronge. He was educated at Eton College. He gained a commission in the Leicestershire Yeomanry, and later transferred to regular service in the Royal Scots Greys. In 1876 he served as High Sheriff of Carlow. 
In 1921 Lord Rathdonnell was appointed to the Senate of Southern Ireland in his capacity as a peer. He attended the three meetings of the Senate prior to its dissolution in 1922.  
He was the son of John II of Glymes and Margaret of Rouveroy and succeeded his father as Lord of Bergen op Zoom. In 1494 he purchased the Croy Castle. 
As his father, John III was an important political figure of his time. He was First Chamberlain at the Burgundian-Habsburg Court of Maximilian of Austria, Philip the Handsome, and Emperor Charles V. He became a Knight in the Order of the Golden Fleece and was sent in 1508 to England to arrange the marriage between Charles V and Mary Tudor. However, changes in the political alliances of the European powers meant this wedding never took place. 
The party was established on 20 January 2007 by Harold Caballeros. It contested the 2011 general elections in alliance with Encuentro por Guatemala, nominating nominated Caballeros as its presidential candidate; Suger finished fifth in a field of ten candidates with 6% of the vote. In the Congressional elections the parties won six of the 158 seats. 
Katselli's work frequently drew on her experience of displacement from her home region of Kyrenia after the 1974 Turkish invasion of Cyprus, including in her widely translated 1978 novel Galazia falaina. 
Katselli was born Rina Charalambidis in 1938 in Kyrenia, in the northern part of the island of Cyprus. 
In 1974, after the Turkish invasion of Cyprus, Katselli left her home in the newly occupied territory, settling first in Limassol and eventually in Nicosia. This displacement would become a central theme in her work. 
In 1973, Katselli founded the publishing house Chryssopolitissa. After she left Kyrenia the following year, the Theatrical Organization of Cyprus in Nicosia staged several of her plays, including Xeniteia  and I treli giagia. Her work has also been performed by Theatro Ena and Italy's Accademia Nazionale di Arte Drammatica Silvio D'Amico. 
Katselli also wrote nine novels, the best-known of which is 1978's Galazia falaina. Her work was frequently inspired by Cyprus' history and folk tradition, and she wrote both social drama and satire. 
In 2017, her book Prosfugas ston topo mou was published in English translation by Armida Publications as Kyrenia's Legend: The Life and Time of Costas Catsellis. Other works available in English translation include the novel Galazia falaina, translated as Blue Whale, and her memoir Refugee in My Homeland: Cyprus 1974. 
Katselli's introduction to politics was through her work with the guerrilla group EOKA in the late 1950s. However, she entered the political scene in earnest after the 1974 invasion and her displacement from her home province of Kyrenia. 
"Chin Up Kid" is a song recorded by American pop punk band Forever the Sickest Kids for their third studio album J.A.C.K. It was released as the album's first official single on May 7, 2013 and is also the band's first single under the label Fearless Records. It was written by Jonathan Cook, Austin Bello, Caleb Turman, Kyle Burns, and Rico Garcia. A lyric video of the song was posted on the label's YouTube channel the day before the song was officially released. 
An introduction to the song was featured as a hidden track on the pregap of J.A.C.K. The track is only available on physical copies of the album and can be heard if the disc is manually rewound past the beginning of "Chin Up Kid". The intro is one minute long, with the first fifteen seconds remaining silent until a brief orchestra is heard along with a choir singing the chorus of the song. 
The music video was announced by the band on August 13, two days prior to its release. The video premiered on fuse on August 15 and contains live footage of the band performing on Warped Tour 2013. 
"Chin Up Kid" received positive reception from fans and critics among its release. Luke O'Neil of MTV Buzzworthy stated, "If you're looking for pop-punk's "it gets better" summer anthem, then you've found it... Meet your new soundtrack to soldiering on." 
Matthew Sievers of SF Media said, "'Chin-Up Kid' is pretty much what one can expect from these guys. It's catchy, upbeat and about getting over heartbreak... It works really well and gets you excited for what's to come on the album like any opener should." Chris Cave from Reviews From The Cave claimed "Chin Up Kid" was one of the songs from the album that stood out, saying it is "one of the more catchier songs on the album." 
Chase Walbaum at Undertow Press said, "The track is classic FTSK and boasts one of the catchiest chorus' on the record. Kenzie Thomas of Ultimate Guitar listed "Chin Up Kid" as one of the highlights of the album. 
Steven Wayne Jackson (born April 8, 1969) is a former American football defensive back for the Houston Oilers/Tennessee Oilers/Tennessee Titans from 1991 to 1999. He was selected by Houston in the 3rd round (71st overall) in the 1991 NFL Draft. In 1999, the Titans made it to Super Bowl XXXIV in which Jackson appeared as a substitute; however, they lost to the Kurt Warner-led St. Louis Rams. 
Jackson entered his 17th season as a coach and first season as a cornerbacks coach with the Cincinnati Bengals on January 20, 2020. He helps lead the team's secondary, after spending nine seasons as a player in the league (1991-99). 
Previously, Jackson spent two seasons (2018-19) with the New York Jets, where he served as the team's assistant defensive backs coach. During his two seasons coaching the Jets DBs, he helped guide S Jamal Adams to consecutive Pro Bowl appearances and first-team AP All-Pro nods. Adams also led the Jets in tackles in both seasons, and was voted by his teammates both years as the Curtis Martin Team Most Valuable Player. 
Prior to his coaching career, Jackson played safety in the NFL for nine seasons (1991-99), all of which were with the Houston Oilers/Tennessee Titans. He entered the league as a third-round draft choice of the Oilers in 1991, and went on to post 14 career INTs and nine sacks. In his final season, he helped the Titans to an AFC Championship and concluded his career in Super Bowl XXXIV. 
Before the NFL, Jackson was a four-year starter at Purdue University. As a senior, he earned All-American honors and was named semifinalist for the Jim Thorpe Award, given annually to the nation's top defensive back. 
Jackson was born April 8, 1969, in Houston, Texas, and went on to attend Klein Forest High School in Houston. He has a daughter, Dominique, and a son, Stephen. 
This biographical article relating to an American football defensive back born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Phranc's first solo LP fused elements of her punk rock past with acoustic folk music. She covers Bob Dylan's "The Lonesome Death of Hattie Carroll," comments on the image of girl groups ("Everywhere I Go (I Hear the Go Go's)"), and relays the personal tragedy of suicide in "Lifelover." 
Folksinger was released on Rhino Records, and was licensed to Island Records in 1990. "Everywhere I Go (I Hear the Go-Go's)" is a bonus track on the Island version. 
Arhaan Behll is an Indian television actor best known for portraying Krishna in Mann Kee Awaaz Pratigya, Kabir in Yehh Jadu Hai Jinn Ka! And Krishna Sajjan Singh in Mann Kee Awaaz Pratigya 2. 
In 2009, his television debut occurred in Star Plus's popular TV series Mann Kee Awaaz Pratigya as Krishna Singh. It was his breakthrough and ran successfully till 2012. 
The following year he starred in a cameo as Magadha emperor Chandragupta Maurya in Colors TV's Chakravartin Ashoka Samrat. 
Two years later, Behll made a comeback portraying the prominent character Viraj Singh opposite Adaa Khan in Colors TV's Vish Ya Amrit: Sitara. 
In 2021, Behll reprise his role Krishna Singh Thakur in Mann Kee Awaaz Pratigya 2 along with Pooja Gor. 
Damodar Acharya is an Indian engineer and educationist. He served as the director of the Indian Institute of Technology Kharagpur from July 2007 to 30 June 2012. The government nominated Prof Acharya as a director on the central board of the Reserve Bank of India in October 2012. 
 Angus Hargreaves Robinson (22 July 1907 - 17 October 1973) was the owner of a grazing property, 'Yanjettee', at Coolup, Western Australia, as well as being an amateur ornithologist. He made important studies of the birds on his property, including Australian magpies and Magpie-larks. He was a member of the Royal Australasian Ornithologists Union (RAOU), and made a Fellow of the RAOU in 1970. 
Aballay (Spanish: Aballay, el hombre sin miedo) is a 2010 Argentine action drama film written and directed by Fernando Spiner. The film was selected as the Argentine entry for the Best Foreign Language Film at the 84th Academy Awards, but it did not make the final shortlist. 
This article related to an Argentine film of the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to an Indian cricket person born in 1988 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pieter Willem Kasteleyn was born in Leiden on 12 October 1924. After finishing high school in 1942, Kasteleyn briefly studied chemistry in Amsterdam. After the war Leiden University reopened and he undertook the study of physics which he graduated in 1951. He defended his Ph.D. thesis working under S.R. de Groot in 1956. 
In 1963 Kasteleyn was nominated Full Professor at the Lorentz Institute of Theoretical Physics in Leiden. In 1979 he was elected a member of the Royal Netherlands Academy of Arts and Sciences. From 1981 to 1985 he acted as secretary of the Physics Section of the Academy. From 1978 to 1984 he was chairman of the Commission for Theoretical Physics of the Dutch National Physics Foundation. He retired in 1985. 
While investigating dimers on a square lattice (essentially a domino tiling), he independently discovered combinatorial Fisher-Kasteleyn-Temperley algorithm. In a series of papers with C. M. Fortuin he developed random cluster model and obtained the FKG inequality. 
Parliamentary elections were held in Norway in 1870. As political parties were not officially established until 1884, all those elected were independents. Voter turnout was 45.1%, although only 4.7% of the country's population was eligible to vote. 
Marcus Harvey Steed (born 8 May 1975) is an English cricketer. Steed is a right-handed batsman who bowls right-arm medium-fast. He was born at Market Harborough, Leicestershire. 
Steed initially represented the Northamptonshire Cricket Board, making his debut in List A for them against the Yorkshire Cricket Board in the 2001 Cheltenham & Gloucester Trophy. From 2001 to 2002, he represented the Board in 4 List A matches, he last of which came against the Yorkshire Cricket Board in the 1st round of the 2003 Cheltenham & Gloucester Trophy which was played in 2002. 
In 2003, he joined Bedfordshire, making his Minor Counties Championship debut for the county against Cumberland. From 2003 to 2009, he represented the county in 34 Championship matches, the last of which came against Northumberland.  His debut for the county in the MCCA Knockout Trophy came against Suffolk in 2003. From 2003 to 2009, he represented the county in 13 Trophy matches, the last of which came against Staffordshire. 
Steed also represented Bedfordshire in List A cricket when they were permitted to take part in the Cheltenham & Gloucester Trophy. His first List A match for the county came against Warwickshire in the 3rd round of the 2003 Cheltenham & Gloucester Trophy. He played 2 further List A matches for the county against Cheshire in the 1st round of the 2004 Cheltenham & Gloucester Trophy which was played in 2003 and against Sussex in the 1st round of the 2005 Cheltenham & Gloucester Trophy. 
In his career total of 7 List A matches, he scored 55 runs at a batting average of 11.00, with a high score of 22, while in the field he took a single catch. With the ball he bowled 18 wicket-less overs. 
Sandro Trotti (born 1934) is a contemporary Italian painter. In 1972 Trotti became professor of Painting at the Accademia di Belle Arti in Rome, where he taught until 2000. He holds teaching posts in Peking and in Canton, in the People's Republic of China. 
Trotti was born at Monte Urano, in the Marche region of central Italy, in 1934. He moved to Rome, where he became friend with other Italian important Masters as Luigi Montanarini, Domenico Purificato, Pericle Fazzini, Sante Monachesi and Corrado Cagli. 
During the '60s Trotti's pictorial research is directed towards abstractionism and experimentations on glass and plastic materials: Cellophane, Cartesian Axes, Rice Beans, Televisions and Crates. 
In the '70s Trotti develops a more figurative painting, which does not leave out the geometric shapes and realizes the famous series of "White Nudes" and portraits of the Japanese Yoko. 
Since 1970 he has traveled abroad and in 1973 he exhibited in Syria, at the Urnina Gallery in Damascus. 
He has traveled to Thailand and India, Egypt and the Middle East, thus enriching his pictorial research with new subjects and new suggestions (Buddhas and portraits of oriental women, a theme that returns throughout his career). 
The portraits, the nudes of women, the landscapes of Rome and the Marche hills are pictorial themes constantly present in the art of Trotti. 
In 1992 an exhibition in St. Petersburg, where he meets many artists and writers including the writer Vladimir Asimov, who will write an essay on his painting. 
In the same year, a successful anthological exhibition in the Monumental Complex of San Michele a Ripa in Rome with a presentation by Carmine Benincasa. 
Parallel to the pictorial activity Trotti also carries on the graphic design by making many etchings. 
In 1998 an anthological exhibition in Ascoli Piceno and Monte Urano, with the presentation of Claudio Strinati. 
In 1999 Trotti was invited to China, and exhibited in Canton, Peking and Shanghai. In 2007 he had another large exhibition in Shanghai, and was appointed professor of history of art at the China Central Academy of Fine Arts in Peking and at the Guangzhou Academy of Fine Arts in Canton. 
In 2010 he was between few living painters to participate in "Romaccademia - a century of art from Sartorio to Scialoja", an exhibition held at the Vittoriano complex in Rome in honor of the great masters of the Academy of Fine Arts in Rome. 
Over one hundred works by Sandro Trotti, donated by the artist to the Town of Fermo (Marche, Italy), will constitute a museum fund at the "Palazzo dei Priori". 
The river Gesse forms all of the commune's eastern border; the Gimone forms all of its western border. 
The MCV Evolution (stylised as eVolution; internal designation: MCV C102) is a low floor and low entry single-decker bus body built by Manufacturing Commercial Vehicles. It was unveiled in 2003 as the successor to the MCV Stirling. The MCV Evolution 2 (internal designation: MCV C124RLE) was launched, initially on Mercedes-Benz chassis in 2011. 
The MCV Evolution is based on the Stirling that it has a rounded roof dome (no longer peaked) and a separately mounted destination display with either a double-curvature windscreen or a single-curvature windscreen and it is offered on the MAN 12.220 (A76), 12.240 (A76), 14.220 (A66) and 14.240 (A66) however there were plans to body on an even shorter MAN chassis, the 10.220, which can be built as short as 8.5m long. 
From late 2005 it was offered on the Alexander Dennis Dart SLF. In October 2009, MCV and dealer Arriva Bus & Coach unveiled a MCV Evolution VDL SB180 at Coach and Bus Live 2009. 
The MCV Evolution was also offered on larger full-size single-decker buses, such as the Volvo B7RLE, Volvo B8RLE, MAN A22 and Mercedes-Benz OC500LE; this was replaced by the long-wheelbase MCV Evora in 2018, although the Evolution 2 remains in production on shorter, more lightweight chassis. 
One Evolution body was built on VDL SB200 chassis in 2012 as a static demonstrator for Arriva Bus & Coach, two years later it was sold to Richards Brothers in Wales. 
Transport for London contractors Docklands Buses and Metroline both purchased examples, while Tranzit Group of New Zealand purchased 58. Go Bus of New Zealand currently operates 43 of the type, 31 being the 15.250 MAN chassis and the remaining 12 being 14.240 MAN chassis.  
The original Evolution body is internally designated by MCV as the C102 on Alexander Dennis, MAN, VDL, and Volvo chassis and as the C120LE on Mercedes-Benz chassis, while the Evolution 2 body is internally designated as the C124RLE on Mercedes-Benz and Volvo chassis and as the C130RLE on MAN chassis. 
The GCR Class 11E was a type of 4-4-0 steam locomotive used by the Great Central Railway for express passenger services. Ten were built in the railway's own workshops at Gorton, Manchester during 1913; they remained in service until the mid-1950s. 
Compared to the class 1 4-6-0, the omission of one coupled axle allowed a longer wheelbase between two adjacent axles of a 4-4-0 than with the 4-6-0, so the firebox could be positioned between the axles instead of on top of one of them; thus it could be deeper, giving better draughting which aided steaming. The shorter overall length meant that the boiler tubes were shorter, which also improved draughting. 
On 27 February 1927, locomotive No. 5437 Prince George was hauling an express passenger train that was involved in a collision with a light engine at Penistone Yorkshire. 
The people of Loures are involved in the cultivation of olive trees and vineyards and the raising of livestock. The indigenous Messara horse is extensively bred there. 
The settlement appears in the Venetian censuses of the 16th century under the name Lures; 109 inhabitants are recorded in Pietro Castrofilaca's 1583 census. 
This article about a building or structure in China is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Moss Kendrix was born in Atlanta, Georgia on March 8, 1917. He spent the majority of his early life in Atlanta. 
Kendrix entered into Morehouse College and he served as the editor of the college newspaper The Maroon Tiger. He was a member of Alpha Phi Alpha fraternity and he was co-founder of Phi Delta Delta Journalism Society. It was the first society of its kind for African-American journalism students. 
He transferred into Howard University School of Law in 1939. However, he went into workforce for work experience. At the same time, he marr